@database "Adventure Mania!"
@author "Johan Van Gompel"
@(c) "Copyright ©1995 by Johan Van Gompel"
@$VER: 1994-01-05

@node main "Adventure Mania"
@toc contents
@next Introduction

                           - Adventure Mania! -

                     The adventure solution discazine
                     Copyright ©1995 Johan Van Gompel

                                 
 @{b}1.  Introduction@{ub}

  1.1  @{" Short introduction          " link introduction}..........What is 'Adventure Mania!'?
  1.2  @{" Freeware                    " link freeware}..........Great! It's free!

 @{b}2.  Distribution@{ub}

  2.1  @{" Disclaimer                  " link disclaimer}..........Warranty? No warranty!
  2.2  @{" License                     " link license}..........License agreement

 @{b}3.  Contents@{ub}

  3.1  @{" Solutions                   " link solutions}..........Fifty solutions

 @{b}4.  Publisher@{ub}

  4.1  @{" Author's address            " link author}..........Please, write me
@endnode

@node introduction "Introduction"
@next freeware
@prev main

 @{b}@{u}Adventure Mania!@{ub}@{uu}

 Adventure Mania! is, according to me anyway, the very first serious Amiga
 adventure solution discazine, containing exactly fifty beautifully written
 walkthroughs.  Indeed, there aren't a lot written by myself, I've searched
 through almost every single Amiga docs disc available on this globe and
 selected the best walkthroughs (the ones without any copyright notice on
 them).  They were all read, corrected when possible and sometimes even part-
 ly rewritten.  But why?  Simply because I've met many people who all had the
 same problem: they were all great adventure fans and were all searching for,
 indeed, walkthroughs.  Now they won't have to search any further, do they?
 Because of 'Adventure Mania!'...    

@endnode

@node freeware "Freeware"
@next distribution
@prev introduction

 @{b}@{u}Freeware@{ub}@{uu}

 Thank you to all the people who've written these solutions and made it pos-
 sible to me to release this magnificent product as freeware.  I'm certain
 it will pleasure many adventure-loving members of the Amiga community.
  However, I would like to note that 'Adventure Mania!' is copyrighted by
 me, Johan Van Gompel, and therefore I wouldn't like you to redistribute this
 product in any other form than it is now (so, don't cut or add things, e.g.
 put your own name beneath the title).

@endnode

@node disclaimer "Disclaimer"
@next license
@prev freeware

 THERE  IS  NO  WARRANTY  FOR  THE  PROGRAM,  TO  THE  EXTENT  PERMITTED BY
 APPLICABLE  LAW.   EXCEPT  WHEN  OTHERWISE STATED IN WRITING THE COPYRIGHT
 HOLDER  AND/OR  OTHER PARTIES PROVIDE THE PROGRAM "AS IS" WITHOUT WARRANTY
 OF  ANY  KIND, EITHER EXPRESSED OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO,
 THE  IMPLIED  WARRANTIES  OF  MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR
 PURPOSE.  THE ENTIRE RISK AS TO THE QUALITY AND PERFORMANCE OF THE PROGRAM
 IS  WITH  YOU.  SHOULD THE PROGRAM PROVE DEFECTIVE, YOU ASSUME THE COST OF
 ALL NECESSARY SERVICING, REPAIR OR CORRECTION.

 IN NO EVENT UNLESS REQUIRED BY APPLICABLE LAW OR AGREED TO IN WRITING WILL
 ANY  COPYRIGHT HOLDER, OR ANY OTHER PARTY WHO MAY REDISTRIBUTE THE PROGRAM
 AS  PERMITTED  ABOVE, BE LIABLE TO YOU FOR DAMAGES, INCLUDING ANY GENERAL,
 SPECIAL,  INCIDENTAL  OR  CONSEQUENTIAL  DAMAGES ARISING OUT OF THE USE OR
 INABILITY TO USE THE PROGRAM (INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO LOSS OF DATA OR
 DATA BEING RENDERED INACCURATE OR LOSSES SUSTAINED BY YOU OR THIRD PARTIES
 OR  A  FAILURE OF THE PROGRAM TO OPERATE WITH ANY OTHER PROGRAMS), EVEN IF
 SUCH  HOLDER  OR  OTHER  PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
 DAMAGES.

@endnode

@node license "License"
@next solutions
@prev disclaimer

 - Except  when  otherwise  stated in  this documentation, you may not copy
   and/or  distribute  this  program without the accompanying documentation
   and  other  additional  files  that came with the original.  You may not
   copy and/or distribute modified versions of this program.

 - You may not copy, modify, sublicense, distribute or transfer the program
   except  as expressly provided under this license.  Any attempt otherwise
   to copy, modify, sublicense, distribute or transfer the program is void,
   and  will  automatically  terminate your rights to use the program under
   this  license.   However, parties who have received copies, or rights to
   use  copies,  from  you  under this license will not have their licenses
   terminated so long as such parties remain in full compliance.

 - By  copying,  distributing  and/or  using the  program you indicate your
   acceptance of this license to do so, and all its terms and conditions.

 - Each  time  you  redistribute  the  program, the recipient automatically
   receives a license from the original licensor to copy, distribute and/or
   use  the  program  subject  to  these terms and conditions.  You may not
   impose  any  further  restrictions  on  the  recipients' exercise of the
   rights granted herein.

 - You  may  not  disassemble,  decompile,  re-source  or otherwise reverse
   engineer the program.

 - You  agree  to  cease  distributing  the  program  and data involved if
   requested to do so by the author.

@endnode

@node solutions "Solutions"
@next ad
@prev disclaimer

 @{" Adventures of Willy Beamish     " link ad}
 @{" Ballyhoo                        " link ba}
 @{" Borrowed Time                   " link bo}
 @{" Bureaucrazy                     " link bu}
 @{" Curse of Enchantia              " link cu}
 @{" Cutthroads                      " link cut}
 @{" Darkseed                        " link da}
 @{" Deadline                        " link de}
 @{" Enchanter                       " link e1}
 @{" Enchanter 2                     " link e2}
 @{" Fascination                     " link fa}
 @{" Future Wars                     " link fu}
 @{" Goblins 2                       " link g2}
 @{" Goblins 3                       " link g3}
 @{" Gold Rush                       " link go}
 @{" Guild of Thieves                " link gu}
 @{" Hare Raising Havoc              " link ha}
 @{" Heart of China                  " link he}
 @{" Hitchhiker's Guide to the Galaxy" link hi}
 @{" Hook                            " link ho}
 @{" Hugo 2                          " link hu}
 @{" Indiana Jones 4: Fate of Atl.   " link in}
 @{" Infidel                         " link inf}
 @{" King's Quest 1                  " link k1}
 @{" King's Quest 3                  " link k3}
 @{" King's Quest 5                  " link k5}
 @{" Leather Goddesses of Phobos     " link le}
 @{" Legend of Kyrandia              " link leg}
 @{" Leisure Suit Larry 1            " link l1}
 @{" Leisure Suit Larry 5            " link l5}
 @{" Lure of the Temptress           " link lu}
 @{" Lurking Horror                  " link lur}
 @{" Maniac Mansion                  " link ma}
 @{" Mindshadow                      " link mi}
 @{" Planetfall                      " link pl}
 @{" Seastalker                      " link se}
 @{" Secret of the Silver Blades     " link sec}
 @{" Severed Heads                   " link sev}
 @{" Shadowgate                      " link sh}
 @{" Space Quest 1                   " link s1}
 @{" Space Quest 2                   " link s2}
 @{" Space Quest 3                   " link s3}
 @{" Suspended                       " link su}
 @{" The Secret of Monkey Island     " link t1}
 @{" The Secret of Monkey Island 2   " link t2}
 @{" The Witness                     " link the}
 @{" Ween: The Prophecy              " link we}
 @{" Wishbringer                     " link wi}
 @{" Zack McKracken                  " link za}
 @{" Zork 1                          " link zo}

@endnode

@node ad "Adventures of Willy Beamish"
@next ba
@prev solutions

                      
                      The Adventures of Willy Beamish
                             
 
                               INTRODUCTION

 The first thing the player should know about WILLY BEAMISH is that
although it appears to be a child's game, it is more for the adult who wants
to regress. While a youngster may enjoy the graphics and humorous situations,
some of the puzzles may be beyond his ability to solve. However, it still
could make for an enjoyable shared experience, allowing the kid to play as 
much as possible while the adult helps him over the rough spots.
 
 The game begins in Carbuncle Elementary school on the last day of the
school year, and during the non interactive opening Willy is seen dozing off
in the assembly hall while Principal Frick makes his farewell address. Horny, 
Willy's pet frog, jumps out of his backpack and steals Frick's toupee, causing 
Willy to be sent to Ms. Glass's last day of after school detention.
 
 There are two goals in the game, one which is evident from the start, and
the other one becomes apparent as the game progresses. Willy wants to compete
in the National Nintari Championship, and needs $2,500 to enter. It becomes
clear very soon that his father won't be able to scrape up the cash, so 
Willy's only chance is to enter Horny in the Tootsweet Frog Jump Contest and 
win 1st or 2nd prize.
 
 Meanwhile, the player is privy to the plot developing behind the scenes
thanks to a series of "intermissions." Leona Frumpton, owner of the Tootsweet
company, and Louis Stoole, president of Plumber's Union Local 409, have joined
together to take over Frumpton. For reasons unknown at first, Louis has gotten
his plumbers to go on strike, causing toilets to back up all over the city, 
and Leona hires a spokesman for Tootsweet to "take the heat."
 
 The game can be lost in several ways: Willy can get into too much trouble
(as indicated by the Troublemeter) and be sent to Cadet School for the summer
or he can lose the Frog Jump contest and be unable to compete in the Nintari
Championships. A wrong move can get him sent to the hospital, or he can fail
to stop the big plot and Frumpton will be sludged.
 
 There are multiple paths to victory, and I'll try to detail the ones I
found. It isn't necessary to solve every puzzle, and Willy can even get in
a reasonable amount of trouble without losing the game. At several points the
player must make a moral decision which may affect how a puzzle is solved, and
it may also endanger Willy's trouble rating. How Willy acts is in the hands
of the player, and I may not have discovered all the options available nor all
the consequences that result.
 
 One thing the player might want to do in order to get his money's worth
is to always use the Look feature (magnifying glass) to survey each screen in
the game. There are many funny descriptions to be read whenever the icon is
positioned over an object and is transparent.

                   CARBUNCLE ELEMENTARY SCHOOL (PRELUDE)

 Willy is sitting in Ms. Glass's afternoon detention class, a result of the
mischief caused in assembly earlier. He discovers that his report card is on
its way to his house, and the "C" he received in Music Appreciation won't make
his father very likely to give him the $2,500 to enter the Nintari contest. 
So, should he try to go home early and intercept the mail or just face the
consequences when Dad sees his grade?
 
 His first chance to escape detention comes when Horny makes an unexpected
outburst and Ms. Glass asks him for an explanation. "Oh, that was just my
frog, Horny" will be taken as an insult, and Willy is then sent to see Mr.
Frick. The player still has the principal's toupee that Horny took during
assembly, and the only safe way out of this situation is not to get smart and
to return the hairpiece. Willy could try to hold the toupee as a bargaining
chip to improve his grade in Music Appreciation, but that won't work. After
this, Willy returns to detention and can choose to stay or try and sneak out.
 
 "Musta been something I ate" will earn Willy a trip to see the new school
nurse, who is rather well-endowed. From here, he can persist in feigning his
illness which will result in being sent to the hospital, or stop the charade
and return to class. Choose number three, "Nothing, Ms. Glass" and Willy just
continues to sit in detention.
 
 Now, the "old prune" asks Willy and his classmates, Chubby and Carmine,
to write a composition on how they plan to spend their summer vacation. A good
student would stay put and do the assignment, but a chance to escape early
presents itself shortly afterwards as the teacher dozes off at her desk. 
Carmine and Chubby begin a spitball fight, and Willy may choose to sneak out
of the classroom. The hall is guarded by Coach Beltz, so if the player wants
to get by he will need a hall pass - or a reasonable facsimile.
 
 If the player behaves and sits through detention, Ms. Glass awakens and
the students read their compositions before being sent home. Willy's piece is,
of course, about his ambition to practice for and compete in the all-important
video game challenge. Of course, playing it safe this way means the boy will
have no chance to intercept the incriminating report card from the mail box.
 
 To forge the pass to freedom, click open Willy's desk, then use the white
crayon on the wooden block. Put the pass in Willy's backpack, wait for the
teacher to doze off, then sneak out into the hall. Either click on the door
to the restroom or the front door of the school, and the alert coach will stop
the player and ask where he's headed. Any of the three choices will get him
sent to the restroom, either by his own choosing or by Beltz's order to wash
his hands after doing some mandatory pushups. If he had tried to write the
pass using the other crayon in his desk, Beltz would have detected the blatant
forgery and sent Willy to Frick's office.
 
 In the bathroom, Willy has his first encounter with Spider, the bully. 
This is the price he pays for sneaking out early, and some quick thinking is
required in order to avoid making a permanent impression in the wall. There
is no "wrong" answer here, although if Willy answers "None of your business"
or doesn't give the bully his hand-held Game Buddy he'll have to make a detour
to the nurse's office and then return to class. He can then try to sneak out
again, which will either result in success or a trip to Frick's office.
 
 Eventually, Willy either gets out of class before detention ends, or he
stays until it is too late to get his report card. After a short graphic
scene, Willy glides home on his skateboard and arrives at his front porch. 
School's out, now let the fun begin!

                WILLIE'S HOME - FRIDAY AFTERNOON (DAY ONE)

 If Willy got out of detention early, he has a moral choice to make. He
can take the report card that he sees in the mail slot, and he then has the
choice of whether to hide it from his father or to show it to him at supper. 
The first choice will really tick Dad off, probably sending Willie to cadet
school, the second will elevate the Troublemeter a few notches. It's best for
him just to leave it alone, even if he went to the trouble of getting home
early to have the option. Seeing it and not taking may actually have the
effect of keeping the trouble level down, resisting temptation and all.

 Since he is home, he really should check in with Mom (referred to by the
game informally as Sheila). Failure to do so will elevate the Troublemeter,
and the player will also miss out on some other fun stuff. As Willy approaches
the front door for whatever reason, the ghost of his Grandpa appears and warns
him that something weird is going on in Frumpton. Ghost Beamish also appears
from time to time throughout the game, serving as Willy's conscience.
 
 Inside, Willy greets his faithful canine companion, Duffy. He really
should take every opportunity to be kind to his pet, otherwise Duffy will make
trouble for him. If Willy neglects him enough times, he runs away, is caught
by the dogcatcher and the game is over. Other things the dog might do if not
given enough attention is digging in the back yard or chewing up something,
both of which won't be good for Willy. The player should start off right by
taking the dog for a walk, pacifying the pooch.
 
 Willy can listen to the messages on the answering machine in the foyer,
two of which deal with him. I'm not certain if this erases them so that Dad
doesn't hear them, but they are humorous and the player may want to play them
back. Entering the kitchen, he is greeted by Sheila, and if he leaves right
away he won't have to deal with his kid sister Brianna nor will he be asked to
help cut veggies for supper. Duffy is here, and if the player clicks on him
he can eavesdrop on the dog's thoughts and gauge how he feels about his 
master. 

 If Willy stays in the kitchen and either waits a few minutes or clicks on
Mom or Brianna to talk, he'll have another choice to make. He can make his
mother happy and keep his sister's noise level down by agreeing to push her on
the swings, or refuse and help slice carrots for the evening meal. Pushing
Brianna on the swings presents Willy with another temptation, as she keeps
asking him to push her higher. Save the game here and keep pushing the little
brat in order to watch a humorous scene, which may satisfy Willy's mischievous
nature, but will also end the game.
 
 After either refusing to play with Brianna or after pushing her on the
swings, Willy has to wield a ginsu knife to julienne the vegetables. Despite
his mother's warning, the knife slips and cuts Willy's thumb. This could be
a major catastrophe for the aspiring video champ, so he should treat it right
away. The bathroom is through the door in the top center of the upstairs
screen, and the player can easily find the medicine cabinet using the TAB key. 
Click on the "Germ Away" then the band-aid, and disaster will be averted with
a minimum amount of pain.

 While upstairs, there are a few things Willy can do, but he should be sure
to return to the dining room by 6:00 (click on Willy to get the inventory and
time screen) so he won't be late for dinner. If he goes to the attic he can
play with Dad's model railroad set, and Ghost Beamish will warn him to be very
careful with the expensive set. It is possible to wreck it, thus elevating the
Troublemeter again.
 
 Willy might also go into big sister Tiffany's room and add 30 pounds to
her scale, and watch the results sometime later in the game. Her diary can be
used as a solution to two of the puzzles in the game, but when Willy picks it
up Ghost Beamish will appear to appeal to his conscience. The puzzles can be
solved other ways, but using the diary can be funnier.
 
 Everyone gets together for supper in the dining room, and after Sheila
breaks up the kids' bickering, she reminds them to keep mum about Gordon's
surprise party to celebrate his 40th birthday and anticipated promotion to
vice-president. Surely this is the way Willy will get the money to go to the
championships, and Tiffany will get a new car, and the whole family will be
happy! Unfortunately, Dad tells them that he was fired, and that the budget
will be real tight for a while.

 A short while later, Dad asks where the mail is, and now Willy is going
to feel the heat. How much heat depends on how he handled the report card. 
If he took the card, Grandpa will appear and urge him to show it to Gordon, 
and if he doesn't do so Brianna will squeal on him resulting in Cadet school. 
No matter what else happens, the one certainty is that Dad will take the key 
to his Nintari and tell Tiffany to keep it for a week, and she is only too 
glad to oblige. If Willy doesn't recover it, he won't get the practice he 
needs to win the championship - assuming he gets the money to make it there.
 
 The evening news with Stan Lather comes on next, and the family learns
that the Frumpton Plumber's Union, led by Louis Stoole, has gone on strike. 
During the next few days of the game, signs of this work stoppage will become
apparent in the tap water, park fountain, and river. After hearing this, Dad
is even more depressed, and Sheila tries to cheer him up by serving dessert. 
Tonight's special is chocolate mousse, sweetened with that modern miracle
Tootsweet - made from recycled sludge and containing only two calories per
serving.
 
 Duffy can't resist this treat, and Willy must decide whether to slip some
to his dog and risk Mom's wrath, or to turn a deaf ear to Duffy. He'll get
into trouble either way, if he gives the dog a treat he'll do better than if
Duffy jumps up and serves himself. Either way, Sheila orders him to get the
mutt out of the room, and as soon as Willy exits the screen the player gets 
the first behind-the-scene look at Leona Humpford and Louis Stoole.

 Together in a hot tub, they laugh about the Plumber's strike, and Leona
tells of her plan to hire a fall guy to take the heat. At this point, that's
all the player finds out, and the story returns to Willy after supper.
 
 Willy has a chance to earn a couple bucks here, and he may need it to help
him win the frog jump contest. Dad is in the living room, if Willy talks to
him he will be asked to cut the grass, and he should agree, for which he will
receive $2.00. After this chore, Willy's next goal is to recover his Nintari
key from Tiffany. At about this time, Sheila should call for him, asking him
to take a bottle of conditioner to sister Tiffany in the bathroom.
 
 Returning upstairs, Willy may have a chance to actually lower his trouble
rating. Entering Brianna's bedroom, he may see his little sister fallen on the
floor "Willie, I've fallen and I can't get up!" Assist her into bed and the
player actually gets to watch the Troublemeter go down.
 
 Inside the bathroom, Willy sees Tiffany in the bathtub. The Nintari key
is sitting by the sink, but if Willy reaches for it his sister will eject him
from the bathroom forcibly. If he either throws the conditioner to her or
starts to talk to her, he will enter a dialogue where he can ask for the key,
but he'll find that it's not that easy. Now he has two options to get the key
back, he can terrorize her by using Horny on her or he can offer her the diary
if he took it from her bedroom. Either option should allow Willy to recover
his key, mission accomplished!

 Willy should still have some time before his 8:00 pm bedtime to hone up
on his Nintari skills. In his bedroom, he can use the key on the game, and the
"Monster Squad" non-interactive sequence follows. If he cut his thumb earlier
and treated it properly he should do well, otherwise it will begin to throb 
and remind him to tend to it. Have him take the jar of flies from the shelf in 
his room, it will be very helpful during the contest on Monday.
 
 Willy's had a busy day, and if he's still going it means he hasn't gotten
into too much trouble. He should have $2.00 from mowing the lawn, his Nintari
key and perhaps Tiffany's diary if he didn't use it to recover the key. Time
to turn in and prepare for another fun day tomorrow.

        WILLIE'S HOME, TREE FORT, PIZZA PARLOR - DAY TWO (SATURDAY)

 The first day of summer vacation, and Willy has to start setting things
up for Monday's Frog Jump contest. If he hasn't recovered the Nintari key by
now, I'm not certain it's possible. If he didn't mow the lawn on Friday
afternoon, he can do it this morning. First, he goes down to join the family
at breakfast.
 
 As soon as he sits down, Brianna "requests" some Honey-Roasted Kookie
Klowns for her breakfast, and Willy can serve her or take the consequences. 
Duffy is next, asking his master for a morning meal. Finally, Willy returns
to the table where Dad is busy looking through the paper for a job. He finds
an unbelievable opportunity for employment with the Tootsweet company, and he
calls Leona right away. This is just the fall guy Ms. Humpford is looking for,
and he gets an interview for the next day - what luck!
 
 The Saturday morning cartoons are on the dining room television, and a 
commercial on the Magnabox television should come on next, advertising the
competition to be held Monday afternoon. Willy also gets a look at Horny's 
competition, the Amazing Turbofrog! It doesn't look like his Horny is any
match for that monster, as Brianna is quick to point out. There are a few ways
Willy can better his frog's chances,but as long as he is able to place second
the game is won.

 Dad's attention is drawn to the tube next by a commercial for Tootsweet,
as he is going to apply for their public relations position on Sunday. Now
Willy asks for his allowance, and Gordon will give him $5.00 to wash the 
Grange Rover.This cash combined with the $2.00 from mowing the lawn will make
winning the Frog Jump contest easier, but isn't necessary to finish the game.
 
 After Willy washes the car (or not), he should go and meet the gang who are
lounging in the neighborhood tree fort. His friends, Perry and Dana are here,
and so is Dana's girl frog Gigi. Gigi can help Horny win the contest if Willy
can convince Dana to enter her, but this requires some finesse on the boy's
part. As Willy enters,Dana returns a "Biffo-Man" comic book she borrowed from
him. If he wants to survive the trip to the Pizza Parlor he should take it
before the gang goes there.
 
 Willy should talk to Perry first, and if he still has Tiffany's diary
Perry will suddenly discover a rare Mickey Morris baseballcard in his pack of
gum. Willy wants this card, and he may trade the diary for it, but this will
not go well with Dana.
 
 Horny suddenly takes notice of Gigi, and the gang is astonished by how the
lusty boy frog jumps after Dana's pet. The conversation turns to the contest,
and although Dana states that her frog is simply for show, if Willy isn't too
chauvinistic she will say she'll consider entering Gigi. Now she suggests they
use her coupon to have some pizza at the Slice 'o Life pizza place, and 
exiting the tree fort takes the player directly there.

 Things go smoothly once at the parlor for a few minutes for Willy and the
gang as they dig into their free pizza. A photographer stops by and offers to
take a picture of the threesome for a dollar, and if Willy did his chores he
should have enough to pop for it. A little later, the food has an undesired
side effect on Willy, and his friends have a laugh as he tries to avoid the
blame for the following incident.
 
 Not as amused is the Spiderman, who immediately calls Willy out. Now
Willy feels another attack coming,and he'd better get to the bathroom quickly 
by telling the bully, "Lemme go... I'm warning ya." In the bathroom a painter
is working,and informs Willy that he poured turpentine into the toilet in the
far stall. He put up a "No Smoking" sign, and Willy should immediately take
it and put it in the trash.
 
 In comes Spider, and this time if Willy doesn't give the proper item to
the extortionist he will suffer some major damage, ending the game. Hopefully,
he picked up the "Biffo-Man" comic from the tree fort, and it just happens to
be Spider's favorite - I suppose he likes the pictures.After Willy gives this
to the punk, the rest of this scene is non-interactive, just watch the action
as Willy suggests Spider peruse the pulp in the turpentine-loaded toilet.

 Back in the tree fort, the conversation turns to practicing frog-jumping. 
Leaving this scene takes the gang to the park, where Willy can gauge Horny's
ability against Turbofrog's 25-foot record. Putting the amphibian down on the
mark then giving him a push, Willy notices to his dismay that at best Horny 
can only do 15-20 feet, even with Gigi there to inspire him.
 
 Two things can be discovered here, one that will boost Horny to great new
heights, and the other reveals a way to cripple the competition. The vendor
here sells the famed "Slam-Dunk" cola for a buck,and Willy should have enough
to buy a bottle, and get a timely message about recycling as well. Giving
Horny a dose of this will cause him to jump well over the mark,but in keeping
with the theme of a "kid's game" the player will find out much later that to
use this method during the contest will lead to disaster. However, it is a
funny scene to watch, and it doesn't hurt to do it now.
 
 The other thing Willy can discover that he will be able to do during the
contest is that frogs take leisurely naps after a good meal. Willy can give
Horny some of the flies from the jar in his room, and the frog will promptly
fall asleep. Ah,if he slips this to Turbofrog during the Frog Jump it may put
him out of commission!

 It's about time for Willy to say so long to his friends and head home. 
When he watched the contest commercial this morning, he discovered that he 
must go to the west side of town tomorrow to get an entry blank for the 
contest. First, he must survive the evening with (insert appropriate organ 
music) The Babysitter from HELL!
 
 Before going home, Willy should return to Olde Towne. If he bought the
photo of he and his chums, and if he has $5.00 from washing the Grange Rover,
he can have a T-shirt made at the stand near the fountain. Click on the photo
and give it to the vendor, who will transfer it to the shirt. Willy should
check out the lottery machine next to the vendor's stand, and pick up the
ticket he finds when he looks in the slot. This item is crucial, but won't be
used until much later in the game.
 
 As he heads home, Willy sees Tiffany's first driving lesson with boyfriend
Cliff. It will probably be her last one, at least in that car, as she has a
little trouble with the proper use of the clutch. Oh, well, it's nice to see
that Willy isn't the only one of the Beamish children to get in hot water!

       ALICIA, THE BABYSITTER FROM HELL - DAY TWO (SATURDAY EVENING)

 Dealing with Spider at the Slice 'o Life Pizzeria was (excuse the term)
child's play compared to Willy's next challenge. Shortly after arriving home,
his parents should introduce him to Alicia,who is going to watch the children
while they attend a barbecue. Sure, she's ugly, thinks Willy, but he probably
hasn't met a sitter he couldn't handle.
 
 Shortly afterwards, Alicia calls the children to the dinner table, where
the meal is that old quick and easy to make, nutritious dish - macaroni and
cheese. Despite the Kraft commercials with the little girl spokesperson, I
don't believe it's any more popular with the kids than before. Willy and his
sister are no exception, and promptly express their displeasure with the menu. 
Alicia, an imaginative type, encourages the children to look again at their
meal, and this time it's moving - WORMS!
 
 Willy and Brianna simultaneously expectorate the cuisine on poor Alicia,
and in a startling transformation she turns into a large, frightening bat! I
don't know how much she charges for her services, but I might know some folks
who would like to hire this child-snatching sitter... Willy, brave soul that
he is, tells Brianna to hide, then dashes out of the room himself.

 Wherever he goes, Alicia flies right behind him, and if he stays still too
long he'll be carried away. First, to slow the demon down, Willy should run
to the bathroom and get the can of Aqua-Jet hairspray from the cabinet.If the
player takes time to look at the label, he'll see this is industrial-strength
stuff! Now change the cursor to cross-hairs, then aim the spray near the
ceiling. After Alicia flies into the cloud, she'll be slowed down, but Willy
still must find a way to capture her.
 
 Next stop is Brianna's bedroom, where Willy will find a mouse in the chair
cushion. After grabbing that, he should dash downstairs to the living room,
click on the vacuum cleaner and dive behind the couch. If he looks at the
device that he was to use to vacuum Duffy's shedding hairs, he'll note that
it can suck up a three-pound object from up to eight feet away!If he can only
get the old bat to sit still long enough....
 
 Willy should now throw the poor rodent from Brianna's room onto the living
room endtable. Alicia should descend upon it to consume for an appetizer, and
Willy should switch to the cross-hair indicator to target her. Click the
button, and that sitter's history. Exhausted, the next scene shows the hero
safe in bed with Gordon and Sheila telling him it was just a nightmare...

            WEST FRUMPTON, THE CRIPES GANG - DAY THREE (SUNDAY)

 Sunday, day of rest, day for the family to relax... not this Sunday! For
Gordon, its the start of a whole new career, for Willy its another challenge
on the way to the Tootsweet Frog Jump contest. He must get to the Tootsweet
Plant in West Frumpton by 5:00 to get an entry blank for the contest. There
are two problems he must overcome - first, to get passage on the ferry that
crosses the Dumpling River, and second, the gang of thugs that comes out as
night approaches. But, he shouldn't be over there long enough for them to 
show, should he?
 
 If Willy traded Tiffany's diary to Perry for the Mickey Morris baseball
card, he has the means to board the ferry. If his morals prevented him from
giving his sister's secrets away, he can still find tokens for the ferry. If
he had the T-shirt made from the photo, he has the means to really make an
impression on Dana, so she will enter Gigi in the contest and assure that 
Horny makes lustful leaps.

 The water is looking kinda strange today as Willy brushes his teeth, thanks
to the plumbers all being on strike. Downstairs, there is no sit-down family
breakfast this morning, as Gordon left early for his interview at Tootsweet. 
Sheila and Tiffany are in the dining room "discussing" yesterday's driving
lesson, and after this exchange Willy leaves the room. The player witnesses
another behind-the-scenes sequence, this time it's Gordon's interview with
Leona Humpford. Has he got what it takes for the job? Well, that's not really
important, he does qualify as the perfect fall guy.
 
 Willy now goes to Olde Towne, and if he heads towards the fountain he sees
that Tiffany has had a make-over, standing next to Cliff. Well, it's probably
just a statement she's making to protest her mother's unfair treatment, or
something like that. In the fountain are two ferry tokens, but the policeman
nearby will only tolerate him taking one. It doesn't matter,because the ferry
trip will be one-way at any rate, stranding Willy in West Frumpton.
 
 As Willy tries to board the ferry, Gus stops him and asks for a token. 
If Willy got the baseball card from Perry, he can give this to Gus in lieu of
a token, otherwise he can pay the fare with the token he found in the 
fountain. As the ferry crosses the Dumpling River, a non interactive sequence 
follows where Willy assists a group of Japanese tourists by taking their 
photograph. The woman keeps misinterpreting his comments,and at this point it 
will do no harm. In gratitude for his services, the grandfather gives Willy a 
genuine ninja shuriken and a smoke bomb. I never found a use for the ninja 
star, but the smoke bomb will help deal with the Cripes gang shortly.

 In West Frumpton, Willy may go to four locations. The Sludeworks can't
be entered yet, as picketing plumbers block that path. Plumber's Union 409 is
where Willy may listen to Louis Stoole address the assembled strikers, but he
can't do anything else here today. The Golden Bowl Tavern will be his last
stop over here today, but first he must go to the Tootsweet Plant in order to
get the contest entry blank.
 
 After getting an entry form, Willy may return to the ferry to find that
Gus is stranded on a sludge bar, and the player is stuck in West Frumpton. 
This is very bad, as this neighborhood gets dangerous as night approaches. 
Maybe Willy can get into the tavern and call his parents? No,it won't be that
easy (of course).
 
 When Willy tries to enter the Golden Bowl tavern, he'll be stopped by Ray,
a formidable looking bouncer. Using the Look icon on Ray will give the player
a clue on how to get him out of the way, but it won't work today. Instead,
Willy should try to enter the bar two or three more times, and after Ray turns
him away for the third time the Cripes gang should arrive on the scene.

 If Willy doesn't do something fast, the thugs will inflict some serious
damage. Despite his appearance, Ray will be no help whatsoever, as the powers
that guide his life have deemed that a gang fight is not in his future today. 
Since the bouncer chooses to hide behind his astrological convictions, Willy
is left to handle the Cripes armed with the monkey wrench which is the only
help Ray offers him.
 
 Thanks to the Japanese tourists he befriended on the ferry, Willy has the
means to delay the inevitable attack. He should click on the smoke bomb, then
change the cursor to cross-hairs and throw the bomb at the thugs. Immediately
afterwards he must use the wrench on the fire hydrant next to him, and then
exit this scene while the gang is held at bay.
 
 Now Willy has to run back to the Tootsweet Plant, where he finds the
Oriental tourists posing for a photograph. The street gang is close behind,
and Willy should try and get the family to help. Despite the language barrier,
he should choose the first response "They're gonna clobber me!" This is
misinterpreted by the woman as a robbery attempt, and the grandfather orders
the family to take action. Yes, this is no simple mild-mannered group of
Japanese vacationers, they are actually Ninja tourists!

 During the following non interactive sequence, the transformed family
proceeds to, well, kick tail! After posing for a photograph over the bodies
of the vanquished Cripe gang, Willy and his foreign friends have dinner, then
he is escorted home in the family's limo. He should have just enough time to
get into bed for a much-needed rest. Tomorrow will be the final day of the
story, and the player should have everything necessary to win the game.

          TOOTSWEET FROG JUMP CONTEST - DAY FOUR (MONDAY MORNING)

 Willy awakens on the big day, and after the frog jump contest things are
going to move really fast. After looking at the water in the bathroom sink,
Willy wisely decides to skip his oral hygiene this morning. As he sees the
family assembled in the dining room, it appears they have foregone their
morning showers and such as well. Although in Tiffany's case,it's pretty hard
to tell the difference. Sheila tries to call Gordon's attention to the water
situation, but he's preoccupied with getting himself ready for his first day
at his new job.

 Dad does pay attention when Willy points out Tiffany's "new look," but Mom
passes it off as just a temporary phase. Well, with the family in such chaos,
Willy is free to slip out unnoticed. As he exits the dining room, the player
sees another scene of Leona Humpford, surveying the city of Frumpton which is
rapidly being overcome by sludge. Without sludge being channeled to the city
Sludgeworks, how will Leona's Tootsweet Plant continue to produce? Doesn't
this worry her in the least? Why did she sabotage her own livelihood? Tune
in later for more...
 
 Willy's gotta make tracks to West Frumpton in time for the contest, but
as he steps out onto the front stoop he walks right into the middle of 
Gordon's first news conference with Stan Lather. The reporter is pressing 
Willy's dad for an explanation of the sludge crisis, and Gordon is totally at 
a loss for words. The scene switches again to Leona in her mansion, watching 
Gordon on her wide-screen television take the heat, just as she planned.
 
 Before taking the ferry across to West Frumpton, Willy should stop at the
tree fort if he has the custom T-shirt he had made with the gang's photograph. 
Giving this to Dana should ensure that she enters Gigi in the contest, and 
this will make Horny much more likely to win.

 Today, the ferry rides are free, and as Willy rides across Stan Lather
pops up once again. This time he's here to interview Hans and his Amazing
Turbofrog, and Hans is quite confident that his frog is unbeatable. When the
ferry reaches the other side, Willy may go straight to the competition at the
Tootsweet Plant, or go to the Plumber's Union to pick up an important item 
that will be needed near the end of the game. I went to the Union first, as 
after the Frog Jump Contest time becomes a crucial factor.
 
 Willy should go to the window on the left side of the main door and sneak
in through the window. The moment he approaches the desk, Louis Stoole bursts
in to nab the kid. Willy should grab the security pass lying on the desk,
then throw the plunger standing next to him at Louis.With the union president
temporarily disabled, Willy dashes out the door and may now go to the contest.
 
 There seemed to be a small logical bug in this scene where Willy must give
his entry blank to the judge. If he does it immediately, the contest never
seems to start. Willy should wait until the judge warns him that he only has
five minutes, then give the entry blank to him.
 
 While he waits for the judge, he can set things up to tilt the scales in
his favor. If he's played his cards right with Dana, she should be there with
Gigi, otherwise Willy will have a slightly more difficult time in the contest. 
If he has the flies in the jar, he can really fix Turbofrog by giving them to
him. The wonder frog will get drowsy and take a nap, then Willy should wait
for the judge to ask for his entry form.

 After Willy turns in his entry blank, a long sequence should begin which
leads up to the contest.The player just watches as Leona makes her speech and
Coach Beltz fires the starter pistol,then he should save the game just before
the contest action sequence.
 
 If Gigi is in the contest and Turbofrog is temporarily out of commission
it's pretty easy for Horny to win first place. The player should watch the
Jump-o-meter, the red bar on the left side of the screen, and click on the 
jump icon at the right when the indicator is near the top. As long as Horny 
wins at least second place, the game will continue.
 
 If Willy has the bottle of "Slam-Dunk" cola from the park vendor, he could
have given Horny a dose just before the contest. His frog would have easily
out-jumped the competition, but would quickly have been disqualified after a
test showed the cola in his system. This, I suppose, was meant to be a moral
statement to the kids about drugs and sports.

 Leona intends to have a frog leg dinner, and immediately after the contest
her security forces begin rounding up the contestants. Willy's frog escapes
and hops into the Tootsweet building, and Willy should follow him. Hopping
past security, Horny enters the elevator with Willy close behind. As he passes
by Leona's office, he hears his father talking to his new boss in her office. 
He stops to listen, and discovers that Gordon is expressing his doubts about
the Tootsweet cover-up and the sludge problem.
 
 Willy probably is feeling pretty proud of his dad's moral stand, but an
alert security guard suddenly nabs him. Barney Fifth, the overzealous guard
who aspires to become a *real* cop, drags Willy off to his office. As he
questions the boy, he receives a call from Leona who is ordering that the 
frogs all be rounded up and brought to Humpford mansion. Willy spots Horny on 
the security monitor just as the champ is captured, and he tries to get Barney 
to let him go. No chance of that happening, however, as the guard prepares to
call the Frumpton police.
 
 The player should have the Nintari key from his sister, and this is the
real purpose for it. Willy should combine it with his "G.I. Jim" dogtag chain,
then use his newly created hypnotic charm on Barney. Now, a list of phrases
comes on the screen, and the player should look in Willy's notebook (which was
part of the very sparse game documentation) for the ad he clipped out and find
the proper one mentioned there. Choosing the correct phrase will zap Barney
into a temporary trance, and Willy can make good his escape.

 No time to lose now! Horny has been taken to Humpford mansion for Leona's
dinner, and Willy must get there quickly to save him. On the way out of the
Tootsweet building, Willy once again encounters Stan Lather, who congratulates
him on his first (or second) place win and tries to give him his $25,000 (or
$2,500) check. So now Willy can go to the Nintari championships,but he's more
concerned with finding his frog at the moment. As part of his prize package 
Willy received a Yamasaki Jet-Ski scooter (along with a year's supply of Diet
Slam-Dunk cola and a T-shirt!), and now he can cross the sludged Dumpling 
River to Leona's mansion.

              HUMPFORD MANSION - DAY FOUR (MONDAY AFTERNOON)

 Willy's new scooter is parked at the end of the ferry dock on the Dumpling
river, and he can use it now to get to Leona's mansion to rescue Horny. It is
also equipped with an AM/FM radio/cassette recorder which is essential a bit
later in the game. Right now, Willy should click on the East Frumpton exit,
then Humpford Mansion. If he detoured home, he would find that the family is
preparing the surprise party for Gordon's 40th birthday. If Willy doesn't get
moving, however, Dad won't make it home at all...

 After he rides to Leona's mansion, Willy sneaks past her chauffeur and
general purpose body-busting thug, Stanley. Inside, Willy meets her pet parrot
Arthur. Arthur was left to Leona's tender mercies when her husband Harry died,
and the mistreated creature longs for someone to talk to. Actually, this is
just the writer's ingenious device to get the player to listen to the whole
plot, but if Willy doesn't hear Arthur's story the bird will alert Leona and
Louis. Willy must talk to the bird and get the entire story, not making any
wisecracks along the way.
 
 Harry Humpford, the inventor of Tootsweet, died and left the factory to
Leona. Leona's ambition is to own all of West Frumpton and turn it into a
sleazy tourist attraction called (what else?) Frumpton World. Harry's will
has a clause that states if the Tootsweet operation stops, Leona will inherit
the Sludgeworks and all of the West Frumpton real estate. That's where Louis
Stoole comes in - with his plumbers on strike, the sludge stops flowing, the
Sludgeworks shuts down, and no more Tootsweet is manufactured. Oh, isn't that
just such a devious plot?

 Ok, now that's very interesting, but the top priority for Willy is to
rescue Horny. There's a suit of armor in the hallway, but if Willy disturbs
it now it will make a horrid clatter as it falls. He should sneak into the
dining room, where he can see Leona and Louis playing horsy in the living
room. Taking a closer look with the Look icon, he hears Stan Lather (that guy
shows up all over this game!) doing a special report. Gordon comes clean,
exposing the dirty plan, or as much as he knows of it, then announces his
resignation. Way to go, Dad! Now back to the rescue...
 
 Willy needs to pull the old "jerk the tablecloth off the table" trick
without making a noise. There are two objects on the table that he can take,
a bronze chalice and a dish cover. He can't take both without disturbing the
villains' play, but he must take one so his tablecloth trick will work.Willie
should take the chalice and put it in his backpack, then take the tablecloth
and do the same. Voila! It worked! (I could never do it, myself).
 
 Now, he should sneak off screen to the left and use the tablecloth on the
floor next to the suit of armor. Then pull the object sticking out of the tin
suit, causing the entire thing to fall quietly on the floor. He takes the
helmet, and should discover something else in the suit. This is the plan for
the Air Tram inside the Sludgeworks, which also has the code to activate a
drawbridge control that Willy will use to elude the security guards.

 Willy now should reenter the dining room and exit to the right, where he
witnesses a ghastly sight. Cook Julia Childish is honing her knives here to
prepare the dinner, and the captured frogs are hanging from the carousel! The
first thing Willy should do is distract the cook by taking the bronze chalice
and throwing it at the lower right corner of the screen. Next,he should sneak
around behind the counter, take the pan of grease and pour it on the right 
side of the cook pot. This will allow him to push the pot right behind Julia, 
which sets up a trap for her to fall into.
 
 Quickly, he returns to the kitchen entrance then clicks on the carousel,
which causes him to jump onto it. He is carried quickly around where he jumps
off in front of the cook,startling her and causing her to fall backwards into
the pot. Now,he should take the helmet and put it over Julia's head to stifle
her screams, then push the right button on the carousel control box, which 
will release all the poor frogs.
 
 Horny jumps into Willy's backpack, and now he can make his escape. Well,
almost... Leona and Louis grab him as he leaves the kitchen, and he is put 
into a chest, hands and feet bound. Things look grim for him as the chest is 
thrown to the bottom of the Humpford pool, and Willy floats out, silent 
witness to the villains discussing their next move. Leona sends Stanley to 
pick up Gordon, who must be silenced "permanently" before Leona's plans are 
ruined. How is Willy going rescue Dad, when he's turning blue himself?

 In timely fashion, Horny, Gigi, and Turbofrog appear on the scene and pull
the plug on the pool, showing their gratitude for Willy's daring rescue. As
Leona watches, they all swim out through the drain and surface in the murky
Dumpling River. Now, the scene shifts to Gordon, who gets into the limo driven
by Stanley. From this point on, Willy has a limited time to find and rescue
his Dad before he gets sludged.

       GOLDEN BOWL TAVERN, HUMPFORD SLUDGEWORKS - DAY FOUR (ENDGAME)

 With Horny safe again, Willy must find a way to stop Leona Humpford's
diabolical scheme - to sludge Gordon, shut down the Tootsweet Plant and level
West Frumpton to build Humpford World. Where is Gordon? Well, most likely
he's somewhere in the Humpford Sludgeworks, but Willy can't get past Louis's
striking plumbers yet.

 After escaping Humpford's Mansion, Willie is on his new Jet-Ski on the
Dumpling River. He should head back to West Frumpton, then use the Look icon
to examine his new toy. He'll see the new AM/FM radio/cassette player, and
this is the key to getting past Ray at the Golden Bowl Tavern. Click on it and
put it in Willy's inventory. If he hasn't done so already,he should go to the
T-shirt booth in Olde Towne and examine the Lottery machine next to it to get
the Frumpton Bucks Lottery ticket that he finds in the slot.
 
 Next, Willy should go to the Plumber's Union 409 where he'll need to use
the phone that was out of order on Sunday. While here he should also get the
security pass out of Louis Stoole's office if he hasn't already(refer back to
the first part of the TOOTSWEET FROG JUMP CONTEST). Inside the booth, he can
take the radio out of his backpack and set it on the phone.After he takes the
telephone receiver and sets it on the radio,he should press the record button
then dial 432-SIGN (432-7446) to record Alyssa's Astrological Hotline.
 
 If the player looked at Ray on Sunday when he went to West Frumpton, the
description noted the bouncer's obsession with astrology. Willy hits the
record button again to stop the tape, then calls the Golden Bowl (342-3403). 
Burt will answer, but Willy will convince him to bring Ray to the phone. Now
Willy hits the playback button, and the big guy is hooked. Before the tape
runs out, Willy should go to the bar and enter.

 Ray should still be on the phone, having a conversation with a taped
astrologer (go figure!), while the rest of the plumbers in the bar eagerly
await the winning numbers to be drawn for the 40 million dollar Frumpton Bucks
lottery. Burt forgot to buy a ticket, and is in a rather bad mood. If Willy
wants to stay here, he should give the ticket he found in Olde Towne to the
bartender to get on his good side.

 Burt gives him a complimentary free non-alcoholic drink in gratitude, and
allows Willy to stay for the big televised drawing. As could only happen in
a fictional game, Burt wins the jackpot and Willy is temporarily forgotten in
the ensuing mayhem. Ghost Beamish makes another appearance, urging Willy to
DO something! He should grab the Plumber's nudie pin-up calendar from the bar
before the dust settles and the police show.
 
 Now, this is the ticket to get past the striking plumbers at the gates to
the Sludgeworks. Willy should approach them and give them the calendar, and
they will quickly be too bust ogling Miss October to notice him. Next, Willy
should try to enter the Sludgeworks, and he will be stopped by the security
guard at the gate. Using the security pass will allow him to pass, but the
guard will call Ms.Humpford to tell her of the intrusion. She immediately has
him sound the alarm, and sends her goon Stanley to the site to capture Willy.

 The player should now save the game, as the upcoming endgame contains a
series of action sequences that can be very difficult. Willy should look at
the plan he found in the suit of armor from HumpfordMansion and note the four
colors written at the side. They should read - Burnt Sienna, Mauve,
Chartreuse, Mauve. In simpler English this is Brown, Violet, Green, Violet.
 
 As soon as Willy enters the first room, he should go _immediately_ to the
control panel in the center while the security guards tell their joke. Open
the cover to reveal the power switch and turn it on. Then the player should
click the colored buttons to the right - Bottom, Top, Middle, Top. If the
sequence was entered properly, the light above the control lever should turn
green. The security guards should be on the extended bridge, almost to the
platform where Willy is. He should have barely enough time to push the lever
to the right, which retracts the bridge and dumps the guards into the sludge.
 
 There's no time to admire the results, Willy should head across the bridge
to the exit on the right side of the screen. As he reaches the exit, Stanley
enters from the opposite side, and Willy will enter another action sequence. 
This time it's a disposal unit of some sort, and Willy should head for the
control panel at the left side of the screen.

 A keyboard and a switch should appear, and the player should turn the
switch on. No time to look at the plans now, but five codes may be entered on
the keyboard:

 FART - Obvious, isn't it?
 FARM - This will send Willy through the plant to be turned into a 50 lb.
        sack of Tootsweet, ending the game.
 AIR -  This should be used if the security guards get too close. It will
        blow them down a tube, but they'll return pretty quickly!
 RAFT - This code sends Willy down a chute that exits into the river 
        outside the plant, then he must reenter the Sludgeworks and start
        all over again.
 TRAM - This is what the player should key in (remember the "Enter")

 Entering TRAM sends Willy down a tube which deposits him on a conveyor
belt. He runs in place, staying in position, until Stanley appears once again. 
The goon throws his hat at Willy,who must avoid it by clicking on a spot near
the middle of the belt (an arrow will appear at the right spot). The hat lands
at the end of the belt, after rupturing a steam pipe above. Willy retrieves
the hat,changes the cursor to cross-hairs then flings it back at his pursuer.

 Stanley is knocked out cold, and travels down the conveyor belt where the
player sees him recycled into a 300 lb. sack of Tootsweet. Now a plunger will
rise to Willy's right,which he should jump onto, and from there he jumps into
the Sludgeworks Tub Tray Tram.
 
 If the player has survived these sequences, the Tram should take him to
Grand Junction, and now he should save the game again. The control in front
of Willy will determine which way the Tram turns at each junction, and once
again he should consult the plans. The proper way to navigate the tunnels in
order to reach the giant toilet is: Straight to Conjunction Junction,right to
Compunction Junction, left to Malfunction Junction, straight to Petticoat
Junction, then left to the final showdown. Wrong turns can take Willy to some
funny places, the player may want to try it and see.
 
 The Tram comes to a stop by the sludge vat (shaped amazingly like a
gigantic toilet) where Willy sees his Dad suspended over the bowl on a long
rope. Leona and Louis stand nearby, watching as Gordon is slowly lowered into
the sludge. If Willy fails to stop the two, Dad will be sludged as well as
Frumpton,although the player may want to let this part play out just to watch
the touching father and son farewell scene at the end.

 Grandpa Beamish appears again to inform Willy of the obvious - his Dad
will be history if he doesn't act quickly!This is where the Dunkin' Promaster
Elite Model 42 yo-yo is finally used.As soon as the dialogue finishes and the
player regains control of the cursor, click on the yo-yo in Willy's inventory,
use it on him, then switch to the cross-hair cursor. Leona and Louis will
begin walking around the rim of the vat towards Willy,pausing to laugh at the
boy for a few seconds. Target the cursor on them now, and let the yo-yo fly!
 
 The duo are knocked into the vat of sludge, and now Willy must jump over
to the handle to flush them out.The player sees a final appeal from Leona for
someone to save her, then the vat empties. The remainder of the game consists
of a non interactive sequence, as the Dumpling River clears and everyone gives
Willy well-deserved congratulations. He continues on to win the Nintari
Championship, and the game closes with a scene of Horny, Gigi and their new
family of little frogs. I suppose someone will continue to keep Frumpton slim
and trim by turning sludge into Tootsweet, but that's another story.

@endnode

@node ba "Ballyhoo"
@next bo
@prev ad


                                 Ballyhoo
                        

Hurry, hurry, hurry! Step right this way, ladies and gentlemen, to see the
wonders of the ages. Witness death-defying feats of derring-do and digital
dexterity! Behold the fascinating freaks of fiendish fortune, fettered with
fantasies far from the furthest feelings of the fortunate few! Experience
elephants, learn from the lions and make a monkey out of yourself!All this
for one thin dime, one tenth of a dollar! Hurry, hurry, hurry! (Get away from 
here kid, you bother me!) Infocom's latest mystery game is far from what you 
might expect if you've played WITNESS, SUSPECT or DEADLINE. In fact, it has 
more in common with the adventure series, where you have to find the right 
items and do the right things with them in order to solve the game. So let's 
begin. As always, mapping is a key to playing through successfully. All the 
action takes place on the grounds of THE CIRCUS THAT TIME FORGOT, INC. At the 
start of the game, there are only a limited number of places you can visit, 
so your first job is to find out how to get to those other places that are 
currently blocked to you. You begin In the Wings. The Big Top lies to the 
north, and the rest of the circus grounds south. So head south. You are in 
the Connection, a kind of crossroads.You will see a midget. If you have read 
the Official Souvenir Program, you will recognize him as Comrade Thumb, a 
Russian emigre clown. A word of advice: You will find few people here on your 
side, so make friends where you can."Lift the midget" to help the poor guy 
get a drink, then note where the fountain is for later. There is a temporari-
ly impassable turnstile to the east, so go south again. You are now Near the 
White Wagon, the business office. The door is locked and you have no key, so 
leave this for later.But do take the pole that is sticking out from under the 
wagon. Read the banner to the south. "Egress" is not a wild beast, but stay 
away from it anyway if you don't want the game to end.Instead, head west. You 
will be by a second turnstile. Two clowns will get through, but you can't yet
. Be sure to watch and listen to everything they do and say.If you look into 
the cage by the turnstile, you will see the blind guard, Harry. Harry is a 
veritable encyclopedia of information, and about the only friend you can talk 
to. Be sure to applaud when Comrade Thumb finishes his act, wait for him to 
pass through, then head west again. You are now in the Prop Tent. Leave 
everything you see, and hide behind the cardboard cutout of William Howard 
Taft, then listen to the whole conversation. The owner's daughter, Chelsea, 
has been kidnapped! By the sound of him,this detective that Mr. Munrab (spell 
it backwards) has hired is no Sam Spade. There's only one person who can find 
Chelsea, and that's you! After they leave, head east into the Back Yard, then 
north to Beside the Big Top. Pick up the mask, and then go east back to the 
connection.Head north again into the wings. A portion of the bleachers has 
been pulled away.Head northeast, search the garbage and take the ticket you 
find there. Then head southwest and north. You are now in the Performance 
Ring, ready to perform your first death-defying act.The roustabout with the 
headphones you saw leave as you entered the Big Top (remember him!) has re-
moved the safety net. So drop everything but the fiberglass pole, and climb 
the rope ladder.Keep going east until you reach the other platform. Now that 
was easy, wasn't it? Take the balloon, and go west until you get back to the 
first platform.Try to go down. You'll drop the pole, but never mind.Then down 
again and pick up everything, then go south twice back to the Connection.
Punch either the red or blue dot on your ticket,then "insert ticket in slot." 
You'll get your ticket back and you can go east through the turnstile into 
the Midway. You must repeat this every time you use this turnstile. Examine 
the pitchman and the detective (and the monkey).Then go south into the Mena-
gerie, and southeast into the Menagerie Nook. To the north is a cage. Look 
inside it.Use the pole to get the key ring, then unlock the cage, open the 
door and go north into the cage. Take the headphones and the bucket, go south
, northwest, north, and west back through the turnstile.Make your way back to 
the Prop Tent. I found it a good place to leave everything until you need it. 
Drop everything but the balloon. Go east. Now "open the balloon"; then "in-
hale helium" and say "Harry, hello." Your high-pitched voice will make him 
think you are Comrade Thumb, and he will buzz you through. Go south. You are 
now in the Camp (East), west of Gottfried von Katzenjammer's trailer. Head 
west to Camp (West), with Clown Alley to the South. Leave both of those until 
later. Instead, it's time you learned the fine art of "sidewalling." "Side-
wall" or "crawl under" the canvas, and you'll find yourself back in the Prop 
Tent. Aha! What is this? A piece of wood? Examine it.Seems harmless enough, 
so pick it up. When prompted, try entering an obscenity; if shy, just say
"ow."Drop the mousetrap, take the piece of meat out of the bucket, and then
drop the meat. Timing is crucial here. Go east out of the Prop Tent, then 
west back in.You'll hear scurrying. Go out and back in again. You will see a 
mouse. "Catch mouse with bucket." Now take the ticket and the bucket and head 
back to the Menagerie.The real fun is about to begin! Okay, you're back at 
the Menagerie, armed with your ticket and a bucket with a mouse in it. Try 
going east. You have just met Hannibal, the elephant. Take the mouse, then 
show the mouse to the elephant twice. Hannibal will blow the mouse out of 
your hand. Wait.The petrified pachyderm will break loose from his chains in 
fright and plow through the fence to the southwest. Go through the elephant-
sized hole to the southwest. You have returned to the White Wagon, only this 
time you notice a ladder attached to the rear. Climb up the ladder until you 
are On the Wagon. Turn the crank, then look in the wagon. Mr. Munrab is hard 
at work. The poor man is so tense, you shouldn't bother him. But you have to 
get in there, so you must get him to leave first. From your perch, knock on 
the door. He will open the door and, quite perplexed at finding no one there, 
he will leave. Time is of the essence now. Go "in" and lock the door. Ignore 
the books and the sheepskin; just examine the desk and take the spreadsheet 
you find there.Now, move the desk and "up". You will be back on top of the
wagon and Mr. Munrab, none the wiser, will close the panel. Go down to the
ground, making sure you pick up anything you might have dropped, and back
northeast to the Menagerie. Now, go north, east, and east again till you 
reach the Far End of the Midway. Go north, then northeast or southeast around 
Tina, and take the stool. Ignore Tina for the moment; she will certainly ig-
nore you. Make your way back to the Midway and return to the Prop Tent,either 
through the turnstile or by way of the elephant-sized hole southwest of the 
Menagerie. Once you have side-walled a tent, you only have to type a direc-
tion to go under it again, so go south from the tent and east to Katzenjammer
's trailer with the skeleton key in hand. Examine the trailer. Unlock and 
open the compartment, then take the bullwhip. Go north through the turnstile 
and then ask Harry about the lions. He will tell you that only Elsie responds
to the whip. Return to the Prop Tent and make sure you have all of the fol-
lowing:  the key, the stool, the whip, and the meat. Now go east twice and 
north three times into the Performance Ring. Unlock the cage with the key, 
open the door, and go west into the Lions' Den. The male shaggy lion is Nim-
rod;the smooth-bodied female is Elsie. Keep cracking the whip at the smooth 
lion until she lies down and yawns, then open the grate. The stool will keep 
the shaggy lion at bay. Throw the meat into the passage, then go east. Go 
back into the cage and close the grate. Move the lion stand and you will find 
a cigarette case. Return to the Prop Tent. Carrying your ticket and the ci-
garette case, go east. Ask Harry about Andrew and Jenny, then be sure to give 
him the cigarette case. He will feel it and tell you it belongs to Andrew. Go
north, east, insert your ticket, and east again through the turnstile, then
east once more.Now go south. You are in Jennifer's Boudoir. Show the case to 
Andrew. Show the case to Jenny. Observe the fracas that follows with amaze-
ment and listen to what is said about the meeting later that night in Katz's 
trailer. Now go up the stairs into the Wardrobe Closet. Take the dress/suit 
combination and search it. Take the veil you find.Take the shawl/jacket com-
bo and go up and out of the closet and north. Make your way back to the Prop 
Tent and relax a minute. For the next series you will just need your ticket.
It's time to visit Rimshaw the Incomparable. Return to Midway of the Midway 
and north into the Hypnotist's arlor. You must give him your ticket, which he 
will return. You can say "Rimshaw, read my palm" and "Rimshaw, read my head" 
for fun; but you're on serious business here. Say "Rimshaw, hypnotize me," 
and he will. In your dreamlike state you will return to your seat high up in 
the bleachers, with a terrible hunger. Stand up. Now go east, up, east, down,
east, up, east, and down. On the way, ignore the hawker. He will relieve you 
of $1.85 without your lifting a finger. As soon as you find yourself back In 
the Wings, a monkey will land on your back. Go south to the Connection, then 
get in line at the concession stand. Wait till the second line starts. You 
will have to type "get out of line" twice, then "get in short line." Wait un-
til Jerry's friends all arrive, then get out of the line. When asked if you 
really want to surrender your place in the long line, say "Yes." Get in the 
short line, get out of the short line then get in the *long* line. Reverse 
psychology pays. Now you have a chocolate-covered banana. Bite it. Hmmm, 
someone else is hungry, too. Drop your hard-won prize and go north Into the 
Wings. Say hello to the hawker you see taking a break there. Then go up. 
Some stranger will hurl a granola bar at you and you'll wake from your trance
.Stand up and go south, then west. Now side-wall the tent, and you're Under 
the Bleachers.Search the garbage and you'll find the granola bar. Take it and 
go south. Who do you know that might appreciate a granola bar? Yes, go east 
and east again, then north. Examine Tina. She is holding a radio. Go north-
east or southeast around her, then give her the granola bar.That got her at-
tention! Say "Tina, hello." Take the hand she offers you, then kiss it. Go 
northwest or southwest, and you will find the radio. Take it and go south. 
Return once again to the Prop Tent. You are once again in the Prop Tent, and 
it's time you got on with the actual business of solving the crime. You have 
already obtained a clue: the spreadsheet. Examine it. It describes the stea-
dily deteriorating financial condition of one Eddie Smalldone. Unfortunately, 
this is not much to go on. Examine the headphones. Rewind the tape and then 
play it until you hear the subliminal voice. So Rimshaw is in on this! Rewind 
the tape again. For the next series, you will need your ticket, the key, the 
radio, and the headphones. But first, pay a visit to Harry. Go east and ask 
Harry about Eddie Smalldone, then ask him about the circus and the gorilla. 
To tame the gorilla, you will need soothing music, and all you have is Jimi 
Hendrix and a static-producing radio. Consult your souvenir program again, 
then turn the radio to WPDL, 1170 on your AM dial. Not much of an improvement
, I'm afraid. You will have to improve your reception noticeably. Make your 
way to the Menagerie Nook. Drop your ticket and the key, then climb the cage. 
The static will miraculously disappear."Record music" and wait until the tape 
stops, just to be sure. Rewind once again to the beginning, then go down. 
Oops. You seem to have died. Naw! Try typing "restore," then "wait." Take the 
key and ticket, then go northwest. Unlock the cage with the key, open the 
door and go west. Behold Mahler the Gorilla! (Just for fun, you might try 
this wearing the gorilla suit!) Search the straw. A trap door! Now play the 
tape.  Mahler will leave you alone so you can open the trap door and take the 
ribbon that is in there. Go east and close the door behind you. Make your way 
back to the Prop Tent. Drop off everything. Take the mask, then go south. 
Wear the mask and knock on the door of the trailer. When Chuckles lets you in
, go south. Examine the ash tray, move the ash and take the scrap of news-
paper revealed. Chuckles by then will see through your disguise, but his 
careless tongue will have revealed "the grift" (i.e., illegal gambling), and 
that to reach it you must shove "Annie Oakley" (i.e., your ticket) under the 
front by the elephant tent. (See the souvenir program for translation of cir-
cus lingo.) Go back north into the Prop Tent, and make sure you have the 
bucket and your ticket. Then make your way to the Menagerie Nook. Slide your 
ticket under the front, then go east through the secret panel. Take your 
ticket again. Now it's time to play a little blackjack.There is a $2.00 house 
limit, and it doesn't really matter if you win or lose. Play a couple of 
hands, then type "open panel." Instead of obeying your command, the game will 
suggest you play another hand. This time, however, something has changed. You 
will feel someone tapping on your foot. If you pay attention, the number of 
taps indicates the value of the dealer's hole card. Try to look under the 
green tablecloth. The game's odds have swung about to your favor, so play as 
long as you like until Billy Monday 86's you from the Blue Room. Go northwest
, then north. You will see the body of the detective. Is he dead? He sure is: 
Dead drunk, that is. You will have to revive him. Go west through the turn-
stile.About this time,you will run into Comrade Thumb again. By sign language
, he will advise you to return to the Blue Room. First, you must deal with 
the detective. Pour water on him. This will revive him, and bring on sudden 
feelings of shame and remorse. You must exploit those feelings while you have 
his attention. Say "Detective, give me the ransom note."He will produce the 
note and a trade card for Dr. Nostrum's.(You have one in your BALLYHOO 
package; it has a picture of a cute blonde girl with a red ribbon in her hair
.) Return to the Menagerie Nook, and drop the bucket. You won't need it again
. Once again, slide your ticket under the front, and go east into the Blue
Room. Look under the tablecloth, and take the suitcase.Open the panel and...
too late! The suitcase is ripped out of your grasp and the culprit dashes 
west through the open panel. You must stay hot on his heels! Go west, then up 
and up again. Which way did he go? Which way did he go? Never mind.You've got 
more important things to worry about, like the elephant prod that comes bur-
sting through the tent near you!The tip is deadly, but only the tip.So go in 
any direction until the second time the prod is pushed through the tent. Grab 
the shaft, then pull it or push it. You are now out of danger.  Go down and 
down again. The cowards have vanished. But you have gathered all the clues 
you need.It is time to take stock of your position, so return to the Prop 
Tent again. You are almost done. Take the trade card, ransom note, ribbon, 
spreadsheet, and scrap of newspaper. Examine the scrap. Read the ransom note. 
Compare the scrap to the ransom note. Aha! Examine the ribbon. It appears to 
match the one worn by the girl on the trade card.

 Let us now marshall our facts:

 1) The circus is not doing well financially.
 2) Eddie "Chuckles" Smalldone is involved because the scrap you found in
   his trailer matches the scraps used to make the ransom note.
 3) Rimshaw the Incomparable is involved, because of the hypnotic voice of
   the headphones.  His unwilling accomplice is the roustabout you saw
   wearing the headphones early in the game.
 4) Andrew is involved, because Jenny told you so.But you are not likely to
   see either of them again.
 5) Billy Monday is involved, because you assume that Chelsea was in the
   suitcase he took from you.
 6) Gottfried von Katzenjammer is involved, because you know a meeting is
   set for his trailer this evening.

Take the five clues, go south, and east.You will find Chuckles "polishing"
the lion tamer's trailer. Say "Eddie, hello."Then show him the clues in this 
order: the spreadsheet, the note, the scrap, the ribbon, and the trade card.  
Guilt-stricken or scared out of his floppy shoes, he will beat a hasty re-
treat. Now, how to get into the trailer? Once again, you must disguise your-
self. Return to the Prop Tent, then get and wear the following items: the
dress-suit  combination,  the shawl-jacket combo and the veil.  Drop every-
thing else. Go south and east, then knock on the door. Katzenjammer, mista-
king you for Andrew/Jenny, will leave you alone by the trailer. Time's a-
wasting! You don't know when he'll return, so go east into the trailer. Close 
the door. You will find a crowbar. Take it. Now move the moosehead. It will 
reveal a one foot square crawl space which is too small for you to enter. Now 
who could fit in there? Hmmmm. (Light bulb!) Open the door and go west twice. 
Examine the door. It is slightly warped (but aren't we all!).Open the door 
with the crowbar, then go south into Clown Alley. Fortunately, Comrade Thumb 
is there. Lift him and carry him back to Katzenjammer's trailer. Put him in 
the crawl space and wait. He will hand Chelsea out to you! Now to reunite the 
poor girl with her distraught father. Go west and north, receiving Harry's 
congratulations, then east to the White Wagon.A happy ending seems to be 
within your grasp. Unfortunately, Mr. Munrab misunderstands your sudden ap-
pearance with his daughter and goes screaming northeast for the detective. 
Follow him. A tense moment ensues, but before you can explain, you are blind-
sided by a berserk simian. Go north, west, north, and north again after Mun-
rab and the ape. This is the scene that confronts you in the Performance Ring
. Munrab and the roustabout stand aghast looking at Mahler holding the help-
less Chelsea high up on the tightrope platform. What is worse, you can no 
longer reach the rope ladder. Is all your work for naught? Stay calm. This is 
no time for panic. You need unquestioned obedience immediately. Clap your 
hands! This will trigger Rimshaw's post-hypnotic suggestion and make the 
roustabout your willing slave. Tell him to get the safety net. This is an op-
portune time to get out of all of Andrew/Jenny's clothes you are wearing. Go 
west to the Lions' Den and take the lion stand, then go east and drop it. You 
will now be able to climb the stand and reach the rope ladder. But experience 
has told you what you need to (a) cross the tightrope and (b) calm the goril-
la. One last time, return to the Prop Tent and get the fiberglass pole and 
the transistor radio. Return to the Performance Ring. Climb the stand, then 
the rope ladder, with just the pole. This will drive Mahler into the guy 
wires above the platform. Try to climb the wires. You can't but this will 
drive Mahler to the far platform. Drop the pole and go back down for the ra-
dio. Go up again. Confident in your proven tightrope walking ability, and re-
assured by the soothing strains of classical music, head east slowly across 
the tightrope. Easy. Easy. Step by step, inch by inch. Almost there.... Sud-
denly, the music is interrupted by a pledge break. AAAARRRRGGGGHHHH!!!! You 
must go back west to the first platform. Drop the pole and radio, and go down
. Where is a phone? Go south three times and east into the White Wagon. Take 
the phone and call WPDL, then return to the Performance Ring and climb back 
up to the platform. Pole and radio once again in hand, you gamely venture 
east one more time. This time you make it all the way! The assembled throng 
cheers. This unnerves Mahler once again, and you suddenly find yourself 
hanging from the tightrope high above the oblivious crowd who have rescued 
Chelsea below. You feel your hand beginning to slip. All seems lost, but at 
least you have accomplished what you set out to do; you have not only saved 
Chelsea from her kidnappers, but you have shown that you have what it takes 
to make it in the sawdust and tinsel world of the circus. Such a pity you won
't live to enjoy it. Your weary hands lose their grip and you plummet earth-
ward! Fortunately, the grateful circus folk notice your predicament, and in 
the nick of time save you from a terrible fate. As you plunge into oblivion, 
your last thought is of the circus, and you know that someday you'll have one 
helluva story to tell your grandchildren. They'll never believe a word of it.

@endnode

@node bo "Borrowed Time"
@next bu
@prev ba

 
                               Borrowed Time


THE THUG. I wasn't able to do anything about him. It seemed that he appeared 
when I had taken too many moves between finding evidence or obtaining infor-
mation.  I usually received a warning about three moves before he started 
blasting. GAME BEGINNING. You are in your office. Answer phone. Read your 
case files (all 7 of them). Go east to the little office and read the note. 
Take the east exit to the alley. This is where the action starts! Go east to 
the Dixie Arms Hotel. Hide behind the chair. Crawl north. Lock the door. Go 
up to the attic. Break the window. Take the shard of glass. Go east to the 
ledge. Climb the cable. When you get to the second-story window of the Dublin 
Rose Bar, cut the cable with the shard of glass. Go down to the bar. LEBOCK'S 
HOUSE. If you are having trouble finding or entering Lebock's house, go to 
the bar. Talk to the thug. Show gun to the thug. This will loosen his lip but 
not enough. Show gun again. He will tell you the location of the house and 
the password. The big bruiser, Rocco, guards the door. Say "TINPLAYER" then 
enter. Lock the door. Search fireplace. Take scrap of paper. Go east through 
the curtain. Take the candlestick and wait. Hit Rocco with the candlestick. 
Go east and exit back door. RITA'S APARTMENT. You'll get hit over the head 
and tied by your wrists to the ceiling beams. There is a table nearby. Look 
at table. Get the matches and the candle. Light match then light candle. Burn 
twine. (Amazing what you can do with your feet!) Search the kitchen. Take 
Receipt. If you search enough, you'll find a key but getting it now will 
cause you problems. Oh, well, go ahead move the stove and get the key. Now 
your hands are burned and you can only carry a few things. It would be best 
to visit the doctor now. DOCTOR'S OFFICE. Tell the nurse you are a patient. 
You'll see Mongo through a doorway. He is receiving medical treatment. Don't 
call attention to yourself; listen. Search desk. Take the bandages. If you 
have already burned your hands, *APPLY* bandages to your hands. Ah, that's
better! SHACK. In case you haven't found the shack, it's at the west end of 
First Street (just west of the hot dog vendor). Break the door. Untie Mavis. 
Take the tube and the novel. Read the novel and take the bookmark -- it's a 
claim stub! DORIS POLK'S APARTMENT. (Intersection of Pershing and Polk) Talk 
to Doris. Ask her about Mongo, Lebock, Farnham, etc. Show stub to Doris. This 
might be a good time to visit the car park. STILES' SAFE PARK. If Jake is 
there alone, leave and return later. If two men are there fighting, help Jake
. Get gloves and cans. Show evidence to police. You should have: (1) cans, 
(2) gloves, (3) stub, (4) tube, and (5) receipt. Mongo will tell you about 
the key and the P.O. Box. TRASH  PILE (First Time). Search trash. Get bone.
Remember, this might be a good place to hide. VISIT FARNHAM. (85 West Polk) 
A tough looking guy guards the door. Talk to man. Enter building. Talk to 
Farnham. Notice the dogs and what Farnham says to them. HOUSE WITH FENCE AND 
DOGS. Say HIYO to the dogs. Enter house. Talk to Shuman. Untie Rita and Wain-
wright. Talk to Rita. Talk to Wainwright. Get report. Police will take Shuman 
away. BRUCE LIGHT'S HOUSE. (Sixth West of Main, blue brownstone) Knock on 
door. Enter. Look at bottles. Wait for Light to appear. Ask Light about Mongo
, Farnham, etc. If he's reluctant to talk, show gun. Go upstairs (big deal, 
huh?) Search. When Light is able to talk, question him again. P.O. BOX. (Post 
Office) Unlock box 999. Get poem. Read it. There's a number written on the 
back. Head for the Park. PARK. (6th and South Main) Go south of the statue to 
Tool Shed. Set lock to 6316. Get shovel. Dig at statue. Get suitcase. Go 
north. Thugs are chasing you from south, north and east. Go west. Hide in 
Trash Pile. TRASH PILE (Second Time). You are hiding from the thugs. Give 
bone to dog. Wait. When dog starts to bark again, go east. You should now 
have enough evidence against Farnham to go to the police. END GAME. Take evi-
dence to Police Station. Tell police to arrest Farnham. You should have the 
following evidence: (1) Report (from Wainwright), (2) Scrap of paper (from
Lebock), (3) Suitcase (from Park), and (4) Folder (from the suitcase).

@endnode

@node bu "Bureaucrazy"
@next cu
@prev bo


                                Bureacrazy


The doorbell rings. Chowmail Overnite is delivering a large bag of Llamex(R) 
brand High-Fibre Llama Treats. You didn't order it, the address is wrong; 
but, you'll never be able to explain anything to the delivery man, so just 
give him your Beezer card. You are now the proud owner of a bag of llama 
treats! There's nothing else to do in the house for now, so explore your new 
neighborhood starting with your mailbox. The mail found in each location 
seems to be random. For example, in one game you might find a leaflet in the 
mailbox and in another game find a flyer in the mailbox. That isn't important
. The postage is important so try to remember what type of postage was used 
and the order in which you find it. The mail you find in your mailbox has a 
postage stamp on it. Go to the bookstore. You'll notice it's actually a soft-
ware store. Talk to the clerk. Ask him about software. He'll offer you a 
*special* cart which he keeps under the counter. SHOW the game cartridge to 
the clerk. He'll take it and give you a Recipe Cart. I found that I got a 
point for this, but did not get a point if I said TRADE cartridges. Go to the 
Travel Agency. Give the letter to the Agent and get your round-trip ticket to 
Paris. Go to the bank and try to file a Change-of-Address form. Lots of luck! 
The bank has already sent you a Change-of-Address form and one is all you are 
allowed. Too bad it was sent to your old address. Go to the old tenement 
building. There are stairs leading up and a door in the south wall. Nothing 
can be done about the blank wall at the top of the stairs, so forget it.
Knock on the south door. A voice will answer and the door will open. Enter 
the flat which is occupied by a mousy little man. Seems he collects stamps. 
You will see some mail in the floor but the man won't let you pick it up. 
Show the stamped envelope to the man. He'll grab it and run out of the flat. 
Pick up the mail. Notice the Postal Service sticker. By this time you will 
probably be getting hungry, so go to the Restaurant. The waitress will take 
your order then return to tell you that your order was lost due to a computer 
crash. Of course, it's her break time, so someone else will take your order. 
You must go through the long ordering process all over again. Wait for your 
order and eat whatever you get. You have no money to pay the bill, so sneak 
out the back door of the restaurant into the alley. From the alley you can 
squeeze through a gap in the fence to arrive at Behind Mansion. Enter the 
back door of the mansion. Here you'll find a macaw sitting on a perch. You 
can see some mail under the perch but the macaw will not allow you to take it
. Go into the Trophy Room. It's a good idea to save the game first because 
the old woman shoots. Make a fast exit. Go to the front door of the mansion 
and ring the bell, then beat feet to the back door. Return to the Trophy Room
, grab the painting of Ronald W. Reagan and exit. Show the painting to the 
macaw then take the mail from under the perch. Notice the Postal Service 
sticker. Go to the llama farm. Open the bag of llama treats. Push the bag 
through the mailbox so that it falls into the trough. While the llama is ea-
ting the treats, take the mail from the trough. Notice the Postal Service 
sticker. Try to enter the farmhouse. The door won't budge. You must go away 
and return later. Go south to the gate. There's an intercom at the gate. It 
will crackle to life and a voice will say, "Unfortunately, there's a radio
connected to my brain." Could this be a password? Go back to the farmhouse. 
A heavily armed man resembling Woody Allen will appear in the doorway. He is 
rather dazed -- not sure where he is or who you are. Say: "Unfortunately,
there's a radio connected to my brain." He will respond with: "Actually, it's 
the BBC controlling us from London." You can try more conversation or merely 
wait for him to leave. Return to the gate. Again, the voice over the intercom 
will say, "Unfortunately, there's a radio connected to my brain." You must 
say, "Actually, it's the BBC controlling us from London." The gate will open. 
Enter the Foyer. You'll meet the paranoid owner of the house and discover the 
armed man is here also. The paranoid householder suspects you are an imposter 
so he will ask you a series of questions. To answer correctly, you must refer 
to the "Popular Paranoia" magazine which is included in your game package. 
One wrong answer and you're dead. Answer them all correctly and you'll find 
yourself in a goal cell in the basement of the paranoid's house. Examine the 
gaol door. Try cutting the molybdenum bars with the hacksaw. The armed man 
will give you the Swiss army knife. Examination of the knife will reveal a 
button marked POWER SAW and a lever marked GENERATOR. Push the button then 
pull the lever. Examine both the saw and the generator. Take the power saw 
and plug it into the generator. Get on the gnerator (it resembles a bicycle) 
and start pedaling. Oops! You can't reach the bars while sitting on the gene-
rator, so give the power saw to the armed man. He'll cut the door open for 
you. It's best to stall around in the Basement allowing the armed man to go 
up the stairs before you. The paranoid man and the armed man will depart. You
'll see some mail in the foyer. Don't be surprised if you can't pick up the 
money order which you want so badly. Take the envelope. The envelope contains 
a memo and a cheque. The check is drawn on the Fillmore Fiduciary Trust in 
the amount of -$75.00. Yes, that's a minus sign. Go to the bank. Get a with-
drawal slip. Fill it out then take it to the Deposit window. Give the cheque 
and the withdrawal slip to the teller. You are depositing -$75.00 using a 
withdrawal slip which is the negative of a deposit slip, negative -$75 is
$75. Makes perfect sense. Then go back to the withdrawal window. Fill out 
another withdrawal slip and withdraw $75.00. Now that you have money, you 
might want to return to the restaurant to pay your bill. You are ready to go 
to the Airport. Call Getlost Airport Cab (number listed in your Address Book)
. Wait for the taxi. Oh, the Airport is a fun place! Since you have an Omnia
Gallia ticket, you should go directly to the Omnia Gallia desk. Alas, Omnia 
Gallia has been sold. For further information you must go to the Air Galagasa 
desk. How do you find it? Well, the way that worked for me was going back to 
the airport entrance, then going through Lost and Found. Air Zalagasa seems 
to be north of the Lost and Found. It doesn't matter how early or late you 
arrive at the Air Zalagasa desk. A fat man will always be in line ahead of 
you and he'll cause you to miss the plane. Not to worry. When your turn fi-
nally comes, give the Omnia Gallia ticket to the clerk in exchange for an Air 
Zalagasa ticket. Once you have the Air Zalagasa ticket in your hot little
hand, go south one move and climb the pillar. Open the grate and climb up the 
duct. You'll eventually reach the Control Tower. A console radio will crackle
, "Air Zalagasa flight 42 requests permission to take off." Say: "Controller, 
permission denied." Go back to the top of the pillar and examine the speaker. 
Pull red wire then pull black wire. Connect red wire to black wire. You have 
short circuited all the speakers in the terminal. The applaluse of the crowd 
is deafening! Before you know what's happening, you'll find yourself on the 
plane in seat 3B. Shortly thereafter, the attendant will bring you a bowl of 
llama stew. Eat the stew and you die. Refuse to eat it and you die. How can 
you get rid of the stew? The only way I could get rid of it was to cause the 
seat ahead of me to recline, thus spilling the stew. By wearing the head-
phones, changing seats, and pushing buttons, you'll learn that the whole sys-
tem is mixed up. The light button reclines the seats but you'll have to ex-
periment to determine which light button controls which seat. Here's one way 
to do it: Before the attendant brings the stew, move to Seat 3C. Wait a few 
turns. The attendant will bring the stew. Leave it on your fold-out table and
move to Seat 8D. Push the light button which actually reclines the seat ahead 
of Seat 3C. That seat will recline, thus spilling the stew. After the stew is 
spilled, return to Seat 3C. You'll see a small piece of laminated card. Exa-
mine this and take note of the words "STINGLAI KA'ABI." There will be a tele-
phone call for you, so go to the phone. Most likely, it will be the waitress 
asking about the tip you left her. The line will be disconnected and you'll 
overhear another conversation. About this time the flight attendant will ask
you to return to your seat; however, she will linger, giving you a chance to 
talk to her. Say: Attendant, STINGLAI KA'ABI. You'll receive a parachute. Go 
to the rear of the plane, open hatch, and jump out. My Gawd! One strap of 
your parachute is caught in the plane's hatch. This can be deadly. Chances 
are you'll soon be falling without a parachute! Knock on the hatch. The at-
tendant will open it, freeing your parachute strap. Falling! Don't forget to 
pull the rip cord. Hanging from a tree! Yep, you landed in a tree. Get out of
the parachute. Splash! You are now in a cooking pot. Okay, the natives are 
hungry, so give them a good recipe. Boot up your Boysenberry and insert the 
Recipe Cart. The natives will give you an unlabelled cartridge and return 
your lost address book. Don't ask me how they got it. You are now in the 
Antechamber. Not clear how you got here. You'll see a closed locker door in 
the west wall and an exit to the east. Examine the locker door and read the
sign. The left handle is pointing up. The middle handle is pointing down. The 
right handle is pointing up. It's a key of sorts. A general knowledge of bi-
nary helps. Okay, here's a solution:

(1)Turn left handle and middle handle. You hear a click inside the door.
(2)Turn left handle and right handle. You hear a click inside the door.
(3)Turn left handle and middle handle. You hear a sharp click, as if some-
   thing inside the door had moved. Open door.

Enter the locker and take the magnetic key-card. Then go east. You're in the 
Switchgear Rooms; it's a maze! Time to use your Boysenberry computer, so in-
sert the unlabelled cartridge. Remember, earlier in this walkthru I advised 
you to notice the Postal Service stickers and the order in which you found 
them. Hope you paid attention, because you need that info now. I found the 
Postal stickers in this order: C, D, E and B. The computer program (unla-
belled cartridge) gives you a list of commands: CLEAR, NOOZ, PRINTB, PRINTC,
PRINTD, PRINTE. You must select the PRINT commands in the same order that you 
found the postal stickers. I used PRINTC, PRINTD, PRINTE, and PRINTB because 
that's the order in which I found the postal stickers. When you have done
this, you should have a complete message on the screen. Can't read it? Oh, I 
forget to tell you: read from top to bottom one letter at a time. Using these 
instructions you should be able to find your way through the maze to the Air-
lock. In the Airlock, put the key-card in the card reader slot. You'll hear a 
bolt snapping back. Open the door. It will take several tries. Enter the Per-
secution Complex! The Persecution Complex is a long hall running west. There
are TV screens on each side of the hall. Go west looking at the screens on 
either side as you go. At the end of the hall you'll find a modular plug. 
Plug in your computer. You'll be asked for ID and password. What? Okay, take 
a look at your Address Book. Notice anything different? Right! The first 
address has been changed. That's the clue you need. Type in RANDOM-Q-HACKER 
for ID and RAINBOW-TURTLE for password. Connection will be made. Use command 
DIR for a listing of programs, WHO for a listing of users, and TYP for some *
interesting* tidbits. You'll learn that two hackers have accessed the system. 
You are one; the nerd is the other. You'll also be be advised when the Nerd 
is about to access another file. The TYP command will enable you to learn of 
a certain file which should NOT be used with a friendly computer. Hmmm, what 
if you changed the name of that file? So, change the name of DVH2.HAK to 
whatever file the Nerd is preparing to access. Example: Nerd is about to ac-
cess FIDUC.HAK. Change name of DVH2.HAK to FICUC.HAK. It might be necessary 
to first change the name of FIDUC.HAK to something else, but you'll have 
plenty of time to do that. By doing this, you will cause the Nerd to access 
a file which will destroy his own mainframe. Revenge is sweet! Once you have
done this, an opening to the west will appear. It is *IMPORTANT* to run the 
PLANE.EXE program at some time before you reap your revenge. This will cause 
a plane to be sent to get you. Wait patiently at the Landing Strip. The plane 
you summoned while using the PLANE.EXE program will eventually arrive. You'll 
be taken on a nice plane trip and a predictable taxi ride, arriving at the 
Hallway of the Tenement. From there,go to your home. You'll find a new letter 
from Fiduciary apologizing for the problems you've had.Enclosed in the letter 
you'll find a ticket to Paris, your checkbook and a new Beezer card.

@endnode

@node cu "Curse of Enchantia"
@next cut
@prev bu


                            Curse of Enchantia

		  	          
                                - PART I - 
                                 			        
                                  
                                  DUNGEON

1) Okie Dokie,call `help' and the guard will  appear and  shouts at you. He 
   drops a key on the way out.  Pickup the key  and unlock the chains. Now,
   take  a closer  look at the back wall  where the water is  dripping out,
   pull the mortar  and you'll discover a paper clip. Now insert the  paper
   clip into the lock to pick the lock open.

                                 CORRIDOR

2) Pickup the goldfish bowl  off the  table and make  your way through  the
   corridor.Be careful,along the  corridor are statues  which  whack you on 
   the head with huge mallets! On the way try to collect the gems scattered
   on the floor and the coin on the  table. These  are only  collected  for
   extra points.Exit through the door at the end of the corridor.

                                  LAKEBED

3) Wear the goldfish bowl so you can breathe and then walk over to the fish
   stuck in the railings. Pull the  fish free. Walk along  for a bit  until
   you discover some mud on the ocean floor.Look at the mud and a worm will
   appear,pick it  up. Now, go to Mr. Fishs Shop and give  him the worm, in
   exchange he'll fill your goldfish bowl up with oxygen.
4) Now,keep on moving until you see the  electric eels, at this  point  the 
   fish you freed before will drop an oyster. Pickup the oyster and give it
   to the turtle,you will now carry you over the eels.
5) Once over the eels pickup the cattle prod and continue walking. When the
   sharks come towards you attack them with the cattle prod, keep on  doing
   this until you reach a  giant clam. Wait  until the  clam is closed  and
   jump over it. Insert the  cattle prod  into the  plughole and you'll get
   sucked down. 

                                 POOL ROOM

6) Walk over to the  botom right  of the screen  and look around  until you 
   find some seaweed. Go  up to  the wall  and push the protruding  rock to 
   reveal a secret entrance.

                              CAVE CORRIDORS

7) While your wandering  around the  corridors pickup  as many rocks as you
   can and give them to the rock  basher in the rock basher room.  Also,you
   need to find a gold coin,its by one of the  entrances..it glints so  you
   shouldnt have any trouble finding it.

                             ROCK BASHER ROOM

8)Give the rock basher all  18  rocks (three of each size) you wont be  able
  to collect them all at once so  you will have to go back. The rock  basher
  will then give you a piece of string.

                                SEESAW ROOM

9)Pick up the plank and attack it to the boulder. Now,you'll need to collect
  the monitor from another cave. Throw the monitor on  the plank to catapult
  yourself on the ledge,pickup the magnet and jump down.
10)Go back to the room  where you found the monitor and attach the string to
   the magnet. Then  throw the magnet down the hole  and you should now  get
   a roll of wire attached to it.
11)Go to the corridor where th mud monster is (its  outside the rock  basher
   room) and attach the wire to  the loops. When  the  mud  monster  charges
   past some mud will be left on the wire. Pickup the mud.

                                HOLEY ROOM

12)Alright,you will able to see a number of holes in the  walls of the cave.
   Look in the holes until you  discover a little monster  appear out of one
   of the other holes. Look in the  hole it comes out of and it should  then
   appear from another hole,look in that hole and so on until you  find some
   twigs.

                                 WELL ROOM

13)Throw the coin into the well and a gameshow  host appears,he'll offer you
   three prizes-money,a beutiful  woman or a helmet. Now I know  this is NOT
   my first choice or  my second for that matter but take helmet. Now, go to
   the corridor where the rocks are falling and wear the helmet.

                                BUCKET ROOM

14)Jump  in the bucket  and  attach to  mud to  the seaweed,then attach  the
   twigs to the mud and the  seaweed. Don't question me, just do it! Now all
   you have to do is wear the mask.

				   
                                - PART II -

                                  
                                  BRIDGE

1) A pirate will  try  to  rob  you  as you walk  toward the  bridge.  As he
   falls over pickup the sword and  attack  him  with it. Pickup the  bag of
   money.

                                THE VILLAGE

2) Go to the Mages Shop shop.Give the magician some money and he'll teleport
   you to a cliff edge.

                                   CLIFF

3) Walk along the cliffs edge and pickup the gloves in the first alcove  you
   come across. (just after the falling little monsters)
4) Walk  next to  the boulder  and push  it, then jump over the  boulder. Be
   careful, there is a  large  boulder  which falls on you  just after youve
   jumped across.
5) Next,you'll see four buttons on the wall. Push  the buttons in this order
   ,button 1,2 and 4-this will cause a bridge to appear.
			O	O	O	O 
	  		1	2	3	4 (button numbers)
6) Walk over the bridge and  pickup the rope. Walk next to the  blue guy and
   wear the gloves,you'll  automatically push him  off  allowing you  to get
   past.
7) This bit is a bit tricky, wait until  the rocks  stop falling and walk to
   the first alcove. Wait  until the rocks  stop falling again and then walk
   to the next alcove and pickup the chewing gum.
8) Now,walk on until you reach a gap. Wear the chewing  gum to catch a  rock
   which falls on your head. Throw rock and  then walk across the stone slab
   which youve knocked down.
9) When you come to the next huge gap throw the  rope and then  jump on rope
   to climb across. Once you reached the  other side look at the  carving on
   the wall and continue  walking until you reach the end of the cliff edge,
   shout `open sesame'. Walk into the cave and talk to the parrot.

                                  VILLAGE

10)Go and visit Sally See All and give her some money to tell  your fortune.
11)Go to Benn's Costume Shop and give  him some money-he'll give you a dress
   ,walk into the changing room and try on the dress. Walk through the  open
   door.

                             ARCTIC-ICE WORLD

The map below will help you find your way to the different objects ect.

				      START	
			 _______     ___|___     _______
                	|       |   |       |   |       |
   MAP OF ICE WORLD	| Cliff |---| Plank |---|       |
   =======-========	|_______|   |_______|   |_______|
			 ___|___     ___|___     ___|___
			|       |   |       |   |       |
			| Fish  |---|       |---| Igloo |
			|_______|   |_______|   |_______|
			 ___|___     ___|___     ___|___
 		        |       |   |       |   |       | 
			| Block |---| Spray |---|       |
			|_______|   |_______|   |_______|
			 ___|___     ___|___     ___|___		
		        |       |   |       |   |       |
			|	|---|Monster|---|Walrus |
			|_______|   |_______|   |_______|

1)Pickup the plank and go to the fish.Stand by the fish and throw the plank
  to catch it.Pickup the fish and go and pickup the spray.
2)Wear the spray and go to the igloo.Give the fish to the eskimo and pickup
  the fishing rod.
4)Go to  the  block of  ice and  click on the  defend icon  and then on the 
  fishing rod to make a fire and melt the ice. Pickup the food next to  the
  puddle of water (i thinks its food,it a grey blob??).
5)Go to the monster and pickup the snowballs next to him. Stand next to him
  and throw a snowball at him.Now,go to the walrus and have a chat with him.
6)Now,go to the cliff (top right) and the  walrus should  be  now be asleep 
  next to the cliff edge, allowing you to cross over to the far ledge. Walk
  over him and shout help.
7)Throw the food into the  the water, a monster  will appear and give you a
  ride to the ice palace.

                                ICE PALACE

1)O.k, next to the closed door are 4 icicles hanging on the wall-each one a
  a different size. 
                  	      1   2   3   4  
			      |   |   |   |
			      |	      |   |   Icicles
			      |	          |   -------
				          |
2)Pull the icicles in this order:- 2,3,1,4 and the door will now open.
3)Once inside the palace  pickup the  brush.Pickup the dice on the table and
  throw them. Each  time you throw the dice different doors will open in the
  corridor. The diagram below will help you complete this part of the  game. 
				 _===__
  MAP OF ICE PALACE		|     |
  -=------=------=-	       5|     |
				|     |6          Key
				|     |           ---
				|     |4          ***** = Pulley
			       3|     | 
				|*****|           ===== = Window
			       2|     |1
                             ___|     |___          X   = Dice
                            |             |   
			    |            X|
			    |_____________|

4)You'll need go open  up all  the 6 doors  in the  corridor to collect the
  objects you need:- 
		Room No.		Comment
		=======			=======
		  1			Pickup the magnifying glass.
		  2			Pickup the jack.
		  3			Use brush to reach the gun.
		  4			Use Brush to get the icicle.
	          5			Pickup the block of ice.
		  6			Pick the cone.

5)Once youve collect all the objects from the rooms go to the pulley.Insert
  the gun into the holster and the dish  will lower  on the right. Take the
  glass and the suntan oil out of the dish.
6)O.k throw the dice a final  time and  then go up to the window at the top
  of the corridor.Now, awhistle should appear just infront of the door.Pick
  it up and attach it to the cone. Click on the defend icon and then on the
  instrument to blow it and break the glass. Jump through the window.

                                LASER ROOM

7)There are four holes on the floor-place the icicle,glass,magnifying glass
  and the block of ice  in the same  positions as below to reflect the beam
  and destroy the laser i.e attach magnifying glass to hole number one.

		   2 O					Hole     Object
   LASER ROOM			   O 1     Key		====     ======
   ----==----			      |	   ---           1	 Mag. Glass
				      |     O = Hole     2       Block/Ice
				      |                  3       Icicle
		    3 O		   O 4	  --- = Door     4       Glass

8)Once the laser has blown up insert the jack into the door to open it.

                                 ICE QUEEN

9)Make your way to  the throne. The  queen will fire  bolts of ice at  you.
  When  she changes yellow in colour she's about to fire,all you have to do
  is jump up to avoid them.

                                   HAND

10)When the big meaty hand grabs  you just  wear the sun tan lotion to slip 
   through his fingers to escape!

                                   MAZE

11)Make your way through the maze,making sure to pickup  the box of matches
   on your way.

                                   TROLL

12)Okie dokie,this bit is a bit tricky and I advice you to use the joystick
   to control him. O.k move behind the pillar in the middle  of the room so
   the troll cant see you...the troll should now fall asleep. 						 
13)Walk over to the troll-be careful not to   stand on  any  loose tiles as
   they'll make a noise and wake up the troll. The route I found  to be the
   easiest is to go up around the pillar and straight across the room.
14)Attach the match to the troll's foot and then click  on the  defend icon
   and then on the matchbox to light the match.Pickup the fire extinguisher
   and Benn will appear and take you back to the village.

				  
                               - PART III -

                                  VILLAGE

1) Go to the Mage's shop and give him some money,in exchange he'll give you
   a pig mask.
2) Now,you will be able to walk past the guard by Sally See All's.

                            VALLEY OF THE LOST

3) Look behind the haystack to discover a piece of straw. Walk left to  the
   errupting volcano and pickup the tray. Be careful not to be fried by the
   falling lava.
4) Go to the nose and insert piece of straw into it to make him sneeze. Now
   that  you got rid  of the  nose look  at the  pile at  the bottom of the
   screen,pickup the fountain pen and the stamp.
5) Walk on over to the pile of washing and pickup the sock.
6) Go to the pile of tapes next to the shipwreck and  pickup a blank  tape.
   Then walk over to the huge pile of gold and attach gold coin to sock.
7) Now,go to the screen  where  there was  a pair  of lips  and  pickup the 
   remote control.
8) Go back to the letter box and pickup the letter. Attach the stamp to the
   letter and post the letter. Go  the tape  recorder  and insert  the tape 
   into it. Make sure your standing close to the machine and  push/pull the
   remote control.
9) Now,go to the guy with  the ghetto-blaster  and give him the tape, he'll 
   give you a magnetic keycard and dissapear. Go into the cave and stand by
   the far wall,shout `help' and pickup the bottle.
10)Alright,go to the locked door  next to the band and  insert the  keycard 
   into the slot.
11)Now,this bit is a tiny bit tricky and might be easier with the joystick.
   Notice the bag at the left  of the screen well all you have to do to get
   it is use the wind to blow you towards it.  Walk left   towards the  bag
   until the wind  starts to blow  you back, then move right until the wind 
   starts to blow you back again-this time you should be able  to get close
   enough to the bag to pick it up.
12)Remember the robot guarding the shipwreck? well go up to him and hit him
   with the sock filled with gold.
13)This bit is very hard to explain  through  text alone but here it  goes.
   Pickup one of the planks and walk to the middle  of the screen, as close
   to the waters  edge as possible... you'll have to be pixel accurate with
   this but the place you should be  standing  roughly is  where  the  sand 
   starts to dip  inwards in a curve shape. Push/pull  plank  and our  hero
   should  lay the plank horizantally ACROSS the  sand-if he lays the plank
   down vertically towards you your in the wrong spot. Once  youve laid the
   first  plank correctly pickup the second  plank and stand  in the middle
   of the  first plank. Push/pull plank and he'll  lay the  plank acoss the
   water to  the other side allowing you to  cross.  Cross  the  plank  and
   pickup  the rag near the bag of the ship.
14)Go back to  the screen  where the  cave is and a door  will appear, walk 
   through it.
15)Stand by the patch  on the wall at  the top  and  throw  the bottle  and
   then push/pull the rag to reveal a  button. Push the button to raise the
   gate. Walk  up to the circuit board and throw the bag.Throw the tray and
   once your over the circuit board pickup  the  fan and pick the lock with
   the paper clip. Make your way to the village.

				 
                                - PART IV -

                                  VILLAGE

1)Go to the Mage's shop and give him some more money.

                                 GRAVEYARD

2)Pickup the bone and click on the  push/pull icon and then on the  bone to 
  dig your way out of the grave.
3)Pickup the shovel .Now, when the vampire runs at you move quickly  to the
  left and he'll fall into the grave.
4)Walk around the graveyard and pickup the crucifix,silver plate,hoover and
  the symbols.
5)Now,the vampire will re-appear  by one of the graves,stand behind him and
  attack him with the shovel.
6)Now,he'll re-appear behind a tomb stone,push the tomb on him. Go  back to
  the left side of the graveyard and pickup the garlic bread.
7)Make your way to the gates-to the right side of the graveyard.The vampire
  will appear infront of the arch,eat the garlic bread.
8)Keep on walking,you bump into the vampire behind the tree.Attack him with
  the crucifix.
9)Now stand infront  of the closed gates and the vampire will appear behind
  you. Stand behind him  and attack  him with the symbols,go back to  gate.
  The vampire will now open the gates allowing you to continue.

                               CASTLE GATES

10)Walk up to the gates and push them open - proceed on walking towards the
   castle.

                                  CASTLE

1)Go to  the room on the left and walk over to the far wall  and pickup the
  ring (just infront of the little alcove).
2)Now, walk  over to the  library (the  room on the right). The bookcase at
  the back of the third aisle is false,just walk through it.

                                EVIL QUEEN

1)Defend yourself with the hoover when the ghost appears.
2)Push/pull the fire extinguisher when the queen attacks you with fire.
3)Defend yourself with the fan  when she  fire a  lightning  bolt  at you.
4)Attach the ring to the queen.

                                  THE END

@endnode

@node cut "Cutthroats"
@next da
@prev cu

     
                                Cutthroats

 
                                  IN TOWN

Cutthroats contains two shipwrecks to explore but the beginning for each is 
almost exactly the same. I have noted the differences. When the story actual-
ly starts you have just woken up after a bizarre night to find a note on your 
floor. Get up, take the note and read it. You should also wind your watch at 
this time or it will stop soon. You have plenty of time to make it to the 
shanty by 8:30. Opening your dresser reveals your room key and passbook as 
well as the Shipwreck book from Helvin. The shipwreck book is in your game 
package so you don't need to carry it around, in fact it's best not to. The 
only thing you need now is your room key. Take it and head for the Shanty. 
Make sure you lock the door behind you.

                                THE SHANTY

The Shanty is located on the east end of the Wharf Road. On your way you
will pass the Weasel. You may want to follow him to see what he's up to but
it is not necessary. When you get to the Shanty sit down with Johnny Red, or-
der breakfast and water, eat and drink, and wait for Johnny to let you know 
what he wants. Say YES you are interested when he asks.

                              THE LIGHTHOUSE

Get up and head back to your room. Get your passbook, you'll need it later
and it will save time to get it now. Again remember to lock your door. Then 
go to the lighthouse and wait for the others. The lighthouse is at the end of 
the winding road that starts SW of the Wharf Road. WARNING about the passbook
: If McGinty sees you while you are carrying it, he will follow you and spoil 
the adventure. AVOID him while you have it. Johnny Red will show you one of 
two items: either a dinner plate or a gold coin. The dinner plate is from the 
S.S. Leviathan and the gold coin is from the Sao Vera. Johnny will tell you 
to withdraw $500 and meet him at Point Lookout. Your business here is done so 
head for the bank.

                                 THE BANK

The bank is just north of the eastern most segment of the Shore Road. Head
there immediately but keep an eye out for McGinty. If you see him headed to-
wards you, get out of his way. When you get to the bank, withdraw $500. An 
examination of your passbook will give you today's date (9/19) necessary for 
figuring out High Tide. Once you have the money, go straight back to your 
room and put away your passbook. Remember to avoid McGinty and lock your door 
behind you. Then head for Point Lookout to meet Johnny.

                         POINT LOOKOUT/OUTFITTERS

When Johnny arrives he will ask to see the money. You'll have to show it to
him as he's not a trusting soul. He'll ask you if the wreck is more than 200'
. Say NO if for the Leviathan and YES for the Sao Vera. Then follow him to 
Outfitters. McGinty will be at Outfitters when you arrive, if you're not 
carrying your passbook he will leave so just wait him out. If you are carry-
ing the passbook, you will have to restart or restore to a previous position 
as the adventure is now ruined. Johnny will order most of the supplies and 
then take off. He'll let you know how much you have to contribute. Pay the 
salesman the proper amount (GIVE SALESMAN $xxx), and then order your equip-
ment. For the Leviathan you will need: Compressor (rental), Shark Repellent,
Electro Magnet, C Battery, Putty, Flashlight. For the Sao Vera you will need:
Dry cell, Shark repellent, Flashlight. You won't need to be on board ship 
till about 1:30 pm. so....

                            SMELLING OUT A RAT

It is now time to do a little sleuthing (there is a traitor amongst you, but
you have to catch him properly). Head for the Shanty. By this time you'll be 
getting thirsty so order some water or a drink while there. Johnny Red, Pete 
the Rat and the Weasel will all be there. Just wait and eventually the Weasel 
will take off. Follow him. He will go to the Ferry landing, meet with McGinty 
and then take off on the Ferry. Don't worry about following the Weasel...in-
stead follow McGinty to his office. Enter the office and examine the envelope 
on his desk. You can't do anything about it here so leave and go into the 
back alley behind McGinty's. There is a window there you can look through. 
Wait until McGinty leaves, then open the window and enter the office. Take 
the envelope and leave. You now have proof that the Weasel is a traitor, but 
the timing of when you reveal this is very important. It's now time to head 
for the boat. If you're dealing with the S.S. Leviathan you'll need to go to 
your room first and get your scuba gear. The gear is in your closet.

                                 ON BOARD

The layout for both ships is the same. If you're doing the S.S. Leviathan,
board the Night Wind. If you're doing the Sao Vera, board the Mary Margaret. 
Head for the Crew's Quarters and put the envelope under the bunk. You need to 
hide this information till the proper time. Then go fore into the Storage 
Locker and wait for the supplies to be delivered. On the Night Wind you will 
find a drill. When the supplies arrive, open the panel in the drill and put 
in the C battery. Remember to close the panel. You will also need to fill 
your tank with the air compressor. On the Mary Margaret you will find a ma-
chine that is a location box/metal detector. The closer it comes to metal the 
faster it clicks. When the supplies arrive, open the compartment and put the 
dry cell in the compartment and close it. Now return to the Crew's Quarters 
and wait. Johnny Red will come and ask you for the longitude and latitude. 
Don't tell him about the Weasel yet. The S.S. Leviathan is at Latitude 25, 
Longitude 25 and the Sao Vera is at Latitude 40, Longitude 45. Now sit down 
on the bunk and relax. Eventually you will fall asleep and be woken by Johnny 
Red when you arrive. Now is the time to reveal the traitor. Take the envelope 
and go find Johnny in the Captain's Cabin. Show the envelope to Johnny and he
'll take care of the rest. Go to the Galley and eat some stew (it's good and 
tasty) and drink some water. You are now ready to prepare for the dive.
S.S. LEVIATHAN: Head for the Storage Locker and get your gear. This will in-
clude: Wet Suit, Flippers, Electro Magnet, Mask, Tank (make sure it's filled)
, Drill, Putty, Flashlight, Shark Repellent. Head for the aft deck. Put on 
the wet suit, flippers, tank, and mask. Turn on your flashlight and dive. 
Head down. When you see a shark coming towards you open the repellent. Con-
tinue down to the wreck. You'll land on the top deck. Go straight down to be-
low decks. Head aft. Open the aft door (make sure the magnet is OFF first) 
and go aft. You'll be in a room with mines. The only one you need to worry 
about is the loose one. Put the magnet on the mine. Turn on the magnet. Put 
the magnet on the deck. This will get the mine out of your way and you can go 
up. There is a tight squeeze aft, so take off your tank and then go aft and 
aft again. This will bring you to a room with a safe. To open the safe, turn
on the drill and drill the lock then immediately turn off the drill. You'll
need it later and it doesn't last long. Inside the safe you'll find a case 
with stamps. The case is cracked and water is getting in but don't try to fix 
it now. Take the case and go back to the room above the mine room. Put your 
tank back on and go down. Then head fore and then up. This will put you in an 
airlock room and you can fix the case. "Turn on the drill" and "drill the 
crack with the drill." (NOTE: Put both these commands on the same line as the 
drill will run out almost immediately. You have no fudge time on this!) The 
new hole will let the water drain out. Then put putty in the crack and the 
case will be air tight. You can now head back to the ship and success! SAO 
VERA: Head for the Storage Locker and get your gear. This will include: Deep 
Diving Suit, Machine, Flashlight, Shark Repellent. Go to the aft deck. Put on 
the suit. Connect the air hose (from the compressor) to the suit. Turn on the 
compressor. Turn on the flashlight and Dive. Start descending. When you see 
the shark, open the repellent. Keep descending to the wreck. Go down to the 
next deck from the spot you land on. Turn on the machine and observe the 
clicking. Head aft. Take a pike from this room and head aft. Ignore the cask 
for now and head aft again. There are bunks blocking the doorway aft and you'
ll need to move and secure them. Move the bunk with the pike, then put the 
pike under the bunk. This will hold it up out of your way and keep it there. 
Head aft again and then down. You are now below decks. Head fore into the 
room with the squid. The squid will not bother you as long as you leave it 
alone and don't stay in this room for more than one turn. Head fore again.
This room contains an oak chest. Your box should be clicking wildly now. Head 
fore again into the room with skeletons. An examination of the skeletons will 
reveal a scabbord. The scabbord contains a sword take it. Head fore again. 
This time you'll find a maple chest and the box will be clicking slowly. Push 
the maple chest aft to the room with the oak chest. Push the oak chest port 
to the ocean floor, and wait for the orange line. When it swings in, tie it 
to the oak chest and give it a tug. The chest will begin to be hauled up.
(NOTE: If by some bizarre chance the box clicks rapidly when next to the
maple chest instead of the oak, then push the maple chest out to be hauled
up.) You've got the treasure out...now you have to get yourself out. Push the
remaining chest aft and aft again past the squid. Stand on the chest and you'
ll be able to go up to the middle deck. Go fore to the room with the cask. 
Push the cask fore to the foremost room. There is a rope tied around the mast
. Stand on the cask and cut the rope with the sword. You'll have to drop the 
sword and possibly the box to be able to climb up the rope. Go up and ascend 
to the ship...a very rich diver!

@endnode

@node da "Darkseed"
@next de
@prev cut

                                
                                Dark Seed


				 DAY ONE
				 
What you will need and where to find it:

	ITEM			LOCATION
				
	Aspirin			Cabinet in the bathroom
	Library Card  		In the pocket of the raincoat
	House Plan		On the desk in the study
	Rope			On the floor in the secret room no.2
	Watch			Under the bigger trunk in the attic
	Crowbar			In the boot of the car in the garage
	Gloves			In the car's glovebox
	Diary			Large trunk in the attic	
	Bobby Pin		Floor of the library in front of the desk
	Scotch			Buy from the store
	Clock Case Key		Tuttle Tomb.Urn Room

The first thing to do when you get up on day  One is  to rid  Dawson of his
headache. If you don't  he won't be  able to think staright and playing the
game becomes impossible! This is done by taking the aspirin in the bathroom
cabinet and,while while you're there,taking a shower -no-one likes a smelly
newcomer. Next, you want to wander into the spare bedroom  to the right. Use 
the "!" cursor a few times to discover and examine the library ticket in the 
pocket of the raincoat. You may have to try more than once but it is there,
honest! From here head on downstairs to the study. Read the plans to discover 
the secret rooms. This having been done,you can now open the bookcase on the 
right and enter secret room one. Once you have gone through it is important 
to open the door again and leave it that way,otherwise you cannot use the 
turbo-lift in the Dark World. Climb the ladder and take the rope before exi-
ting to your bedroom.Whatever you do, don't forget to leave the door open.
Go downstairs again and wait for the postman  to call - If you  press T the
time will pass quicker. Open the door to the postie and recieve the slightly
unusual parcel before heading on up to the attic. Shoving the large trunk on 
the right foward reveal the exit to the balcony and the watch. Pick up the 
watch and wind it  by clicking  on it. You  can now find out the time, which 
is vital. Dont forget to wind the watch at odd intervals, or it runs down and 
you're left up a deeply unattractive creek without a paddle. Go out onto the 
balcony,tie the rope to the gargoyle and you have a convenient rear access. 
Despite what you may have read elsewhere,do not use this exit on day one as 
it tends to upset things. Always enter the and exit the house through the 
front door for now. So using the aforementioned exit, take a trip down to the 
garage and and take the crowbar out of the boot. Next you should obtain the 
gloves from the  glovebox in the car, and  while you're there amuse yourself 
by sounding the horn and turning on the radio - and don't forget to turn the 
thing off when you're done! Go back into the house, not forgetting to read 
the newspaper on the pavement, and walk back upstairs. The phone will ring 
so go into your bedroom and answer it - don't take too long or you'll miss it
. It is the librarian telling you to come and collect a book. In the meantime 
climb up to the attic and use the crowbar to get the diary out of the big 
trunk. Give it a good read. Now go outside and head towards the town. Enter 
the library and find the bobby pin in front of the desk. Next talk to the 
librarian,she'll direct you to your book which you should take and read. Go 
back to her again and give her the library card. She'll tell you where to 
find the book it should go with, inside which is the missing piece of the 
diary - definetly essential reading. On your way back, take time to go to the 
store. You need to buy the scotch, so first pay the store keeper and then 
take the demon drink. You alcoholic neighbour will now make an appearance and 
give you a "Get Out Of Jail Free" card, which will come in very handy tomor-
row. Go past the house and take a trip to the graveyard and, beyond  what, 
the Tuttle Crypt. Enter the crypt by following the instructions in the diary
exerpt and head on to the urn room. You will find the key to the clock case
in the urn on the far left of the bottom shelf. Take this and head back home.
Once home,use the key to open the clock case in the living room and admire
the John McKeegan nameplate. Take the time to examine the mirror and the
Painting over the matle piece.Put Dawson to bed now, he needs his sleep and
tomorrow is going to be a long day.

				 DAY TWO
				 
What you will need and where to find it:

	ITEM			LOCATION
				
	Mirror Fragment		Postman delivers it
	Shovel			Catacombs entrance
	Diary Fragment		John McKeegan's grave
	Gun			Police station
	Stick			Delbert's back yard
	Headband		From Sargo in the dark prison corridor
	Microfiche		From the Keeper Of The Scrolls

Following the bizarre and,it should be said, macabre dream, you  wake up as
before and should shower and take your aspirin as before.Before the postie
arrives go and have a listen to the car radio - you'll help Dawson discover
that what goes on in one  world is reflected in the other, although we al-
ready knew that didn't we? Go back into the house throught the front door - 
from now on it's not only o.k to your the rope but often essential - and 
press T a couple of times before the postie arrives. Take the mirror fragment 
that he brings and use it on the mirror in the living room. This completes 
the portal to  the Dark World, so take the opportunity to cross over and see 
what gives. Take the right hand door in the nursery to the room of skulls and 
then take the room on your left. This room contains the plans for the embryo 
implantatin which confirms Dawson's worst fears. The plans can't be picked up 
so just use the "!" cursor to read them. Take the right hand door into turbo-
lift one room and step into the lift on the far wall. This will teleport you 
to the second turbo-lift room, from which you should exit left onto the ob-
servation deck. Use the gloves (to avoid electrocution) to activate the 
switch between the two exits. This will unveil a previously hidden door in 
the skull room,so go back there and go through the new door. Keep going left 
and you will find a shovel, of all things, which you should pick up and save 
for use later on. Leave the Dark World and take a jaunt to the graves and ex-
hume the body of John McKeegan  with the shovel. Read the last bit of his 
diary, which advises you that you need to get the car started and break the 
mirror, and suggests how this could be done. When you get home you'll find  
yourself under arrest for blatant grave robbery. The "Get Out Of Jail Free" 
card will see you out before long, but first you should stow the bobby pin, 
the gloves and the money under the pillow - they'll come in mighty useful in 
a while. Get out by rattling the tin cup against the bars and giving the card 
to the policeman. You will just have enough time to steal the gun which is 
located just over the desk on the wall. Go and meet Delbert as arranged. 
He'll meet you in your back yard rather than his, but follow him next door. 
He will studiously ignore you until you give him the scotch. He'll leave you,
but take the stick that the dog leaves behind. Return to the Dark World and 
take the right hand door into the skulls room and go through that door the 
lever opened. Keep on going right until you encounter Dark Fido, the dog - 
type guardian thingy that guards the bridge over the abyss. To get past him 
simply throw the stick over the side and watch the stupid thing chase after 
it! You are now free to continue right to the Dark Police station. Although 
you find your gun confiscated and yourself incarcerated, this is exactly what
you need to happen. Test the synchronicity theory by retrieving from under 
the pillow the items you stashed there earlier. The bobby pin now comes in 
very handy as a means of picking the lock, but you may need a few attempts 
before you are successful. Once out you will meet a fellow prisoner by the 
name  of Sargo who, having seen what you've just done,offers you an invisi-
bility inducing headband in exchange for the bobby pin. Seems a fair swap, 
but don't use the headband now, it only works once and for a limited period ,
so deploy it only when you need to - which is soon. Walk out of the passage 
and past the Drakketh Factory (which,like the barber shop,you can't go in).
Now you will find yourself at the front of the Archives building, and now is 
the time to use that headband. So,invisibility assured, you can walk past the 
guard and into the chamber of the Keeper Of The Scrolls. Turn the machine on 
and you will see an image of the Keeper. She will then give you a roll of mi-
crofiche which will come in useful tomorrow, but for now leg it home and get 
some shut-eye!

				 DAY THREE
				 
What you will need and where to find it:

	ITEM			LOCATION
			
	Axe Handle		Delivered by postman
	Scotch			Store
	Car Keys		Under Stone In Cellar
	Stone 			Cellar

Take your aspirin and shower as normal. Go downstairs and hang around for 
the postman to arrive. He'll bring  you a package from the Keeper Of The
Scrolls which contains the axe handle. Useful item this, but not straight
away so save it for later. Now take a trip down town, using the rope from 
the attic. Always use this as your entrance and exit from the house as police 
have staked out the front, but are blind to the comings and goings from the 
rear.Go into the periodicals room in the library and turn on the microfiche 
reader. Pop the in the roll of film and read the bit about home improvements. 
Dawson has now learned that the keys to the car are in the hiding place in 
the cellar. So hurry back home and pick up another bottle of scotch on the 
way. Get inside the house using the rope and head down into the cellar. In  
the middle of the floor there is a loose stone. Pick it up and pick up also
the keys which are stowed underneath. Now cross to the Dark World once again  
and take the stone to the power nexus. Use the machine on the left to ener-
gize the stone,which should then be put together with the axe handle to make 
a hammer. Hurry back to the Normal World and go into the garage. Fill the pe-
trol tank with scotch (what a waste!) get into the car and, using the keys, 
turn on the ignition. Leave the engine running as you cross once more into 
the Dark World. Enter the spaceship (the small opening on the left outside 
the front of the hatchery) and use the gloves on the lever to the left of the  
computer console. This has started the craft's launch sequence so get the 
hell out. Once the craft takes off you will find yourself back in front of 
the mirror in the Normal world. Smash the mirror with the hammer and the  
world is saved and the game is won! Enjoy the end-sequence.

@endnode

@node de "Deadline"
@next e1
@prev da


                                 Deadline


All commands are in "quotes" and all directional moves are in [brackets]. 
From the front path of the robner's estate proceed [n]. Now you should be at 
the front door of the house. Type 'open door" and then proceed [n] again. 
This will place you within the estate. Then go [n,n,e,] then "climb stairs"
This will place you at the second level of the estate. Then go [w,w,w,w,n]. 
This will place you in the library to do your detective work. First "look 
rug". You will see mud spots (crucial for the arrest). Then "take cup and 
pad and calendar and pencil". Now "rub pencil on paper". After having done 
this, "turn page on calendar" and "read calendar". After having done this, 
"open balcony door" and go [e]. This will place you on the balcony. "look 
railing" (this will confirm our mud theory). Having done all of the above-
procede, [s,e,e,e,e,d,d,w,s,s]. This will place you at the front door again. 
now go [nw,s,s,e,s,e,se]. This will bring you to the shed (more detective 
work). Now, "look ladder" (more mud again-i think it is safe to assume that 
the murderer used the ladder to enter through the balcony and then somehow(?) 
murdered our dear friend mr.robner). Now this having been done, return to the 
front door. [nw,w,n,w,n,n,se]. Now we have to trek all the way upstairs again
!. Go [n,n,e,u,u,n,n] you should now be in dunbar"s bathroom. Type "look lobo
" (interesting, heh?). Now go all the way downstairs again. [s,s,s,d,d,w,s,s] 
You will be at the front door again. Now you have time to take a rest. Type 
"wait till 11:30". It should now be 11:31. now we have to hunt down Mr.McNabb
. Go to the orchard [e,ne,n]. (note: due to the nature of deadline, McNabb
might not be there. If he is not, hunt him down! - it doesn"t matter where 
you find him. Once McNabb has been located say "hey McNabb"/cr/ "what is 
wrong". After this follow him. He will then point out to you two holes in his
rose garden. You then say "look holes" (more mud theory) and then "dig ground
". Then with your new found treasure type "analyze fragment for loblo". Now 
We have to catch the will reading. go [n,n,se,s,sw,w,s]. You will be at the
front door once again. now go [n,n,w] and wait for the will to be read. After 
that say "hey George". Then type "show George the calendar". He will panic 
and run upstairs. Follow him!! he then will duck into his room and you go [w,
w,n,n]. This will place you in the library"s balcony. Now type "wait 10 min". 
once George enters the room wait for about 2 min and then [s], "look bookcase
", "press button", "get will", "look safe", "get papers", "read papers" then 
go to the living room [s,s,e,e,e,e,d,d,e,e] and say "hey Baxter", "what about 
focus", "show focus to Baxter", "hey Dunbar", "show focus papers", "what a-
bout focus". then follow Dunbar closely. Once outside the house she will drop 
a piece of paper. "get paper", "read paper" then continue following her. Once 
you catch up, ask her "hey Dunbar", "show paper to Dunbar". Then make tracks 
for the shed. [e,e,se]. wait for Baxter. once Dunbar and Baxter are present 
type "arrest Baxter and Dunbar"

@endnode

@node e1 "Enchanter"
@next e2
@prev de


                                 Enchanter


Type anything that is enclosed in quotes, nothing else ! (separate commands 
are separated by a - )

"ne-n-open oven-get bread,jug and lantern-s-e-se-ne-drink water-get water-sw-
se-sw-sw-s-read scroll-ne-ne-e-e-gnusto fweep-memorize fweep-fweep gate-e"
You are now in the castle. When the program says that your throat is dry,then 
drink water. When it says that your stomach is grumbling, eat bread.
"read book-memorize frotz-frotz lantern-s-s-e-s-open door-n-read writing-
remove block-e-get scroll-read scroll-gnusto exex-w-s-u-drop all-e-get ligh-
ted portrait-get scroll-w-get all-read scroll-gnusto ozmoo-n-n-e-memorize oz-
moo-e-ozmoo me-"(wait two turns..ie. take inventory twice)"-d-open south door
-s-get all-n-w-w-s-cut rope with dagger- open box-get scroll-read scroll-mel-
bor me-s-w-u-sit on bed-sleep" When you sleep, you will have a dream about 
the bed you are sleeping on. All dreams are hints! Also, from now on, anytime 
the program tells you that you are tired, then sleep.(yes, right on the floor
!) The reason you have to sleep on the bed is so you can have this certain 
dream. now, on with the adventure. "stand up-examine bedpost-push button-get 
scroll-read scroll-gnusto vaxum-d-e-e-e-s-se-memorize nitfol-nitfol turtle-
memorize exex-exex turtle-turtle,follow  me-nw-n-e-u-  turtle,se,get  scroll,
nw-get scroll-turtle,stay-d-w-n-n-n-n- examine ashes-follow track-reach in
hole-read scroll-n-memorize fweep-fweep gate-n-get scroll-read crumpled 
scroll-s-w-w-w-w-w-u- get egg-memorize fweep-fweep egg-drop egg- get scroll-
read shredded scroll-krebf shredded scroll-d-memorize vaxum-e" You will now 
be in one of four mirror rooms. Wait in any one until you see an adventurer 
from Zork I on the other side of the mirror. when you see him: "zifmia ad-
venturer-vaxum adventurer- show dagger to adventurer-" (go east until you get 
to a room with monsters guarding a door) "-point at door-n-drop all but bread
, jug and lantern-get map and pencil-s-close door-w-w-w-w-w-w s-s-w-w-w-nw-ne
- fill jug-sw-se-e-e-e-s-s-e-s-d" This is the second to last part of the ad-
venture. at this point you are in a very weird kind of room! Remember the map 
you picked up? read it now. The map is the map to the translucent corridors. 
If you connect two of the letters (ie.'connect b and j") then you will actu-
ally make a corridor! Now, what you are going to do is release ultimate evil 
from its lair and erase certain so you trap him in another part of the trans-
lucent corridors. You want to do this because the scroll that you need to 
kill Krill with is in his lair! Ok this is how you do it: "s-e-ne-se-connect 
f and p-sw-sw-get scroll-erase b and r-erase v and m- ne-nw-nw-connect b and 
j-w-read powerful scroll-u-u-e-e-n- n-n-n-n-e- open door-n-drop map and pen-
cil-get all but map and pencil-s-w-s-s-e-e" Now try going up the stairs. You 
can climb them but you can't reach the top! This stairway is the last puzzle 
you need to solve before you kill Krill. "memorize vaxum-kulcad stair-read or-
nate scroll-izyuk me-e-gondar dragon-vaxum being-guncho Krill"

@endnode

@node e2 "Enchanter 2"
@next fa
@prev e1


                          Enchanter 2 (Sorcerer)

                               
Oh my goodness! What's happening? A hellhound is racing toward you and it
looks hungry! Is death anyway to start your new position with the Guild of
Enchanters? Keep telling yourself this is only a dream...wait awhile and you
'll wake up snug and safe in your bed inside Guildhall! Whew! But why is it 
so dark? Oh! Your FROTZ spell must've worn off during the night. Oh well, 
just FROTZ yourself and get up and go west into the hallway. Hmmm, what's 
this? A note's been tacked to your door. Read it if you want, but you have 
other things to do...like locating Belboz! Head south twice to the Lobby and 
go west into the Store Room. Take the Ochre Vial and the Matchbook then go 
east back to the Lobby. Reading the matchbook tells you about a nifty new po-
tion you can order! Open the receptacle, put the matchbook in it then close 
it. Now go east into the Library. Later, after you finish the game, come back 
in here and read the Encyclopedia Frobizzica. It's loaded with all sorts of 
information about your favorite Infocom games! But for now, just get the 
scroll, GNUSTO MEEF into your spell book and go back west to the Lobby. Now 
go north once and west into Helistar's Quarters. She's left behind a shiny 
new scroll!Get the scroll then GNUSTO GASPAR into your spell book. Learn GAS-
PAR then GASPAR yourself(just in case!). If you should happen to inadvertant-
ly die during the game, the GASPAR spell will restore your character and put 
you back to where you last cast the GASPAR spell on yourself. I hope you won
't have to use it! But if you do, at least you'll have it.Don't forget to re-
cast it on yourself if you *do* die! Go east back into the Hallway and north 
and west into Belboz's Quarters. If you start getting hungry or thirsty mes-
sages, open the Ochre Vial and drink the potion. That will take care of any 
hunger or thirst for the rest of the game. When you've used the option, just 
drop the vial. In Belboz's Quarters, look behind the tapestry and get the key 
that falls to the floor. Now open the desk drawer, get the journal, unlock it 
and read it. You'll learn what's happened to Belboz and what he has designa-
ted the current code to be. Remember this code. Then look at the Infotater 
that came with your game. Look up the name of the monster that Belboz named 
as the code and note the colors that correspond to the monster. Write this
color code down. You'll need it to open the trunk in the basement. Drop the 
journal and the key and go east and south twice back to the Lobby. By now, 
the mailman has arrived and put your package in the receptacle. Open the re-
ceptacle and get the Orange Vial. The issue of Popular Enchanting is useless.
Time to take your leave of the Guildhall and start your journey to look for
Belboz! Go down the stairs into the Cellar and push the buttons that corres-
pond to the monster's color code. You must do this correctly or else you'll 
have to start from scratch! So it's a good idea to save your game before you 
start doing any button pushing! As you push each button, you'll hear a click. 
After pushing the last button, the trunk should pop open revealing a moldy 
old scroll! If it doesn't open, restore your game and push the buttons again.
When you read the scroll, you see it's called AIMFIZ and by casting it you'll 
be transported to someone else's location! Okay, let's AIMFIZ BELBOZ and see 
if that works! Oh well, it didn't find Belboz for you, but at least you're 
out of the Guildhall! But look at where you're at! There's that blasted hell-
hound again and this time it's not a dream! Quickly! Go northeast to the 
Forest Edge. Whew! The hellhound stops in its tracks and bellows at you. Fi-
nally, it turns tail and slinks back into the trees. Looking around, you see 
a signpost next to a northern path, the road you just came in on back to the 
west, a wide rolling meadow to the east. At the base of the signpost you see 
a slimy (ugh!) hole leading down. Might as well take our chances with the 
hole right now. So grit your teeth and go down into the hole. Upon going down 
the slimy hole you find yourself in a Snake Pit. Uh, let's not spend anytime 
here, okay? Go down once more into the Slimy Room. It's not much better here, 
but at least there aren't any snakes or beetles! Go south to the Crater and 
west to the Edge of the Chasm. Now is a good time to read your Spell Book and 
see what new spells you've acquired since defeating the evil Krill in ENCHAN-
TER. Hmmm, a few new ones have been added! And it seems as if one of the new 
ones, IZYUK, is needed right here! Learn IZYUK twice, then IZYUK yourself and 
you gently leave the ground! Go west twice across the Chasm to Elbow Room. 
Now go north to the Tree Room. What a splendid sight! Who said Zorkmids didn
't grow on trees? As you take a coin, though, the entire sight shimmers then 
disappears! Well, it seems that there's only one to a customer. Go south and 
east back to the Bare Passage, IZYUK yourself again, then fly east twice back 
to the Crater. Time to leave this strange place (for now!) so go north, up 
twice back to the Forest Edge then east and northeast to the River Bank. Don
't spend much time here since the River Bank may deteriorate beneath you! 
Learn PULVER then PULVER the river and go down into the dry River Bed. As you 
look around at the flopping fish, you see a cave entrance to the northest. Go
northeast into the Hidden Cave. Looking around, you see a pile of Bat Guano, 
a Soiled Scroll and an Amber Vial. The Amber Vial is useless in the game, so 
you can leave it. But be sure to get the Soiled Scroll and the Bat Guano! 
GNUSTO FWEEP into your Spell Book and go down the hole to the Pile of Bones.
Now go southwest and up to the Ruins. Nothing to see or do here, so learn IZ-
YUK and go west twice back to the Meadow. IZYUK yourself and fly northeast 
and southeast to the Fort Entrance. If you hadn't been flying, you most cer-
tainly would've fallen into the river! (That river bank has started looking 
awfully unstable!) If you're feeling sleepy, you can go to sleep here. Go 
east onto the Parade Ground. You see a flagpole and high above, the flag of 
Quendor fluttering in the breeze! Lower the flag and examine it. While doing 
so, you notice a secret pocket and in the pocket you find an Aqua Vial! Take 
the vial and go east to the Gun Emplacement. Looking down into the barrel of 
the huge cannon, you see what appears to be a pile of ordinary scrolls! But 
when you try to take one, your fingers get nipped by sharp little teeth! If 
you read about YIPPLES in your Infotater, you'll soon learn that that's what 
you've found inside the barrel! Put the Bat Guano into the cannon barrel. As 
you do, dozens of little scrolls pour out and run away in every direction! 
When you look back inside the barrel, though, you see one ordinary scroll is 
left! Take the Ordinary Scroll.You can't GNUSTO it because of its complexity. 
Just carry it with you. Time to leave, so go west twice to the Fort Entrance. 
You'll have to learn IZYUK twice again because you'll have to go back via the 
River Bank. IZYUK yourself and fly northwest and southwest to the Meadow. Now 
IZYUK yourself again and fly east twice into the Ruins. The reason for this 
second IZYUK is because the Drawbridge has the same bad habit of disintegra-
ting! Go down twice to the Highway and east to the Toll Gate. A fat gnome is
sleeping soundly behind the toll gate. Waken him and give him the Zorkmid. As 
you hand him the coin, he lifts the gate allowing you to pass through, then 
he promptly falls back asleep...poor old thing! Go east twice then north 
twice to Outside the Glass Arch. Learn FWEEP three times, drop all your pos-
sessions and prepare to enter the strangest maze you've ever seen! Go east to 
the Inside of the Glass Maze. All around you, you see Glass! The walls, the 
floors, the ceilings are all clear! It's impossible to tell what's there and 
what isn't! This is where FWEEP will help you out, so FWEEP yourself once. 
Amazing! You've turned yourself into a Bat! But, better yet, you've now got a 
built-in sonar and can "see" where the openings are! Follow closely, now, and 
don't get lost! Go north, east, south twice, west, down, east twice, north 
twice, up twice, south and east. Whew! Solid ground again! You're outside the 
Maze and see a parchment scroll here! But as you pick it up, you hear fien-
dish laughter and out of the corner of your eye, you see the glass in the 
Maze shift ever so slightly! Now what? Someone's shifted the paths inside and 
it's the only way out of here! Drop the scroll down the hole (you can't pos-
sibly carry the scroll when you become a bat again!). FWEEP yourself again
and.... Uh-oh. Now you've done it! From the base of the cliff, a huge Dorn 
Beast comes galloping and roaring toward you! Quickly re-enter the Maze! Re-
member, though, that the panels have shifted and with that Dorn Beast on your
, uh, "heels," you can't afford to make any mistakes! Go west twice, south 
and east. The Dorn Beast,not realizing it can't fly comes charging after you! 
It lets out a high-pitched squeal and goes plummeting to its death! Thank 
goodness! Now you can continue at a more leisurely (but not TOO leisurely!) 
pace. Go down twice (past the splattered remains of the Dorn Beast), west 
twice, up twice, north twice, down and east. Here, the FWEEP spell will wear 
off, so FWEEP yourself again and continue by going south, east, north, down, 
west, south, west, up, and west to the Outside of the Glass Arch. You'll con-
tinue to fly for a few more turns, so wait until the FWEEP spell wears off, 
then pick up all your possessions, go south twice and enter the Hut. Inside 
the fireplace of the Hut you see the Parchment Scroll! Get the scroll and 
GNUSTO SWANZO. You should be getting pretty tired by now, too, so go to sleep 
and take a breather. Once you're bright-eyed and bushy-tailed again, go out, 
and west twice back to the gnome. With a little petty larceny in your heart, 
search the (still) sleeping gnome. In one of his pockets you find and take 
your Zorkmid back. No time for guilty feelings, though, so go west twice back 
to the Bend, southwest to the Edge of the Crater and down into the Crater.
From here go down into the Winding Tunnel and southwest to the Park Entrance. 
When you try to enter the Park, though, a force field bars your way and soon, 
a gawdily dressed gnome appears and tells you admittance to the Park is one 
Zorkmid! Well, crime doesn't pay afterall! Give the pilfered Zorkmid to the 
gnome and go west twice and south to the Arcade. A hawker is standing here 
inside a "Bash the Bunny" booth and is asking you to try your hand at this 
innocent passtime! Time to put the Aqua Vial to use. Open the vial and drink 
the potion. Suddenly, your muscles vibrate and you feel stronger! Drop the 
vial and take the ball from the hawker. As you throw the ball at the bunny, 
it goes spinning around! The hawker gives you a Glittering Scroll as your 
prize and tells you to "scram"! No time to argue with him right now. Go north
, east twice, northeast an south to the Hall of Carvings. On the southern 
wall, you see an extremely lifelike carving of a dragon! Read both the Ordi-
nary Scroll and the Glittering Scroll. You'll see that YONK augments the po-
wer of one scroll and that MALYON gives life to inanimate objects. Do you 
think we should bring this dragon to life? It's certain you can't go any far-
ther and that dragon might be hiding a secret entrance!YONK the MALYON scroll 
then MALYON the dragon. The words of the MALYON scroll glow brightly for a 
moment and the dragon comes impossibly to life! As the stones from the wall 
fall around it, it roars with pain and anger! When it sees you, it thinks all 
this pain is caused by you! It rears back its huge head and with smoke bil-
lowing from its nostrils, prepares to turn you into a crispy critter! Just as 
the dragon takes a step toward you, it suddenly reverts to stone! Whew...sa-
ved! But look! Where the dragon used to be, there is now an entrance into a 
southern passage! Before you go south into the passage, wait until your mus-
cles feel limp. Then open the Orange Vial. You should only be carrying the 
Orange Vial and your Spell Book now. Go south into the Sooty Room. The 
noxious odor of sulfur comes from the room to the east. But there is no other 
way to go, so go east. As you enter the Coal Bin Room, you hear a thunderous 
roar behind you as the entrance is sealed shut by the collapsing tunnel! Not 
only that, the air in here isn't going to be breathable for long! Quickly 
drink the potion from the Orange Vial then drop the vial. As you do so, some-
one slides down the coal chute! As you look closely, you seem to be looking 
at your twin! Make careful note of the number your "twin" gives you, then 
give him your Spell Book. When you hand him your book, he takes it and makes 
a mad dive down the coal chute leaving you quite alone! No time to waste, 
however, since your potion won't last long! Go east into the Dial Room and 
set the dial on the door to the number your older self gave you. Open the 
door and go east into the Shaft Bottom. You should be empty handed. If you're 
not, drop everything you're carrying! Get the rope you see here and go up and
southwest to the Coal Mine. Tie the rope to the beam you see here and get the 
beam. Now go northwest and west to the Top of the Chute. Put the beam across 
the chute, drop the rope down the chute and climb down the rope. As you climb 
down the rope, you clamber inside a small opening you see off to the side of 
the chute and find yourself in the Slanted Room. If you'd been carrying any-
thing, you wouldn't have been able to get in here. Looking around the room 
you see a Shimmering Scroll and an odd lantern with an open drawer in it. 
Read the scroll and you see it's for a spell that will take you back in time! 
GOLMAC yourself and open the lantern. Inside the lantern you find a Smelly 
Scroll! Take the Smelly Scroll (leave the Shimmering Scroll) and quickly go 
east down the coal chute!Your VILSTU potion has about run out and it's doubt-
ful you will survive unless you can get out of here quickly! When you arrive 
back in the Coal Bin Room, standing before you is your younger self! He/You 
is dropping an Orange Vial! Quickly tell your younger self what the combina-
tion to the Dial is! When he gives you the Spell Book, go down the chute and 
outside to.... Fresh air and a Lagoon! As your VILSTU potion wears off, you 
get incredibly sleepy -- an unfortunate side effect -- so go to sleep. When 
you wake up, learn MEEF twice and SWANZO once. Drop everything you're carry-
ing and go east into the Lagoon and dive. On the bottom of the Lagoon you see 
a tangle of spenseweeds. MEEF the weeds and get the crate they were hiding.
Go west back to the Lagoon Shore, drop and open the crate. Get only the Grue 
Repellent. Get the Smelly Scroll and go northeast and north to the Mouth of 
the River. Those are stinging vines around the cave entrance and they'll kill 
you! MEEF the vines and read the Smelly Scroll. The scroll is a protection 
scroll! VARDIK yourself, spray the Grue Repellent on yourself and go west 
twice past the Grue Lair into the Mammoth Cavern. Before you stand three 
doors. Belboz is behind the White Door. The other two doors open to miserable
, everlasting, certain pain and agony! Open the White Door and you see Belboz 
lying here in a trance of some sort! SWANZO Belboz. As you do, you see the 
translucent shape of Jeearr rise from Belboz's body. It wafts towards you and 
"feel" a disembodied voice threatening to take possession of your body from 
wherein it will reign in terror for a thousand thousand years. As it begins 
to contract around you, it suddenly senses your protection from the VARDIK 
spell! Screaming in terror and agony, Jeearr knows he has been beaten! With a 
final scream, he disappears and all is quiet. Slowly, Belboz rises, questions 
you briefly, then speaks a spell that returns you both to the Chamber of the 
Circle of Enchanters. There, he tells the others what you have done and that 
he has finally found one to replace him when he steps down as the Head of the 
Circle...you!

@endnode

@node fa "Fascination"
@next fu
@prev e2


                                Fascination


                             Part 1:The hotel

To open the suitcase use the code AARGH. Open the drawer next to the fridge 
and put the adapter in the socket. Plug the toothbrush plug into the adapter 
and turn the brush on and take the vials. Now put the adapter back in the 
drawer. Open the fridge and hide the vials in the icecube tray. Fill the tray 
with water from the pitcher. Close the fridge and plug the cable in the 
socket to turn it on. Now go to the lobby and get the keyring from the table 
and the token from the ashtray. Give the keyring to the receptionist and she'
ll give you a pool key. Click on the phone directory which is below the porn 
mag and write down the phone number you find which changes from game to game. 
Also flip through the porno and on one of the pages make note of the torn 
corner and write down those 3 numbers. Go back to your room and make a phone
call using the number you found in the directory. Write down the code you're 
given. At the pool talk to prisca to get the flashlight. To get the pendant, 
switch on the pool light which is to the right of the barmaid, and it will 
appear on the bottom of the pool. Talk to the barmaid and choose cofee. Take 
some of the sugar for later on. Go into the locker room, and use the pool key 
on the locker. To open the battery compartment of the walkman, use the token 
on it and then take the batery.

                               Part 2: Q.U.L

Go to the office, and give the sugar cube to the dog, then take the storeroom 
key. At the parking lot, unlock the storeroom door, and use the flashlight to 
search the closet. All the way to the mid-right is a hook. Push it and every-
thing will be clear. Take the car key from the pocket. Use the car key in the 
red car. Talk to the bum. Kick the tire.Take the keycard from the car seat. 
Make another phone call using the token, and make not of the 3 digit # you 
are given. Go back to the parking lot and use the keycard in the slot and 
then enter that 3 digit number.When you see the dead guy, click around his 
hand and you'll see he has a napkin and take the microcassette inside it. On 
one of the books there's a spring. When you press it, a cable will appear. 
Pull the cable and take the recorder. Press the button on the right tit, and 
play the cassette in the recorder. 

                           Part 3: Lingerie/Lab

Take the news.(You should have 6 newspapers by the end of the game). Go into 
the middle booth and open the shoebox and take the shoe. From the third booth 
make your way to the private door. When you open it, you'll notice a bell on 
top. Make sure to take it before going in. Unroll the picture of the guy, and 
take the padlock key. Also take the magnetic label on the top-left hand side.
Move the packages till you find the safe. Open the lock with the key. Use the 
shoe on the bar. Use the magnetic label on the safe to open it. The combina-
tion is DOC (make sure you turn the knob after each letter). In the lab, take 
the scalpel from the set of instruments. Take the closet key and gas mask 
from the labcoat. Use the closet key in the closet, and take the photo. Smash 
the jar with the 2 vials with the shoe and take 'em. Rewind the answering ma-
chine and then play it. Rewind it again and press the erasure button so no 
one  finds out.Go back to the hotel.

                             Part 4: The Hotel

In your room take the box of chocolates and the club-label pin which is on 
the carpet. Click on the glass bottle on the table. Use the phone to call the 
receptionist(press 0). Go down and convince the inspector that you're clean. 
Use the following response:1-2-1-2-1. Take the newspaper. After he's gone you
'll notice a slip of paper on the floor. These are the last 4 digits of Lou 
Dale's phone # (the 1st 3 are from the porn mag). Go to your room and call 
that number. For more information, consult the directory.

                           Part 5:Chemistry time

Search the car, and note all the clues. Take the 10 bucks from the windshield 
wiper. Get the news from the trash can. Put the photo in the slot below the 
door. Use the scalpel in the keyhole, and click back on the  slot. In the 
kitchen, first open all the cabinets.Take the cloth and wet it by running the 
faucet and using it on the water.Wear the mask and use the detergent, caustic 
soda and ammonia in the basin to cause toxic fumes. Open the hatch all the 
way and then click on the basin. Quickly fit the damp cloth in the slot where 
the fumes are seeping through to protect yourself. When you talk to Lou Dale, 
take the ring. Now go visit Kenneth Miller at the Red Blue Club.

                           Part 6:Miller=Archie

Take the news from the garbage to the right. Give the bouncer the club label 
pin and the 10 dollars and he'll let you in. Talk to Miller using the follo-
wing responses:1-2-1-2-1. When you're in bed, give him the chocolates. Notice 
that his tattoo says he's really Archie. You can also use your pendant on his
. Take the ring from his hand and then enter the other room. Talk to the par-
rot and take the cigar from his mouth. Also take that little net from on the 
ground. Switch the fishtank light on and click on the seashell. Use the sea-
food you see there and click it on to the shell. Use the net on the shell to 
take the pearl. Take the eyepatch from the head and fit the pearl in the eye. 
Stick the cigar in the head's mouth. Click on to the panel and use Archie's 
stamp ring on the print.

                            Part 7:The Mansion

To convince the man you're innocent, use this response:1-2-2-1-2-1.At the 
bathroom take the syringe out of the wastebasket and then open the jar with 
the two eyes in it. Use the syringe on the formalin that the eyes are held in
. Push the secret button on the wall to the left and click on the perfume 
spray bottle. Fill the bottle with the formalin and go back to the inspector. 
When he asks you for the vials, spray his eyes. In the mansion lounge, pick 
up the 6th news and use the flashlight and signet ring on the microscope and 
make note of what you find. Look at the painting of the nude woman who's 
having a dream and click on to the trigger. Next click on to the wheel above 
the organ and press the right button which turns the organ on. Now allign the 
wheel to the proper zodiac sign which you get from the signet ring. Since 
this is a euro ware, you must know that the europeans write dates in the or-
der of day, month, then year. So for example if the date from the ring is 13
-09-50, then just click on the wheel's left button 2 times (it moves counter-
clockwise) so that it faces just like a nine on a regular clock. Next play 
the notes that are inscribed in the flashlight on the organ. If you don't 
know how to play the piano then this should help you: (This is what you will 
see but without the letters and of course it will look much better - forgive 
me).

            C+   D+      F+    G+  A+
              \ _  \ _    \  _  \ _  \ _  
             __! !__! !__ __! !__! !__! !__ __
            !  ! !  ! !  !  ! !  ! !  ! !  !  !
            !C ! !D ! !E !F ! !G ! !A ! !B !C !
            !  !_!  !_!  !  !_!  !_!  !_!  !  !
            !  ! !  ! !  !  ! !  ! !  ! !  !  !
            !  ! !  ! !  !  ! !  ! !  ! !  !  !
            ----------------------------------------

After you play those notes, a secret passage will appear and you will be
trapped. Just put the six newspapers on the table and then take the lighter
from the dead guy's pocket and light the newspapers. An alarm will go off and 
congratulations, you've finished FASCINATION. Now get ready for the ending...

@endnode

@node fu "Future Wars"
@next g2
@prev fa


                                Future Wars


                                THE OFFICE

After your boss is gone you pick up the empty bucket,then walk to the control
box and examine it. There you see a red and a green button press the red but-
ton, and the motor starts and lift you up to the next floor. Now go to the 
window that your boss didnt close and open it so you can climb in to the 
building when you are in, take the plastic bag from the waste basket. Then 
walk around on the carpet until you feel something under your feet then (ope-
rate carpet) to get the key. Then walk to the toilet and open the cupboard 
and get the insecticide out of the cupboard, then open the door to the WC and 
take the flag on the floor. When you got the flag go to the sink and fill the 
bucket with water. When you filled the bucket go back into the first room and 
put the full bucket on the boss's door. Then open the door on your right and 
the boss will come out just to get the bucket full of water in his head. In 
the mean time you slip through the door you just opened. The first thing you 
do is to examine the desk drawer and take the paper, you see a map on your 
right and to the left there is a bookcase with 4 cupboards at the bottom and 
4 at the top, if you unlock cupboard number 3 from the map you will find a 
typewriter.Examine the typewariter and you will get a 5 digits code, write it 
down because you will need it later in the game. Now go the map and examine 
it, when you haved examed it you will get copy of it in the upper left corner
, find the little hole in the map and put the flag you got into the hole, 
then the map on the wall will slide open and behind it there is a passage. Go 
into the passage. You now stand in a room, where the roof is moving downwards 
to crush you like a bug. Now did you write down the 5 digits code because you 
need it now. There is one door in the room and to the right there's a keypad, 
examine keypad so you can see the keypad on the screen, then you need to ope-
rate one (1) digits at the time. if the code is 40315 you need to do like 
this.

                          operate 4 on the keypad
                          operate 0 on the keypad
                          operate 3 on the keypad
                          operate 1 on the keypad
                          operate 5 on the keypad

It's wery important that you choose OPERATE every time you press a key on the
keypad. If you was fast enough the roof will move up and the door will open 
so you can continue your quest. Walk through the door and turn right then you 
will enter a room with a big machine in the center of the room, you examine 
it and find out that it is a photocopier and there is a opening in it, if you
're smart you put your paper in the opening and press the green button on the
photocopier. Then press the red button,if it says 'nothing happend' then just
press it again and again until you get a document, then the alarm goes off.
Hurry get the document and go into the transporter (white circle on the floor
) before the guard comes and shoot your brain out.


                          THE SWAMP & THE VILLAGE

Here you are in the middle of a swamp, what now?, you can't stay here so walk
to the left, but beware if you walk outside the GREEN land. You will just be 
another hero that failed. Walk over to the mosquitoes, stop before you enter
the swarm, then use the insecticide and the swarm will disapear, continue to 
the left and when you are near the tree in the left side of the screen, you 
will see a blink on the ground. Examine the ground and you will find a pen-
dant, pick it up and continue left and you will enter a lakeside. Here you go 
right over to the tree in the upperleft corner and examine the tree-foot, you 
will find a hole, and in it there is a rope you take the rope. Now you need 
to climb the tree so try and use rope on tree branch. Then you will climb the 
tree, you were about to fall asleep when a guy enter the screen, he takes his 
clothes off and jump in the water, you climb down the tree and if I was you I
'd pick up his clothes, you put on the clothes and now you are ready to enter 
the village. When you enter the village walk to the chickens and then go left
, then you will enter a clearing in the wood with a tree in the middle. Walk 
over to tree and shake it (operate tree), then a silver coin falls out of the 
monks habit, that is hanging in the tree. Take the silver coin, and walk to 
the INN open the door and enter. Give the silver coin to the innkeaper and he 
will give you some food and while you are eating you listen to the conversa-
tion from the other table. When you are finished eating, walk to the castle, 
and show the pendant to the guard, he will take you to his master. When you 
are on your way out the guard is sleeping on his post, take his lance and go 
back into the woods where you got the silver coin. Here you uses the lance to 
get the monks habit, when you got it you will run behind a tree and change to 
the monks habit. Then walk back to the village and go down then you will en-
ter a path that leeds to a big wolf. Examine the wolf and you will see a 
glint, try examine the glint and you will find out that the wolf is mechani-
cal, what is the best thing you can use to destroy an electronic wolf...WATER
...ofcourse. Run back to the lakeside and fill the plastic bag with water,but
hurry back to the wolf because the plastic bag is leaking. If you make it 
throw the plastic bag at the wolf and the wolf will disapaer in a flash of
light. Now go to the monastery, open the door and enter the monastery, you'll 
be tempted to go right into the transporter in the center of the room but don
't. Instead follow the monks in there route and when you come to the door on 
the right, open the door and enter, it's the supervisors room and he look at 
you and ask you to get him a cup of chikapok. Leave the room and follow the 
monks in there route to the door on your left. Open the door and enter. In 
here you will find a cup, take the cup and leave the room and walk with the 
monks until you reach the door in the middle. Open it and enter, here you'll 
find a lot of barrels examine the barrels to find one that is full and fill 
the cup with wine. Leave the room and go to the supervisors room, give him 
the cup. He drinks it and says it's not chikapok i get my own...... then he 
drops dead drunk. Examine him and you will find a remote device, use the re-
mote device on the wooden box under the library. The box opens and you find 
a magnetic card that you take, now go back to the wine cellar and use remote 
device on the barrel that is on top of the ladder. The barrel will open and 
you descover a passage behind it. Go through the passage and you will enter a 
lab just like the one behind the map in the office, except that here is a 
glass case with a woman inside and a consule. Examine the buttom of the glass 
case and you will find a gas capsule. You take it and then go to the consule 
and insert the magnetic card in the consule. Then the glass case will open 
and Lane will be free. You show her the pendant so she knows that you are a 
friend. Lane begins to type on the consule and then she transport you and 
herself to her father, from here on there will be a lot of text reading..  
Zzzz Zzzz. After you read all the text you will be transported to the future 
together with lane.


                               THE YEAR 4315

You stand in the middle of the ruin's of a city, Lane is gone so you have to
handle this all by yourself. Walk down to the right corner and examine the 
rubble and you will get a blow-torch. Go back to the center of the screen, 
then go right to the next screen, continue right until you're stopped by a 
wall. Then go up then left, if you examine the ground you will see two 
rubbles, go to the smallest one and here you examine it again. Then you will 
find a box of fuses, you take the box of fuses. Now go to the other rubble 
and remove the earth (operate rubble) then you will find a manhole open the 
manhole and enter. Inside the towns sewer system you just follow the ledge 
until you come to a place where you have to turn left then right on the same 
screen. Here you will find a tap on the wall, fill the blowtorch with gas and 
you can continue your quest. When you come to the room where a creature is 
about to eat a woman & her child, burn the creature with the blowtorch and it 
will go back in the sewage and the woman and the child is safe. They thank 
you and give you the way to the council. She pulls up a remote device that 
opens a hole so you can climb back to the surface When you are back on the 
surface the hole closes, and in front of you there is a building with a door 
and a camera above it. Go to the door and use the lance to remove the dirt 
from the camera the door opens and you go in. Inside you go straight for the 
newspaper machine, and you examine the coin collector and find a coin. Now 
you put the coin in the money-slot but nothing happends. Examine the coin 
collector again and you will get the coin back then put it back in the money-
slot this time it should work, and if it does you get a newspaper. Wait for 
the train to arrive and enter the train, then you will be transported to the 
shuttle-port. Here you go over the the desk and talk to the hostess, she will 
proberly say 'just a minute cant you see am busy' just keep talking to her 
and you will get some info about the price and how you can pay for the flight
. But you don't have any money so you have to figure out a way to get on the 
plane without the inspector stops you. You look around and see a TV floading 
in the air, the TV is turned off so you examine it and find out that there is 
no buttons on it, what a shame. But don't cry, go down to the toilet and exa-
mine the box on your left, its a fuse-box and if you examine the fuses you'll 
see that one of the fuses is burned out. Replace it with the one you have and 
go back up to the hall, now the inspector is watching the TV, now you just 
have to go up the stairs and you will be on your way to PARIS IV. If the 
guards stops you and ask you for your ticket, go back to the toilet and take 
the fuse out of the fuse-box and then replace it again, then go back up again 
and try to go up the stairs, if he stops you again you just have to go back 
to the toilet again and do the same as last time. Now you're on the way up 
the stairs and enter the plane. The door closes and the plane takes of, now 
you just have to wait til you get to PARIS IV, but no the plane is attacked 
by the grughons, you pass out and when you wake up you will be in a small 
room. You examine the room just to find out that there is no escape, but wait 
what is that on the wall an air duct, use your key to remove the grille from 
the air duct, then put the gas capsule in the air duct and then use the news-
paper to blok the air duct so the gas dont enter the room. After a while the 
door opens and you go into the other room, Yeah you killed the grughons, sud-
denly a screen is lowered from the roof and a voice says 'surrender Grughons 
we have you in our tractor beam'  hurra you been rescued. at this point there 
will be a lot of text reading.  Zzzz Zzzz When you enters the game again you 
will be transported 68 millions year back in time.


                                CRETACEOUS

Go down to Lo'ann and you will get an airgun then follow her to the left then
you will be on a ledge looking down on a Grughon ship, to late they already
set the bomb to explode. Earthlings earthlings shoot them, shit they seen you
. At this time you have to play all by yourself because I can't control the 
mouse for you, you have to shoot the Grughons with the mouse. Good Luck! When 
you have shot all the Grughons, Lo'ann will be shot by a Grughon that has
survived, you shoot him with your airgun. You examine Lo'ann and find out 
that she's still alive, examine her until you find a pill and her pendant, 
then use the pendant to transport Lo'ann back to the year 4315. When you've
done that you will go down to the Grughon's ship. Here you are standing in 
front of the ship with a dead Grughon under the ship examine him and you will 
get a magnetic card, then enter the ship and you will be in the control room.
You look around and you see a card reader on the wall next to the door, put
the magnetic card in the card reader, the card reader will light up and you
get the card back. Now go to the case and operate it, then it will open. Take
the garment that is on the case and go to the camera, then put the garment
over the camera. Then go back to the case and enter it, then operate the case 
again and the lid will close, then the ship takes of to fly back to the Gru-
ghon's space station.


                           GRUGHON SPACESTATION

When you land in the Grughon space station walk to the card reader and eat 
the pill, wait for the guards to enter the room, then go out the door and you 
will leave the ship, on the hangar floor walk down and hide behind the boxes, 
but beware do not get to close to the guards because then they will feel you, 
and you will be caught. When you are behind the boxe's, walk to the big box 
and examine it, it's open. Operate the box and you will enter the box. Then 
you will find yourself in a storeroom, and suddenly Albert II will talk to 
you and he says that you have six minutes to reprogram the master computer, 
well go to the door then you enter a hallway, once again you need to play by
yourself. You have to find the master computer room on the last floor. When 
you found it, go to the consule and insert the magnetic card in the consule 
then Albert II will take over. When he's is done go out into the hallway a-
gain, this time you need to find the medical hangar to escape.

@endnode

@node g2 "Goblins 2"
@next g3
@prev fu


                                 Goblins 2


                        (F)= Fingus     (W)= Winkle

                                  VILLAGE
                               
Stand (F) by BOTTLE and send (W) over to steal the Notable~s SAUSAGE. When 
the Old men are laughing get (F) to steal the BOTTLE. GO TO:

                                 FOUNTAIN
                               
(F) operates Fountain and (W) holds Bottle in JET OF WATER. He then uses 
Bottle on the Frog and picks up STONE. Before leaving this screen knock on 
DOOR and talk to Wizard.  GO TO:

                                  VILLAGE
                              
Get (F) to use BOTTLE on FLOWERS and pick one. Stand (W) on mat to the left 
of the SWITCH. (F) activates the switch and (W) is catapulted onto the roof, 
he should then be positioned above the SAUSAGE. (F) gives the FLOWER to the 
Notable who falls asleep leaving (W) free to steal the SAUSAGE. GO TO:

                                 FOUNTAIN
                              
Get (F) to use STONE on MECHANISM and then use him on RUNG. While the ladder 
is down get (W) to climb into the chimney, he should then be thrown out and 
the DOOR is opened. (If the door isn~t opened,annoy the Wizard again and re-
peat above.) GO TO:

                                   HOUSE
                              
Talk to the Wizard for information. Stand (W) on the TAIL of the Tiger rug 
and have (F) waiting by it~s head, when the jaws open get (F) to collect the 
MATCHES. Get (F) to use BOTTLE and MATCHES on KETTLE and wait for it to boil. 
Blow the KETTLE out and take the SPRING KEY. Stand (W) under the CUCKOO CLOCK 
and get (F) to wind it using the SPRING KEY twice. When the BIG KEY is re-
vealed get (W) to use the stone on it and it will fall to the floor. Get BIG 
KEY and GO TO:

                                 FOUNTAIN
                              
Get (W) to open CELLAR DOOR and (F) to take the WINE. GO TO:

                                   GIANT
                             
Get (F) to stand behind the CHICKEN and (W) to grab it. While (W) has the 
chicken by the neck, (F) uses the SAUSAGE on it~s HEAD. Pick up the EGG. 
Stand (W) by the DOG and get (F) to use the SAUSAGE on the RUT, this will 
stun the Dog allowing (W) to walk past. Send (W) down the hole in the tree 
and then send both of them back up the newly revealed tunnel. (F) uses the 
MATCHES on the WOODPILE and then the EGG on the FIRE. When the GIANT wakes 
up this allows (F) to give him the WINE and the SAUSAGE. GO TO:

                                 TRENCH  
                              
GET (F) to enter the TOWER and he will throw a bomb out, stand him by the 
BOMB. Get (F) to hold the bomb and (W) to light it, the BOMB will then be 
thrown at the GUARD, who will disintegrate. Repeat this process using (W) to 
get the BOMB and (F) to throw it, this should make the carpet fly into the 
air and be caught by the hand. Send (F) to get another BOMB and have (W) 
light the BOMB as before. The hand will now drop the CARPET and this will 
allow you to talk to SOKA. GO TO:

                                   TOM
                              
Get (W) to throw the STONE at the BALL which will fall to the ground and get 
taken by a small boy. This next part requires good timing! Send (W) through 
the house where the little boy is and at the same time send (F)through the 
top right hand door. If this is done right you should be able to snatch the 
BALL back. Stand (W) underneath the BASKET and get (F) to give the ball to 
the BASKETBALL PLAYER who will throw it. As the ball reaches the NET click 
(F) on it and he should head it and disturb the MAYOR who you should talk to. 
GO TO:

                                   KAEL
                              
Get (W) to use the BOTTLE on the NYMPH to wake her up. (F) uses the BOTTLE on 
KAEL and walk onto his hand when invited. Stand (F) on the rock under the 
BRANCH and get (F) to shake it. (W) should be hurled onto the tree next to 
(F). Get (F) to stand on the rock and (W) to shake the BRANCH. (F) should 
then catch the FLOWER which he should use on the STONE to collect the HONEY 
off the BEE. STAND (F) on the big rock to the left of the STONE and get (W) 
to lift the STONE. As soon as the BEE emerges click (F) on it and he should 
be airlifted next to the nymph. Give the HONEY to the NYMPH and she will in-
dicate the MUSHROOM. Take the MUSHROOM and get (W) to knock on VIVALZART'S 
DOOR and show him the MUSHROOM. GO TO:

                                VIVALZART 
                              
Get (W) to put the MUSHROOM in the MACHINE and get (F) to switch it on. Get 
(W) to take a worm from the JAR and then stand him by the SWITCH under the 
KINDELIXIR. Stand (F) on the trapdoor underneath the VULTURE. Get (W) to ac-
tivate the SWITCH and throw the WORM to the VULTURE. The VULTURE will drop 
(F) who should have nicked a PIECE OF MEAT. The MEAT should be given to the 
PIRANHA who will spit out a BONE. Stand (W) on the bin next to VIVALZART and 
get (F) to give him the BONE. (W) should now be able to collect the KINDE-
LIXIR and remove the PEG from the tubing. Both goblins should now collect 
some of the dripping potion in the BOTTLE and drink it. GO TO:

                                 MUSICLAND
                              
Get (W) to put his hand into the HEADLIGHT, he should then use the DRUMSTICK 
he got on the HOOD. Get (F) to jump on the spring (left of the screen), while 
this is going on (W) once again puts his hand into the HEADLIGHT and this 
time retrieves a BICYCLE PUMP. Stand both Goblins on the spring but only let 
one of them activate it. If this is done right a DOOR should open, send one 
of the Goblins through and get the other one to use the PEG on the base of 
the HOSE at the bottom left of the screen. Send (W) through the right hand 
HOLE and he should appear above the SAXOPHONIST. Get (F) to talk to the GUI-
TARIST, when he plays a note it will float next to (W) who should use the 
BUTTERFLY NET on it. Get (F) up to where (W) was and get (W) to use the BI-
CYCLE PUMP on the SAXOPHONIST. (F) should then be able to catch the MOSQUITO. 
Get (W) to use the MOSQUITO on the HEADLAMP allowing (F) to catch the last
note needed for the MELODY. GO TO:

                                    TOM
                              
Put the MELODY in the DOOR at the bottom left and go up to the CLOCKMAKER'S 
who will give you an HOURGLASS. GO TO:

                                  TRENCH
                             
Use the HOURGLASS on the TRENCH and cross the magic bridge. GO TO:

                                  GUARDS
                             
Get (F) to pick up the MAYONNAISE and use it near GROMELON , the container 
should end up on the floor. Next get (W) to stand near GROM while (F) climbs 
up onto the ledge above, him click him onto the MAYONNAISE and he should jump 
on the tube allowing (W) to steal the SWORD. Get (W) to activate RUSTIK and 
while his mouth is open get (F) to pinch his CHEWING GUM which comes in very 
handy for taking an IMPRINT from the LOCK. GO TO:

                                   FORGE
                             
Give the BLACKSMITH the CHEWING GUM and SWORD.Get (W) to use the STOOL on OTO 
while (F) waits to grab hold of the LANCE which will throw him past allowing 
him to jump up and down on the BELLOWS. Go to the BLACKSMITH take the KEY and 
the ANVIL Get (W) to use the MAYONNAISE on FOCUS when he~s done this (F) 
should be able to steal a piece of meat. GO TO:

                                  GUARDS
                             
Get (F) to use the MEAT on AMIDAL and pinch his FALSE TEETH. Use KEY on the
CHEST and give each Goblin a DIVING SUIT. GO TO: 

                                   WELL
                             
Get (W) to enter the TUNNEL and he will activate a door in the side of the
monster. Get (W) to lift the HATCHET and (F) to quickly press the revealed
BUTTON. This should now have opened the DOOR in the monster.Stand (W) by the
newly opened Door and send (F) into the TUNNEL. As soon as the button is
pressed send (W) into the DOOR. If you have done it in time it should appear
as though the monster is talking. SCHWARZY will be so frightened that (F) will
be able to use the STOOL on him and hook him up on the HOIST. Get (W) to use
the FALSE TEETH on him and quickly throw the ANVIL at him before he gains his
footing. Enter the open well and GO TO:

                                  MERMAID
                              
Get (F) to go into the HOLE past the OCTOPUS and send (W) to stand by the
SHELL. When they are in position get (W) to throw the SHELL up and if you're
in time you should be able to get (F) to catch it and leave it on the ledge..
Send (W) up onto the ledge by the SHELL and get (F) to use the STOOL on the
SEAHORSE.Get (F) to rummage in the CAVITY and a GLOVE should appear below (W)
who should use this moment to drop the SHELL over the GLOVE.Jump (W) down off
the ledge and pick up the GLOVE and STARFISH. GO TO:

                                   WRECK
                            
Send (W) through the DOOR. Get (F) to light the LAMP and go straight up the
mast to collect the LAMPFISH which should be used on the area marked ???. Get
(F) to stand on the big shell underneath the statue and send (W) to activate
the LAMP and then the RUDDER. (F) will be thrown upwards next to the STATUE.
Get (W) to use the STARFISH on the chest and whilst the CHEST is open get (F)
to activate the STATUE and then take the SWORD which he can use on the SKULL
to obtain a DIAMOND. GO TO:

                                  MERMAID
                              
Send both Goblins up on the SEAHORSE. Put the GLOVE over the BLOB~S head and
send (F) to grab the BOTTLE which will reveal a parchment. Get (W) to do the
same and he will get a PEARL from the BOTTLE. Give the PEARL and DIAMOND to
the MERMAID and she will open half the DOOR.Give the PARCHMENT to the OCTOPUS
and he will open the DOOR fully. Collect the GLOVE and the STOOL and GO TO:

                                 STOREROOM
                             
Get (F) to activate SWORDFISH and pick up the SALT.Get (F) to lift up the
COVER and (W) to use SALT on FELLOW. Collect FILE from the  POTS.  stand (F)
by the ROPE next to the pump and send (W) by the ROPE above the MEATBALLS.
Quickly get (F) to grab hold of ROPE and (W) to grab his. If you timed it
right (F) should be on the ledge next to COLIBRIUS. Use FILE on CHAIN and the
bird should fly away leaving you free to take a THUMBTACK.

Stand (F) behind the COOK and get (W) to sprinkle SALT onto the MEATBALLS and
move to the ledge above the COOK. When the COOK is hoisted into the air get
(F) to use the TACK on the CRATE. When the COOK sits on the TACK one of the
MEATBALLS flies into the air, Get (W) to use the KINDELIXIR on the MEATBALL.
(you might need a few goes at this last section) GO TO:

                                  THRONE
                              
Take PEPPER. Get (W) to use the STOOL on the CORNICE click (F) on (W's) hands
and he should get a bunk up onto the ledge. Stand (W) by the eyeball on the
right and get (F) to activate the SWITCH. As soon as the hidden DOOR opens
send (W) through it. Get (F) positioned right by the TONGUE and send (W)
through the EAR. As soon as he enters the EAR activate the TONGUE. If your
timing is right (W) should steal the CROWN.

Get (F) to walk through the other EAR and get (W) to pull the TONGUE. If this
is done right a COCKROACH should appear. Get (W) to the ORIFICE on the left
and get (F) to use the GLOVE on the HOLE on the right. All being well you
should have a COCKROACH. Put the COCKROACH on the floor next to GLOTZIOK and
pour some KINDELIXIR over it.

Before you leave this screen you will need to catch another COCKROACH. GO TO:

                                  ARMOUR
                            
Collect FEATHER and use it on the PAINTPOT. Put COCKROACH by the HOLE and pour
PEPPER and KINDELIXIR over it. Get (F) to activate STONE (By tower) and knock
on the HELMET. Give the KING the CROWN, collect BUFFOON from the THRONE room
and return. Get BUFFOON to stand by the MACHINE. Stand both Goblins under the
MACHINE and get BUFFOON to activate it. Send BUFF. under MACHINE and GO TO:

                                 PARCHMENT
                             
Get (W) to use MATCH on the EYE. Get BUFF, to kick the EYE and let(F) pick it
up. Position (F) by the HANDLE and (W) by the POINT of the knife. Activate
them both quickly until they~ve moved the knife TWICE!! Pick up the BOOKMARK
and get (F) to use it on the CANDLE as a wick.Get (F) to use the SHARD on the
BEAM OF LIGHT and the CANDLE should ignite. Collect the WAX and use it on the
SEAL the make an imprint which is used on the LOCK. Take out the SEED and
plant it on the map where it says VILLAGE. GO TO: 

                                   PLANT
                              
Get (W) to go through the HOLE in the PLANT. Get (W) to open the STONE and 
give the BEAN to the MOLE.While they are struggling get (F) to pinch the MOLE
'S HAT. Position (F) by the MUSHROOMS and send (W) up the tree to use the 
MATCH on the APPLES. when an APPLE falls off get (F) to use the HAT on the 
APPLE and he should catch it. Use the APPLE on the plant HOLE and when BUFF 
eats a MUSHROOM both Goblins should follow his example. GO TO:

                                  TOYLAND
                             
Get (F) to activate the SKITTLES. Get (W) to wait by the STAR and when the
BALL is bouncing click him on the STAR and he will collect the BALL.Stand (W)
on the COVER (left) and get him to put the BALL down on it. Get (F) to jump
up and down on the loose flagstone (right). Collect another BALL and place it
as before and get (W) to stand on the SEE-SAW. Get (F) to activate the FLAG
again and (W) will end up on the rainbow. Press the LEFT FEELER and jump on
the BUBBLE.Get (F) to activate the FLAG again and both BUBBLE and (W) will be
blown across the screen. Collect PIN. Get (W) back up on rainbow (as before)
get (W) to activate the top FLAG and press the SWITCH,get (F) to activate the
FEELER. If you have timed this right BUFF will be trapped in a BUBBLE. Burst
the BUBBLE with the PIN and GO TO:

                                   PLANT
                              
Put BUFF on the CATAPULT. Get (W) to press the SWITCH. When the KEY emerges
from the statue get (F) to jump on the CATAPULT. If this is done right BUFF
gets Birdnapped. GO TO:

                                 MOUNTAIN
                            
Take STONE to third level by passing it overhead from one Goblin to the next..
Place one Goblin on the LION and get the other one to throw the stone. Go
through the HOLE and push off the HEAD. Come down and transport the Stone to
the second level. Put (W) on the LION and get (F) to throw the STONE and walk
onto the LION. Get (W) to push the HEAD and (F) should be catapulted onto the
floating ROCK. Move (F) to !!! and when the ROCK is at its lowest walk (W)
onto it. (It would be advisable to save the game at this point because if you
don't get the timing right you will have to start the whole screen over).Use
(W) on the SMALL ROCK and get (F) to walk over him to the cage. Get (F) to use
the FILE on the CAGE ; grab the KEY, go to the PLANT SCREEN , use the KEY on
the DOOR and GO TO:

                                LABORATORY
                               
Use MAGIC WATER on BUFF.GET (W) to take the PENCIL and use it three times on
the BLACKBOARD. Pick up the SPONGE. Get (F) to use the PENCIL on the PORTRAIT.
When the Wizard throws the BOOMERANG at him (W) has got to jump onto the CHAIR
and catch it. Put (F) by the side of the chair and send (W) over to use the
MUG on the Wizard. When the TOOTHPICK falls off the shelf by (F) get him to
use the BOOMERANG on it and this should retrieve it.Get (W) to use the TOOTH-
PICK on the SKELETON and then the sponge on the POOL that appears. Get (W) to 
blow on the PIPE and (F) to use the SPONGE on the SMOKE that appears GO TO:
                               
                             KINGDOM OF DEATH
                               
Stand (F) on eyeball (left) and get (W) to jump off platform !!! Collect the
MOUSE and let (W) use it on the MUD. As soon as the CROCODILE appears jump on
it . As (W) is airborne get (F) to use the BOOMERANG on TEETH ( (F) should be
positioned on platform !!!). If you timed it right AMONIAK will drop BUFF.
Before BUFF can be grabbed by the little Devil get (F) to jump off the plat-
form causing the eyeball to crush it.

Put the SPONGE on the ROCK (positioning is very important here!) Stand BUFF on
the eyeball, get (W) to jump off platform !!! and BUFF should land on the
SPONGE. While it is still dripping click (F) on the ROCK with his PENCIL. This
DOOR will only last a short time.Get (W) to turn the HANDLE and (Fanfares and
Fireworks) you've completed GOBLINS 2.

@endnode

@node g3 "Goblins 3"
@next go
@prev g2


                                 Goblins 3


                          SCENE 1 : FLOATING BOAT

Use the coin on the screw. Get the hook. Get the golf club. Go through the
door. Look through the chest twice.(Three times for comedy relief) Go back
through the door. Untie (Click on) the knot. Use the golf club on the parrot
in the pot. He will fall in the hole. Use the plunger on him. Use the hook
on the loop of rope hanging down. Make Blount stand next to the hook. Have
Chump "Use" the weight. Have Blount grab the umbrella that comes up. Have
Chump and Blount go through the door. Have Blount stand on the hand. Then
have Chump "use" the flagstone. Blount will bounce up. Grab the tooth.
Go to the barrel. Jump in. Use the umbrella on the hole. Use the tooth on
the rope. Cinema time...



                      SCENE 2 : BATTLEFIELD OF FREAKS


Get the umbrella. Use it on the hot air hole that takes you up to the idol
head. Look through the hole. Cinema of Wynonna. Go back down. Go up the
strairs and use the golf club on the eastermonst freak-thing (Hercules?)
He will be defeated. Do the same to the one next to him. Grab the biscuit.
Use the coin on the guy at the bottom. While he looks at the coin, whack
him with the club. Use the biscuit on the hat. Use the golf club on the
hat with the biscuit in it. Get the crumbs. Go around to the flagstone at
the top. Use it with Chump and Blount, springing them to the other side.
Have Blount stand to the rock. Use the crumbs on the guy you are now behind.
Whack him with the club. Get the shield. Use the shield on the branch to the
left. Use the hand on the guy blocking your way, NOT the guy in front of
the branch to the left. Whack him while he's distracted. Now, go behind the
guy in front of the branch. Use the pepper on him. He'll sneeze himself dead.
Get the stick-thing. Go up to the next guy blocking your way. "Use" Chump on
him. Pull his tongue. (Click on it) Go up and use the stick-thing on the
ladder. Position Blount next to the rock. "Use" Chump on the guy near Wynonna.
While he's reaching out, have Blount "Use" the rock. Cinema...



                          SCENE THREE : CAPTURED


Awaken with unknown red stuff..? Get the matches to your left. Use a match
on the "Rough Area" above you. (You will automatically walk there) It should
light the room. Get the ladle. Get the Scythe. Use the ladle on the bloody
words. Use the blood in the ladle on the pirate-freak's bottle. Use the
matches on the peg leg. Get the bottle. Use the scythe-piece on all the
will-o-wisp hiding places. Go to the clown hanging. Use the scythe-piece on
the syringe thing he has. Get the spectacles. Get the water that falls. Use
the water on the peg leg. You'll get the yellow will o wisp. Put the bottle
on the platform. Open the skull. Use the spectacles on it. Close the skull.
You should grab the will o wisp inside. Mixing the will o wisp colors in the
cauldron produces different screen colors, creatures, and items. try each
combination. In the green screen, get the cork from the hand. In the yellow
screen, push the button that emerges from the bloody letters. Get the mirror
that falls, and put it on the hand of the green screen. Take back the
spectacles from the skull. In one colored screen, a "Vampire walrus" (red)
will appear. Use the scythe-piece on it. In another screen, a weird skull,
(red & Blue) on a collumn will appear. Use the spectacles on it. Now put
ALL the will o wisps in at once. Cinema...



               SCENE FOUR : COUNTRYSIDE, INN, AND SWORD KNOB


COUNTRYSIDE : Get the two rocks next to you. Put Chump on the mouse trap.
Have Blount use the hand on the meat in the mouse trap. Put Blount on the
mouse trap. Have Chump jump down on to the meat. Blount will bounce up.
Have Blount talk to the princess and the king. Jump down. Use the bigger
of the two rocks you have on the thorn patch near the knight. Talk to the
knight. (Get memorum) Go right. Get the millstone next to the burning house,
and soak it in the basin near the big skull. The use the millstone (Now a
sponge) on the burning house and get the fork behind it. Use the fork to
get the meat in the mouse trap. Later, after getting the spiced meat
(paprika) [See INN], use the coin on the hole in the skull.(The ear hole).
Use the memorum on the water basin. Use the fork on the nostril of the
skull, and put the meat on it. The dragon will regain memory, and join you.
Get the coin back from the small hole. Go back to the captains place...

INN : Get the spoon. Use it on the rock at the entrance. Give the smaller
rock you found to Korin. Go through the fissure. Get a suggar. Go back
through the mug. Position Chump on the customers hand. Give the customer
the sugar. Chump will fly up, and pull down a leash. get the leash. Use the
plunger on the platform under Othello. Use the leash on the plunger. Get the
another suggar the same way as before.  Put Chump on the spoon. Use the sugar
on the spoon. Position Blount near the Captain's outstreched arm. Have Chump
sneeze the paprika. Go back to the Countryside, and deal with the dragon.
(See Countryside) Come back with the dragon, and climb the rope&plunger. Give
your coin to Othello. Use the key on the tiny door. Use the dragon on the tiny
door. Get the key back from the door, and trade it back for your coin. Give
the BILL from the tiny door to the Captain after talking to him once. Take the
letter. Look through Korin's Crystall Ball thing.

KORIN'S SWORD KNOB : Get gunpowder. Pluck hairs from little beast. Go through
the door. Get the wand beneath the monk. Use it in the rock above the monk.
Meet the ugly hoe, Ooya. Use the stick/wand on the conquistador skull. Get
the helmet. Use the rock on the tree stump. Use the helmet to collect some
birdlime. Use the rock on the Inca's flute. Take a tiny tube/ Use the rock
on the tube. Position Ooya above where the little beast is. Give the flute
to the Inca. Have Ooya jump on the vulture. (He'll get the magic bag) Have
Ooya cast a spell on the conquistador skull. Have Wynonna pick up a little
tube. Fill it with gunpowder. Use a wick (from the litlle beast) on it. Use
the rock on the parrot next to the litlle tube. Throw the dynamite at the
rock. Have Ooya cast a spell on the plant in the ground. Get a bamboo.
Repeat the process used to make the other dynamite (with the bamboo,) but
add birdlime at the end of the process. Light it. Throw it on part of the
building that Fourbalus is on. Keep doing this until the tower that
Fourbalus is on is utterly destroyed. Note : During the dynamite making
process you will run out of wicks.Simply have Ooya cast magic on the conquis-
tador's skull. You can use the haird as fuses. Have Wynonna talk to Fourbalus.
Cinema... Back to Blount... have Blount go through the passage near the
customer.



             SCENE FIVE : TOWN, GROCERY STORE, ALCHEMIST'S LAB


TOWN : Use the umbrekka on the opening in the grandmother's roof. Talk to the
grandmother, and get the hot water bottle. Use the hot water bottle on the
egg. Ring the doorbell. Do it again. You now have access to the Alchemist's
Lab. Use the Growixer [See Alchemist's Lab] on the bud, young plant, and
baby bird. Have Fulbert [See Alchemist's climb the floriane stalk, and get
the love letter when it falls. Have Fulbert climb the floriane stalk again,
and (Quickly) catch the floriane flower. Hold the love letter up to the
mirror to find out the formula for the last potion. Pull the lever. Jump
on the cannonball. Have Fulvert push the lever. Make Fulbert climb the
young plant. Use Fulbert as a bridge between rooftops, and get the Shoe Sole.
Go down the chimney to get back down. Use Fulbert as a bridge between
Grandma's house and the Bell. Blow the bird call [Grocery Store] on the
bell. Drink the Speedelixer [Alchemist's Lab] Have Fulbert again make
himself into a bridge, and cross over the tap the bird you hatched on the
shoulder. Rush down and grab the feather before it goes down the drain.
(You must be quick!!)

GROCERY STORE : Give the coin to the Grocer. Give him the Captain's letter.
After he knocks out the rat, get the egg & the key. Unlock the Moon Lamp.
Following your little transformation, pick up the cupboard. Jump off the
edge of the cornice. Get the hammer out of the broken cupboard. Use the
hammer on the Dresser. Get the Bird Whistle. Use the hammer on the Grocer.
Get the coin. Pick up the Night Stand, and have Fulberts [See Alchemist's
Lab] knock out the soap. Get the soap. Jump on the couch. Jump on the
spring. Hit the Gidoullie with the hammer. Get the horn. Have Fulbert press
the button. After the Ham-Bone has lowered into the pit, use the hammer on
the pit. Get the Bone. Get the spaghetti. Open the Kettle. Now, wasn't
that fun??

ALCHEMIST'S LAB : (This part is really annoying. Most of the items you have
to collect as you go about the town. If you lack any items, just check them
above. I've gone over the different potions one at a time)

                                 GROWIXER 
                                 
Turn op the Tap. Get the water, and put it in the Kettle. Put the spaghetti
in the kettle. Light the kettle with the lighter. Take out the cookedi
Spaghetti. Put the egg on the hot water bottle. Puck up the egg shell, and
put it in the pestle. Use the mortar on the pestle. Put the ground egg shell
on the floor. Put the horn in the ashtray. Light the horn with the lighter.
Get the horn. Put the burnt horn, cooked spaghetti, and ground eggshell into
the mixer. Press the button on the mixer. Feed the groxixer to the baby boa.
Redo all the steps above for the Growixer, then put it into one of the
bottles.

                                 SPEEDELIX 
                                 
Turn on the tap. Pick up the water, and put it in the kettle. Add the shoe
sole into the kettle. Light the kettle with the lighter, and get the cooked
shoe sole. Put the bone into the pestle. Grind it with the Pestle. Get the
ground crocomouth bone. Put the floriane bud into the still. Light the
still's burner. Put the floriane extract into the mixer. Add some ground
crocomouth bone, and the cooked shoe sole. Press the mixer button and put
the speedellixer into a bottle.

                                  FLYIXER 
                                  
Put the feather on the ashtray. Light the feather with the lighter. Get the
burnt feather. Put it in the mixer. Turn on the tap. Get some water, and put
it in the basin. Use the soap on the basin. Use the coin on the fan. Quickly,
use the key on the soapy water, and use the soapy key on the fan. Use the
memorum on the still. Then, use the lighter on the still burner. Now, pour
the tears of joy in the mixer. Press the mixer button. Put the flyixer in
a bottle.



                   SCENE SIX : THE SKY, COLOSSUS, BIZOO


THE SKY : Use the golf club on the fishing line. Get a bag. Get the knife.
Put the bag on the nacelle of the balloon. Cut the ballast with the knife.
Talk to Ooya. Use the pump next to the meteorogist. Have Ooya get on the
alloon when it comes by, floating him down an island. Have him cast a spell
on the tuft. Pump anoher balloon, and make Ooya cath it again, blowing you
down another island, to the bottom. Cast a spell on the stone near you.
Go back up the giant. Use the fishing pole you have on the corner of a
cloud above the giant. (And a little to the left) Pump up a balloon. Fly
as fast as possible to the cloud ove the giant and Ooya. Have Ooya get on,
and stab the cloud QUICKLY with the knife. Have Ooya, from his new position,
stand on the big, extint, geyser. Now have Blount cover up the souternmost
gyeser. ooya should fly up to where the meteologist is. Now, with the knife,
cut off all the ballast on the balloon. Have Ooya get in it. Now put bags
lowering it where Ooya can get off at the icy island. Use the telescope
[See Colossus] on the stain on the icy island. Have Ooya cast a speel on the
bug. She will join you. After attaching the worm [See Colossus] to the
fishing pole, use it on the hole in the clouds, to obtain a swordfish.

COLOSSUS (THE COUNTRY OF FOLIANDER) : Use the fishing pole to get the teles-
cope. Have Ooya stand on the shovel. Have Blount push the controls of the
catapult once. Have Blount look through the other telescope, not the
inventory one. Have Ooya cast a spell on the cheese. Now put Blount on the
catapult. Position it in the same place again, with Ooya. Now have Ooya cast
a spell on Colossus' trophy collection. Use the fishing pole on the worm.
Put the catapult back in it's original position. Push the top of the two
buttons. Now push the lower button twice. Look through the telescope (Not
the invetory one). Use the sawfish on the column. Get the gear. Use the knife
on the robot next to Fourbalus. Put the gear in. Get the pollen, and use it
on Colossus.

BIZOO : Go through the tooth. Put the toothpick in the right eye. Look in the
right eye. Go through the left ear. Pull the nose hair. Kick the grain of
sand and then go after it. Whenn Buggy Jr. comes up, whack him with the
toothpick. Repeat this with all the buggys. Sometimes Bizoo will talk while
going after the two girls, if so, just start over whacking them. He won't do
it twice. Now, pull the nose hair. Get the tear. Kick the grain again. [After
getting the polln from shadow-Blount] Click on the nose. Get on immediately
after being bounced off. Get the pollen. Put the toothpick in the nostril.
Put the pollen in the right ear. Use the neck. (It's to the right of the
right ear) Cinema...



                    SCENE SEVEN : QUEEN XINA, KING BODD


QUEEN XINA : Try to talk to Xina, which will make the man appear, with the
gun. After he shoots you, use the hammer on him. Talk to Xina until she
kisses you. QUICKLY grab the magic wand. Put Fulbert on the plate. Have
Were-Blount "Use" the vegetables. Quickly have Were Blount run up and use
the chandelier. Get the fennel. Use the axe [See King Bodd] on the pot.
Position Blount near thhe fireplace. Use Fulbert on the candleholder near
the queen twice, one to make the candle fall, another to make the skull
start to dangle in the air there. While the skull is dangling, get into
the fireplace. This is hard to time, I suggest saving first. You must time
it so that the thrown axe cuts off the dangling skull. Get the skull. Go
through the door. (Both Fulbert and Blount) Use Fulbert on the colonnade.
Have Were Blount try to catch the spectacles. QUICKLY, you must have Fulbert
RUSH down to the flagstone! There, he will catch the spectacles. Get them!!
Use them on the onion to get the onion. Now, put the candle in one of the
three candlestick holders. Light it with the wand. Each candleholder makes
up part of the sentence. Figure out the order, and light them in that order.
It's not hard. Go through the mouth to get to King Bodd's place. (After you
get the slipper at king Bodd, give it to Xina.)

KING BODD : Give the hand to Bodd. If you hate it, then use the union you
found [See Xina] on man the intrepid and take the axe. Use the fennel [See
Xina] on Fil. Give the gun to Tibo. Have Blount stand near on the chair
next to Bodd. Use Fulbert on the javelin. Have Blount jump on the chandelier,
This may take some timing, or just luck. Redo this until you finally jumo
with both of them. Talk to Wynonna. Get a plate. At this point you can go
back to Xina and get the skull if you want...[See Xina] to get back to Xina,
you must turn OFF the candles, and put together another sentence. It's pretty
easy. Just use the wand on the candles. After the mouth grows, you must use
the coin on the mouth so that Blount will go in. Give the skull t Bodd when
you get it. Getting the slipper is hard, but here's how : Make sure you have
a plate. Make sure Tibo has the gun. Make sure the Buffoon has the wand. Now,
put Fulbert near the hole full of cockroaches. Put Blount near the Buffoon.
Use Fulbert on the hole of cockroaches. As soon as Bodd starts whacking, use
the plate on the Buffoon. As soon as possible, use Blount with the chandelier,
and grab the slipper. Having Tibo hit the slipper out of Bodd's hand may
require some timing. I do suggest saving first, so you don't have to get
another plate each time. Now, give the slipper to Xina. If you already gave
the skull to Bodd, you are done. You must also have talked to Wynonna-
Butterfly, though...CINEMA...



           SCENE SEVEN : STORY BOOK, CHESSBOARD, CHESSBOARD GAME


Go to the Story Book place first, trough the telescope...

STORY BOOK : Bounce three times on the geometry book. Get the arrows. Use
them on the book (The Tree). Get the bowman. Get the ink brush. Use Fulbert
on the spider web. While the spider is distracted, have Were Blount walk by,
and get the statue. The use the axe on the long wooden peg. Get a wood block.
Distract the spider again the same way. Have Were Blount on the falling dust.
The sneeze will blow stuff EXEPT THE ZERO. Then, click Were Blount on the
spider. He'll do nothing, but leave him there. Now, use Fulbert on the 
midnight painting. Get the dropped number. Put it in the ink bottle. Go into
the sculpting book, and get the compass. Use compass on the sheet of paper
next to the book. Get the eight. Put it in the ink bottle. Use the ink brush
on the ink bottle. Distract the spider with Fulbert again. Have Were Blount
go past him. Use the brush on the wagon picture. Use the coin on the wagon.
Get a block of marble. Get your coin back. Go into the drawing book, and
get the chalk. Go down to the story book. Flip the page to page two. Use
the ink brush on the page. Talk to the knight inside the castle. Give him
the horse statue. Take him. Flip the page. Use the ink brush on this page
twice. Get the mini-mandolin. Go back to the Chessboard screen.

CHESSBOARD : Use the chalk on the wood block. Use the compass on the block
made of marble. Click the left hand on the wood chisel, then have the
right hand use the hammer on the left hand holding the chisel. Pick up the
carving, and drop it in paint. Use the ink brush on it. Pick it up and place
it. Do the same thing for the block of marble, except instead of the wood
chisel, use the plain chisel, that looks kinda a nail. Repeat the Paint and
ink process, and place it. Yu are now ready to play. SAVE. Play by clicking
on the board.

CHESSBOARD GAME : This is pretty easy. Have the two hands both use the balls.
They should begin to juggle the balls. One will hit the pig, cracking it.
Drop the coin in the pig. Play the big mandolin by picking it uo with the
RIGHT hand, and playing it with the LEFT hand. This should freak out Othello.
Leave him there. Now, move your lover and knight anywhere but where they are.
Now move the bowman into their original positions. He should shoot the two
lancers next to the chaperon. Move the killer around the Chaperon, to the
lever, wich will be automatically pulled. Maneuver the knight into the two
squares next to the King, but not the one with the axe in it. Put the bowman
into the square two squares to the right of the southwesternmost square. Now
Put the Killer in the axe square. The King should die. Now put the freaked out
Othello on the blue square to the right of the Chaperon, scaring the Chaperon
off. Now put the Lover on the square used to be on. Give him the small
mandolin to play. Wynonna should come out. Now move the bowman to the square
where he will shoot the key loose. you win!!! 



               SCENE EIGHT : THE MIRROR ROOM, AND THE BRAIN


THE MIRROR ROOM : Get the egg. Use the egg on the mirror of time. Put the baby
chicken in the passage. Have Mirror-Blount get the baby chinken. Use the baby
chicken on the thin mirror. Put the chicken back in the passage, and have
Blount get it. Use the thin baby chicken on the small hand hole. Now use the
baby chicken on the fat mirror twice. Give the Fat Baby Chicken to mirror
Blount. Have Mirror Blount use the baby chicken on the Large Hand Hole. Put
the fat baby chicken in the thin mirror (Only once). Give the baby chicken
back to Blount. Use the baby chicken on the mirror of time. Use the Hen on the
Fat Mirror. Use the Grain of Folly on the Old Demon. [See the Brain] have
Mirror Blount get the ugly extract. Have Blount use the Beauty ointment [See
the Brain] on the mirrir of beauty. Then immediatly have Mirror Blount use the
ugly extract on the Mirror of Ugliness.

THE BRAIN : Have Were Blount hit the window of memorys. Have Blount pull the
switch until Colossus apears on the window. Have Were Blount hit Colossus.
Pick up the grain of sand. Have Were Blount pull the lever. (NOT the switch)
twice (Until it points the cart toward the lake of vision). Have Were Blount
and Blount use the cart. Have Were Blount jump intro the lake. Use the grain
of sand on the lake. Have Were Blount jump on the flagstone, then ride the
Cart again. Quickly, have Were Blount jumo on the flagstone, pull on the lever
once, and ride the cart. Hit the imprisoned dragond decoy. Jump down through
the well. Repeat all that crap again with Blount this time, and get the dragon
decoy. Use the Growixer on the bud. Use Fulbert on the plant. Use the dragon
decoy on the auditory something. Use the Growixer on the dragon. Use the decoy
on the fence of modesty. Then use the decoy on the pool of dreams. Get the
key. Use the key on the locked chest. Get the beauty ointment from the chest.
Use Blount on the dragon. Use the Fat Hen [See Mirror Room] on the grain.
Get the grain of folly.



                 SCENE NINE : THE FINAL LEVEL OF THE GODS


GODS : This is simple, but it takes quick reflexes. se the axe on the fence.
Use the hammer on the brick wall. Ring one of the bells. As soon as the hand
grabs the chain, run to ring the other bell. After the pool drains, click on
the CHAIN. Get the score. Drop it back into the pool. Repeat the hand process,
except this time, click on the BASIN not the CHAIN. You will get two scores.
Put the red score on the demon's stand, and they yellow score on the angel's
stand. Talk to the positve pole of divinity or whatever. Get the time yarn.
Walk up to the fallen angel. SAVE! Use the coin on the halo. As son as the
musical note reaches the pool, click up you inventory, and use the hammer
on the cloud next to the demon. As soon as the notes asre together, click
up your invemtory and use the yarn on both notes. As soon as they are tied
up, click on whatever bell you are closest to. Then, as fast as possible,
rush to the other bell, and ring it, summoning the other hand. YOU WIN !

@endnode

@node go "Gold Rush"
@next gu
@prev g3


                                 Gold Rush


This adventure starts out in Brooklyn. The first thing you do is type
"Sell house". After typing this you must immediatly go and enter your
house. Once you get in your house you must look at the photo album and get
the pictures from it. Then you must go over to the desk and close it. Get
the bank statement and look at the bank statement. You will recieve points
for this. After this leave your house, go to the park and get a flower. Be
sure not to walk on the grass because this will cost you points. The
proceed to the Guzzebo(close enough)and look in the cracks. You will then
discover a gold coin. Be sure to get this item for it is necessary to
obtain it to win. Then go back to your house and wait untill you see a man
holding some green money. Talk to him and he will give you money for your
house. After getting the money go to the post office and ring the bell.
When the mailman comes ask for mail. Then get the letter and open it. Read
the postmark and get the stamp. Then read the letter. After doin this
proceed to the bank and withdraw your money. THe account number is written
on the bank statement. Go then and go to the stagecoach ticket office. Buy
a ticket there. This will take you there BY WAGON!!!(Not by Boat)After you
buy the ticket go to the graveyard. Proceed to the second grave and look at
your parents graves and drop the flowers there. Then go to your bosses
office. Go upstairs and look at the clippings. Then go down stairs and
quit your job. Then go to the livery shop and talk to the man in there. Be
sure not to get kicked by the horse fo this will cost you your life. Then
show that man your ticket and get on the wagon. And your on your way to
Cali!!!

Ok the stage coach will bring you to a ferry, and the ferry will take you to
New York from this place you will go to Mississippi Valley. Here you go and
talk to a group of men and one of these men he will ask for money be sure to
give him all of your money.. He will also send you to get good animals to
pull the wagons. From here go right and talk to a man who is sitting by a
tree reading a book he will give you the book(Bible). From here you go left
then down. Talk to the man there and ask to buy mature oxen. Then go back
to your camp and talk to captain again and he will give you another
assignment. The assugnment is to find out when to take off or leave. Go
right from here then go up adn look at the grass it will give you a report
on how the season grass is looking. Once it says it is drying out go talk
to your captain and you will leave from there.

Once you are on your way to California you will travel for a while through a
few states it wil give you general info about them. Once you get somewhere
near California you will be stopped at a hill. You will be shown outside
your wagon. You will have to quickly tie the chains. Then you must untie
the oxen. They will go down the hill then return back up. You are now on
your way again and wont be stopped until you hit a desert. Here you must
look in barrel and drink the water from it. Then you must look inside the
wagon and eat the meat. Be sure to go right from here and catch your men.
You will soon be at Fort Sutter...

Once you reach Fort Sutter you must eneter it. Not the Mule Corral. Once
in here you must find the supplie shop. You must buy a shovel. Then you
will be able to dig for the gold. But don't leave sutters for yet...you
must first go to the blacksmith's shop and talk to him. He will ask you a
few quetions

The Answers are:
Yes
Yes
Last name:Wilson
First name:Jerrod
Brothers name:Jake

Now the blacksmith will give you a branding iron. This will be needed later
in the game. From here exit the Fort and goto the Amerincan river to the
right. Keep heding along the river and dig on the land. This takes a very
long time so don't get discouraged. You must head several screens to the
right in order to find the gold. After discovering gold about 40 times you
will hit a sudden dry spell. THis mean that there is no more gold to mine.
So go back to Sutters Fort and buy a Lantern and a Pan. The pan is just for
extra points. Then go to THE MULE SHOP!!! not THE MULE CORRAL!! and buy a
mule. After buying the mule go to the Blacksmith's shop. Heat your Iron
and brand the mule. Then go to the semetary. Read all the graves untill
you find Marshall Wilson's grave. Here there will be a seperate screen that
shows you his grave. you will be able to type here. Type Use letter and
move it arround untill it says Hey stop there. Then follow its directions.
From here take your mule to the corral. Drop him off here. Then you get
another mule. Look at its brand if it looks the same as yours then keep
him. This mule will be a trusty spirited mule. Take the mule with you to
the Town around 23 screens to the right. Read your bible Psalm 23. Go tho
Green Pastures hotel and rent room 11. The man will give you a message to
give to the man in room 11. Go to room 11 knock on the door and give the
message to the man. He will leave the room. You will enter, Go to the
fireplace and turn the wheel. Enter the fireplace you will appear on the
other side in a room. Go to the window unlock it and open it. Go to the
table and read the letter. Get the magnet and the sting which is on the
floor. The bird will soon fly in and give the photo to the bird. He will
fly away you will here a slam. The bird will reappear you get the aerogram
and read it. Before you enter the fireplace again wait for another slam.
Once you here this you will be safe. Leave the room and go back to Fort
Sutter. Once you getc 2 East of Fort Sutter you must type follow mule. He
will lead you to Jake's Cabin. Eneter Jakes Cabin. Get the matches and
move the rug, then manuever your way through the bushes and then enter the
Jon.

Enter the hole in the Jon. YES I AM SERIOUS!!. Ok you will then go down
and find yourself in a pile of shit. Light your Match and light your
lantern. Then head to the left untill you come to a door. Tie the string
to the Magnet and put the magnet in the hole. Lower magnet. Raise magnet
and unlock door. Eneter the room to the other side. From here go down and
then go to your left. You will have to go down again. Down there you will
find a pick. use the pick a place in the room and you will stike
gold..twice. From here head back to the main ladder. Go up past the ledge
that you came from and you will notice a passage leading to your left. Go
to it and keep on going untill you get to another ladder goining down. You
will then come across another ladder going down. You must manuever down
this ladder. Be careful. Here you must go left again and you will find
Jake. He will tell you a story and then you must use your pick in the
highlighted area. You will strike it several times. Keep digging untill a
hole appears. Digg untill it gets even bigger and then you enter the hole
with your brother. Let the game do the rest.

@endnode

@node gu "Guild of Thieves"
@next ha
@prev go


                          Guild of Thieves      


You thought you knew everything there was to know about stealing treasures,
right? WRONG! Here you are in a rickety old boat with the master thief who
tells you that you are a rank amateur and you have to PROVE yourself!

Oh well, let's show the old geezer what we're made of. Now hold on. You
don't want to get wet, so don't just recklessly head off West. See that
rope? The rope is about two meters long, right? Well your legs AIN'T, so
PULL ROPE and then WEST and you'll save the bath for Saturday night.

Let's take a moment to see what provisions we have. You're carrying a Swag
Bag (look up Swag in your Oxford Dictionary). OPEN BAG THEN LOOK IN IT will
show you that you have the indispensable tool of all Adventurers, The Lamp!
LOOK IN POCKET and you will find that you also have a plastic card which
might come in handy later. Meager pickings, but we've started with less!
WEST again will take you to an area where you'll spot an old man struggling
along with a trunk. Remembering your lessons from ZORK III, you'd better
HELP MAN. In fact, if you don't, you'll never get into the castle and
you'll fail miserably! You and the old man will end up at the castle where
the gatekeeper will lower the drawbridge for the old man, who will disappear
inside with the trunk, never to be seen again. As a matter of interest,
before helping him, you might ask him about the trunk, the castle and the
baron. With the castle invitingly open, you can go NORTH where you'll be
met by the gatekeeper who will deposit you in the Entrance Hall. Along the
way, he will tell you about his favorite hobby, Rat Racing, and promise to
let you know when the race is about to begin. A couple of notes here. The
rat race is variable and will take place sometime in the next 20-60 moves.
You have to be either downstairs or in the corridor upstairs in order to
hear him shout at you. If you miss his warning, the race will take place
without you and you will not be able to win any money (which you need
desperately.)

This walkthru is written from a LOGICAL standpoint. There are faster ways
to complete the game without backtracking, but you would have to do things
without knowing WHY you were doing them.

Okay, we're alone now, so let's start exploring. Go WEST into the Lounge
and the only interesting thing you'll see is a bucket. LOOK IN BUCKET and
TAKE COAL that you'll find there. BREAK COAL and you'll discover a fossil.
Not the most exciting thing in the world, but we'll keep it anyway. Now
SOUTH to the Gallery. Here we'll discover three paintings, each important
in its own way. EXAMINE PAINTINGS and TAKE OIL PAINTING since it's
described as a classic and is, no doubt, valuable. The watercolor depicts
an interesting scene -- keep it in mind for future reference especially the
words. The gaudy painting doesn't look like it belongs here. If you move
it, you'll discover a safe here; but since you are not, and never will be, a
safecracker, leave it alone. It's not important.

SOUTH again will take you into the Drawing Room. The red leather settee is
obviously out of place, and if you EXAMINE SETTEE you'll find a cushion.
OPEN CUSHION THEN LOOK IN IT and you'll find a Note. (Remember, this is a
British creation, a Note is money, not something you read!) TAKE NOTE then
go NORTH twice and EAST to the Entrance Hall. This is a good, central
location to dump stuff. Unfortunately, there is no Legless Horse in this
game, and the swag bag is definitely NOT bottomless. Going EAST will take
you to the Dining Hall where you'll see a Bear in a cage. Also in the cage
is a Platinum Chalice, and there's no question that THIS is a treasure!
Unfortunately the cage is locked, and the bear looks testy anyway so leave
it for now.

SOUTH again will take you to the Kitchen. The cupboard looks inviting, so
OPEN CUPBOARD AND LOOK IN IT and you'll find some rat poison and a jam jar.
TAKE ALL FROM CUPBOARD and head SOUTH again to the Servant's Quarters. OPEN
CABINET THEN LOOK IN IT and you'll find a key. TAKE KEY then SOUTH again to
the gatekeeper's Bedroom. If you LOOK UNDER BED you'll find a tub. OPEN
TUB THEN LOOK IN IT and you'll find a Maggot. Yeecchhh! But it must be
useful, so TAKE TUB.

About this time you should hear the gatekeeper shout that the rat race will
start soon. Go NORTH three times and WEST to the Entrance Hall. DROP ALL
BUT NOTE AND SWAG BAG. (You don't want the gatekeeper to know you're a
thief, do you?) Besides, if you try to pass the gatekeeper with any
treasures, the results will be fatal! Now SOUTH to the Courtyard. The
gatekeeper will begin setting up for the race, so WAIT. He will then ask
you if you'd like to bet and give you the odds. This MIGHT be a variable,
but every time I played, the Grey rat had the longest odds. In any event
bet on the rat with the longest odds (you need lots of money!). So BET ON
GREY RAT WITH NOTE. You'll be treated to an exciting description of the
first race at Santa Courtyard; but never fear, your rat will win.

The gatekeeper will give you a VERY dubious looking cheque (check to you
Americans), but it's all you'll get so settle for it. He will then depart,
leaving a birdcage behind. Leave it for now.

Time to explore some other areas and get some background on what's going on
here. Go SOUTH (don't ever spend more than one move at the Gatehouse unless
you are talking to the gatekeeper. He will escort you back to the Drawing
Room if you do. SOUTH and WEST twice to the Cave Entrance. Now GET LAMP
AND LIGHT IT, it gets pretty dark in these caves.

WEST again will take you to the Junction Chamber, from which all roads lead.
We'll try SOUTHEAST first. Here at the fork in the road you'll find an iron
gate to the southeast. OPEN GATE THEN SOUTHEAST and you'll see a
gravedigger plying his trade. Ignore him, he's pretty morose. EXAMINE YEW
TREE and you'll spot some berries. You might get hungry later so GET
BERRIES then NORTHWEST. Now SOUTH to the Undertaker's Parlor. It's locked
up tight (no, the key won't work here) but that shouldn't stop a Thief.
BREAK WINDOW and SOUTH and you're in! There's a casket here, which is
useless. You'll notice the counter has a flap in it, so LIFT FLAP and
SOUTH. The only thing of interest here is the Till. You'll find a button,
so PUSH BUTTON THEN LOOK IN TILL and you'll find a coin! GET COIN then
NORTH twice and WEST.

Here's the "Ba k of Ker vn a." If you READ NOTICE you'll find that the bank
is closed due to no business. Don't bother trying to break in. You can't.
We'll get it open another way. The bank is closed because the Thieves, who
used to deposit all their loot here, have gone away, and there's no
business. Maybe you can fix this. You'll also find a night deposit safe
here. What we are going to do is deposit all our treasures in the Bank in
the hopes that it will reopen.

Okay, now that you know what to do with your treasures, let's get down to
some serious hunting. From the Bank go EAST, NORTH, NORTHWEST to the
Junction. To the southwest you'll see some very large, substantial looking
iron bars blocking your way. Just for kicks, try BREAK BARS. Aha! Just as
you thought, the old Polystyrene-Bars-That-Look-Like-Iron trick! Now
SOUTHWEST and you'll find a skeleton. EXAMINE SKELETON and you'll find it
has one of its finger bones resting on a chest. Just to be safe, let's GET
FINGER AND CHEST. Then OPEN CHEST AND LOOK IN IT and you'll find a heart.
(Where ELSE would you expect a heart to be, but in a chest? Isn't British
humor wunnerful?)

Now go SOUTH and you'll find yourself up to your knees in a stream. Follow
it WEST to the Top of the waterfall. There's a rope ladder here and if you
EXAMINE LADDER you'll find it's tied in a tight ball. UNTIE LADDER and the
ladder will unroll. Don't bother going down -- there's nothing you can do
down there now.

Go EAST, NORTH, NORTHEAST then EAST four times then SOUTH to the Wheatfield.
You'll see a windmill operating in the distance. If you try to talk to the
Miller he won't hear you because of the windmill. So SHOUT HELLO and the
Miller will answer. Then SHOUT STOP WINDMILL and he'll shut it down.

Now SOUTH and sit down to talk with the Miller. He'll give you a piece of
gum which you should keep for future reference. If you ASK MILLER ABOUT
LUTE that he's playing with, he'll tell you that the salesman told him it
was magic. You can ask him about a few things you're interested in, and
eventually he'll tell you he's tired of the Lute and wants to sell it. BUY
LUTE WITH CHEQUE (careful of the spelling) and you'll be the proud owner of
a magical (?) instrument.

Lutes are VERY delicate, so PUT LUTE IN BAG and NORTH. Whooooops! It's a
good thing you protected the Lute, you clumsy oaf! Now WEST, NORTH four
times. As you go through the courtyard, you'll probably see a description
of fish jumping. Keep that in mind. In the Entrance Hall GET LUTE and DROP
LUTE, BERRIES, CHEST AND GUM. Now let's check out the upstairs.

UP and WEST will take you into the Library. EXAMINE DESK will show you a
paperback and a box. READ PAPERBACK and you'll discover that your instincts
were right: the fossil IS valuable. EXAMINE BOX and you'll find the
outlines of a heart, spade, diamond and club. Now OPEN BOX and inside
you'll find three cards and a joker. This is VERY IMPORTANT. Pay attention
to which suit is NOT represented in the box (it's a variable); this will
save your life later. You can DROP BOX because you won't need it anymore.
Now you can READ BOOK. You will get a variety of interesting topics, all of
them variable. Among them you should find one that tells you that rats
can't swim, another that tells you how to make a fishing pole out of a piece
of wood, thread and needle or pin. Many of the books will give hints as to
things to come in the game while others are useless.

When you're tired of reading, go EAST (ignore the bathroom to the North of
here), EAST and NORTH to the Billiard Room. GET CUE and then EXAMINE
BILLIARD TABLE. You'll see three balls of different descriptions on the
table. Now HIT (color) BALL WITH CUE. This may or may not be a variable
(it was always the Red ball in my game), but one of the balls will refuse to
go in a straight line. GET RED BALL (or whatever) AND OPEN IT and you'll
find a diamond! DROP BALL but keep the cue -- it's a multi-purpose tool!

Now EAST into the Music Room and you'll see an interesting stool. OPEN
STOOL THEN LOOK IN IT and you'll find a plastic bag. GET PLASTIC BAG THEN
EXAMINE IT and you'll find a valuable original manuscript! Now SOUTH twice
to the Spare Bedroom. There's a wealth of important stuff here. First LOOK
IN BED and you'll find a Sewing Box. GET BOX THEN OPEN IT and you'll see
some cotton with a needle. Now LOOK UNDER BED and you'll find a china pot.
GET POT. Now OPEN WARDROBE THEN LOOK IN IT and you'll see a designer dress.
TAKE DRESS. This throws a lot of people off the track. The china pot and
designer dress are BOTH treasures, even though they don't look like much.

We've looted this room pretty good so go NORTH, WEST twice and SOUTH twice
to the Main Bedroom. There is a strange looking painting over the bed, so
GET PAINTING THEN DROP IT. It's not valuable, but you'll see a hole in the
wall. Looking through the hole will show you a light a LONG way off, so I
wouldn't enter the hole if I were you. You need a way to get across the
chasm to the light. There's a mirror on the cabinet, so GET MIRROR and then
OPEN CABINET AND LOOK IN IT. You'll see a plaque there; and if you READ
PLAQUE, you'll find two buttons and the information that this is a folding
bed. Being a very ingenious kind of thief, you know immediately what to do,
right?

SIT ON BED. Now you can't reach the buttons from here, but remember the
cue? PUSH TOP BUTTON WITH CUE and Wheeee! You're in the Secret Laboratory.
If you LOOK IN CAULDRON you'll find a sachet. EXAMINE SACHET and you'll
find that you better not open it until you're ready to use it. Since you
have no idea what it's good for, better leave it for now. There's only one
other significant thing here: the diary. READ DIARY and you'll have an
idea what the sachet is for, but you still will have to figure out the other
ingredients. The word "distasteful" gives you some ideas, though, huh?

There's nothing else to be done here right now so go WEST and you'll find
yourself magically back in the Main Bedroom. Now North twice and DOWN. GET
THE PAINTING AND FOSSIL, then EAST, SOUTH and EAST again to the Gloomy
Passage. OPEN DOOR and NORTH and you'll be at the top of a flight of
stairs. The cellar below is infested with rats; but no matter how hard you
try, you can't get the rat poison where it will do any good. On the south
wall is a drainage system consisting of a stopcock and pipe. Remembering
what the book said about rats and swimming, OPEN STOPCOCK and you'll hear
water gurgling down the pipe. But we want the water in the cellar so GET
PIPE and the cellar will start to flood.

WAIT one turn for the cellar to become half flooded then CLOSE STOPCOCK.
Now you can safely go DOWN and EXAMINE RACK. You'll find two bottles there.
GET ALL FROM RACK and you'll end up with a red bottle and a Champagne
bottle. EXAMINE CHAMPAGNE BOTTLE and you'll find the instructions "Shake
me, say 'Hooray' and I will explode." Something you'll probably want to
remember later. OPEN RED BOTTLE THEN LOOK IN IT and you'll find some wine
and a ruby! GET RUBY THEN DROP BOTTLE. (I suppose you can drink the wine
if you really WANT to.)

Now UP and SOUTH twice to the Junk Room. You'll see a cube here. It
doesn't look very impressive, but GET CUBE and then MOVE JUNK and you'll
find another exit. Go SOUTH and you're outside the castle By The Moat.
There is another of those Night Deposit Safes here. It's time to see if we
can't help the local economy (and ourselves). OPEN SAFE then put the ruby,
diamond, dress, plastic bag, fossil, painting and pot in the safe (you won't
be able to put them all in at the same time) then CLOSE SAFE.

Now NORTH twice, EAST, NORTH twice and EAST. You've been working hard so
it's time for a little recreation now.

If you were lucky in the Library, you read a book that mentioned how to make
a fishing pole out of a piece of wood, thread and pin. If not, this is
something you just have to figure out yourself. The fish jumping in the
moat in the courtyard is about the only other hint you have about fish.
You're going to have to deal with the bear in the cage somehow, and although
there IS some honey available, as far as I can tell there's no way to get
it, and it wouldn't accomplish the purpose. A bear's OTHER favorite food is
fish!

GET COTTON and then FIX COTTON TO CUE. The syntax is a little tricky here,
and if you don't get it right, the parser doesn't understand what you want
to do. Also, DON'T remove the needle from the cotton...I could NEVER find a
way to put it back! Now all you need is bait, so GET MAGGOT THEN PUT IT ON
NEEDLE and you're all set! Go SOUTH to the Courtyard and FISH IN MOAT. You
will very quickly catch a fish, and the fact that it's dead doesn't matter.
(Dead mackeral maybe?) Anyway, go NORTH, GET COTTON FROM CUE, DROP CUE AND
COTTON. Then GET POISON AND PUT POISON ON FISH. Now go EAST to the Dining
Room and UNLOCK CAGE WITH KEY and then GIVE FISH TO BEAR. The fish will
work wonders and then you can OPEN CAGE, GET CHALICE, CLOSE CAGE. (I don't
know if the bear will ever wake up, but I don't believe in taking chances!

Now SOUTH, EAST, SOUTH, SOUTH and OPEN SAFE, PUT CHALICE IN SAFE, CLOSE
SAFE. Then NORTH, NORTH, WEST, NORTH, WEST. GET JAM JAR and go NORTH once
more. There is a stable door here. EXAMINE DOOR and you'll see a
horseshoe. Let's RUB HORSESHOE for good luck. You see a golden glow, but
nothing much else happens. Well, maybe something good will happen later.
Now EAST to the stable. Simply OPEN JAR and a fly will enter the jar and
get stuck. This will come in handy later. WEST, SOUTH will take you back
to the entrance hall. We'll need a few supplies for our trip so DROP ALL
then GET LAMP, CHAMPAGNE BOTTLE, COIN, FINGER, MIRROR, CUBE, LUTE, JAR AND
GUM. Now SOUTH, GET CAGE and SOUTH AGAIN, WEST twice and NORTHWEST,
SOUTHWEST. There's a gem stuck in the wax in the ceiling, but it's really
pretty simple to get. Just REFLECT BEAM AT WAX WITH MIRROR and the gem will
fall. CATCH GEM and you can DROP MIRROR. Now NORTHEAST and SOUTHEAST to
the Junction.

We're going to take a little unnecessary side trip here, just so you can see
what is going on. Go SOUTHEAST, SOUTH, WEST and you're in front of the
bank. READ NOTICE and you'll see that it says "Closed due to lack of
business." Now OPEN SAFE, PUT GEM IN SAFE and CLOSE SAFE. Now WAIT one turn
and you'll see a little man come out and change the notice. If you READ
NOTICE, you'll see that it now says "Closed due to not much business." It
might be fun later to save up all your treasures and bring them here and
deposit them one at a time, and see how long it takes the little man to drop
from exhaustion! Now EAST, NORTH, NORTHWEST to the Junction.

If you're not interested in watching the scenery just described, you can
bypass that and go directly to the Zoo and put the gem in the safe there.
From the Junction go NORTHEAST and you'll be at the entrance to the Zoo.
There's a toll gate here and you'll have to PUT COIN IN SLOT to get in.
There is also a Night Deposit Safe here in which you can put the gem if you
still have it.

Now EAST, SOUTH and WEST will take you to the Insect House. Some vandals
have been at work here, but read the plaque which will tell you that the
snake (what's a snake cage doing in an insect house?) who escaped likes cold
climates. GET SNAKESKIN (you might want to make a wallet later) and then
head EAST.

Oops! You seem to have a snake corset! Not to worry. Remember that sign
at the T-Junction which mentioned a Jungle? Jungles are HOT! So go NORTH
twice and then WEST and the snake will expire from heat stroke. Now you're
faced with a yucky spider, but if you DROP JAR, a sticky situation will be
to your benefit.

Go EAST back to the T-Junction. There's an Aviary to the East but we'll
forget it for now. SOUTH, WEST, and SOUTHWEST will take us back to the
Junction.

We're going to investigate another area now so go EAST twice, SOUTH twice,
WEST and SOUTH again and you're at the Antechamber to the Temple. There's
another of those Night Safes here, a good sign that there might be treasure
around!

SOUTH again takes you into the temple. Whatever you do, DON'T touch the
statue yet. Instead EXAMINE ALTAR and you'll find an Incense Burner. GET
BURNER and you're ready to investigate the other exits. There is nothing at
the Northeast exit so ignore it. Go SOUTWEST, UP and EAST and you'll find
an organ. EXAMINE ORGAN then GET ALL KEYS FROM ORGAN. Now WEST, DOWN,
NORTHEAST and SOUTH. You'll see a beehive here. EXAMINE HIVE and you'll
find that it's closed and there are some gloves on it. You can open the
hive and there is honey inside, but I know of no way in the world to get it,
and it isn't needed. But the gloves might help so GET GLOVES then NORTH,
SOUTHEAST and UP. There's an ivory rhinoceros here, and ivory is valuable,
so GET RHINOCEROS then DOWN, NORTHWEST and NORTHWEST again. Then DOWN to an
exit with "WOBNIAR" above it. If you're very observant, you'll notice that
that spells rainbow backwards. Better SAVE the game here, one false step
and you're a goner!

Those of us who have played HOLLYWOOD HIJINX will NEVER forget the order of
the colors of the rainbow. For those of you who didn't, they are Violet,
Indigo, Blue, Green, Yellow, Orange, Red. You must pass through the
following room by stepping on these colors in order. Assuming it is NOT a
variable (it was the same in every game I played) you should be able to get
through by using this sequence: SOUTHEAST (Black), SOUTHEAST (Violet),
NORTH (Indigo), EAST (Blue), EAST (Green), SOUTHEAST (Yellow), SOUTH
(Orange), SOUTHWEST (Red), EAST (White).

SOUTHEAST will take you to the Crypt Room. The sarcophagus is locked, and
what better to open it with than a skeleton bone? So, UNLOCK SARCOPHAGUS
WITH FINGER then OPEN SARCOPHAGUS. There's a skull in there, and if you
EXAMINE SKULL, you'll find an eye in the skull. TAKE SKULL THEN DROP
FINGER. There's nothing else of interest here so go EAST into the Shrine.
There's a statuette here, and although the description is pretty vague, it
is valuable, so TAKE STATUETTE. Now there's a black door behind a black
drape...so what do you suppose would unlock it? Right! UNLOCK DOOR WITH
EBONY KEY. Now OPEN DOOR, DROP EBONY KEY and go EAST. Nothing here but a
pamphlet, so READ PAMPHLET and you'll get some valuable information about
walking on coals.

We're done here so go WEST, WEST, and NORTHWEST to the white square. Follow
the rainbow colors to get out (not the reverse of the way you got it!).
From the white square: NORTHWEST, NORTH, NORTHWEST, EAST, SOUTHWEST,
SOUTHWEST, NORTHWEST, NORTH should put you on the black square. Now
NORTHWEST, UP, SOUTHEAST and NORTH to the Antechamber.

OPEN SAFE then PUT BURNER, STATUETTE AND RHINOCEROS IN SAFE, then CLOSE SAFE
and some more of your valuables have been deposited. Now we're ready to
tackle that statue. Go SOUTH into the temple. Just for safety sake PUT
LUTE IN SWAG BAG and then GET STATUE.

Now you know why I told you not to touch that statue! Don't panic, though,
just WAIT one turn. Now DROP STATUE (or you'll drown) and NORTH three times
which will put you on a sandy beach. GET BROOCH which is in plain sight and
then investigate those lumps in the sand. DIG IN SAND and you'll find some
wetsuit boots. GET BOOTS. Now go DOWN to the Thin Shaft. If you try to
enter this shaft without the right equipment, you'll slip and die, so WEAR
BOOTS THEN DOWN and you'll make it okay. Now go SOUTH. You see that rope?
Well, you can't possibly climb it unless you WEAR GLOVES. Now UP and GET
PICK then DOWN and WEST. Looks like these minerals might be valuable so GET
MINERALS WITH PICK. You can now DROP PICK, GLOVES AND BOOTS and GET STONE.
Now EAST and then SOUTH.

Does this look familiar? Sure it does: It's the rope ladder you let down
earlier; good thing, too! So UP, EAST, NORTH and NORTHEAST and you're back
in the cave at the good old Junction!

Now we know what those succulents were for so back to the Zoo! NORTHEAST,
to the Safe. OPEN SAFE THEN PUT BROOCH AND STONE IN SAFE, then CLOSE SAFE.
Now EAST and then SOUTH and we'll try that other key. UNLOCK DOOR WITH
IVORY KEY then DROP KEY THEN OPEN DOOR. Now EAST into the Office. There's
lots of stuff here, but ignore it all except the spade. OPEN DRAWER THEN
LOOK IN IT and you'll find a key and a magazine. GET KEY AND SPADE THEN
READ MAGAZINE and you'll learn the feeding habits of the Macaw. Now OPEN
DOOR and NORTHEAST to the White Corridor. Then UNLOCK DOOR WITH KEY, OPEN
DOOR, DROP KEY, then go NORTHWEST and CLOSE DOOR. There's a noisy little
Mynah bird here who can be of great help to you. OPEN CAGE, GET MYNAH, PUT
MYNAH IN CAGE then CLOSE CAGE. Now you can OPEN DOOR and go SOUTHEAST,
SOUTHWEST, WEST, NORTH twice. If you get tired of hearing the Mynah squawk,
you can teach it to talk by saying MYNAH, HELLO, or whatever you want it to
say. This will be crucial later.

Now go WEST and GET SUCCULENTS. Then SHAKE PALM TREE and you'll be rewarded
with some Macaw food. GET COCONUT. (Don't shake the tree again, or it will
be fatal!). Now EAST twice to he Aviary. There's the bird you want, and
he'll tell you that he'll trade some information for food. BREAK COCONUT
WITH SPADE THEN DROP SPADE and then GIVE COCONUT TO MACAW and you'll be
rewarded with the ingredients for the Baron's secret formula.

Now we're ready to deal with those coals so go WEST, SOUTH, WEST, SOUTHWEST
to the Junction and NORTHWEST twice. Now RUB SUCCULENTS ON FEET then go UP.
You made it! DROP SUCCULENTS here and go UP again. There's nothing of
interest in the Boathouse so just go SOUTHEAST to the Yellow Room. You
probably should save the game here in case you mess up the next part.

The secret to this puzzle is really simple if you explore all the rooms and
draw a map. If you look at the map, you'll see that the five rooms are laid
out in the same pattern as the spots on the face of a die. Dice are a very
important part of the game from here on. (Which is probably why they
included that die in the package.)

GET YELLOW DIE then go SOUTHEAST. There are rooms with a die in each of the
four corners of this White Room. Get the three other die and come back
here. Okay...now if you examine the slots in the opaque case, you'll see
that they are colored Red, Green, Blue, and Yellow, the same as the dice.
The dice you have all have one spot on each face. They need to have a five
on each face (the pattern of the rooms). So start with the Red Die and ROLL
DIE. Wow! That horseshoe was lucky, after all! Okay, tell Lady Luck FIVE.
Then PUT RED DIE IN RED SLOT. Do the same with the other three and the case
will no longer be locked! Now GET PLASTIC DIE. Now I think it's time to
start building the Baron's secret recipe.

From the White Room go NORTHWEST twice then DOWN. Now RUB SUCCULENTS ON
FEET (check to make sure you haven't GOT the succulents...you need them
here, but should be able to use them without picking them up.) Now DOWN,
SOUTHEAST twice and you're back at the junction.

Now go EAST twice, NORTH twice. At the Entrance Hall make sure you have the
cue, berries, heart, eye, cube and snakeskin. Now UP then SOUTH twice. The
bed which shot you into the Secret Lab is still up against the wall, so PUSH
BOTTOM BUTTON and the bed will return. Now SIT ON BED then PUSH TOP BUTTON
WITH CUE. In the lab, GET SACHET and then, remembering what the Macaw told
you, PUT HEART, EYE, SKIN, BERRIES IN CAULDRON. The diary said something
about symetrical objects, so PUT CUBE IN CAULDRON. Now OPEN SACHET and the
contents will turn into powder. PUT POWDER IN CAULDRON and when you LOOK IN
CAULDRON, you'll see an anticube (which isn't there). GET ANTICUBE (don't
ask ME...I just work here!).

Now WEST, then NORTH, NORTH, DOWN. We're about to start the endgame, so
let's check our provisions. You should have nothing but the LAMP, LUTE,
GUM, CAGE, CHAMPAGNE BOTTLE, DIE, and ANTICUBE.

Back to the cave by going SOUTH three times, WEST three times, then
SOUTHEAST, SOUTH, and WEST. The notice at the bank should now say "Closed
due to not quite enough business." Well, you can solve that. There's one
last treasure you haven't noticed yet. EXAMINE LUTE and you'll find a
silver plectrum on it. OPEN SAFE then PUT PLECTRUM IN SAFE and CLOSE SAFE.
Now WAIT one turn and the little man should come out and change the notice
to read "Bank open all hours, please enter."

There are a few preparations you have to make before you're ready to tackle
the bank. First GET CARD FROM POCKET then PUT DIE AND ANTICUBE IN POCKET.
Now, we're gong to teach the bird a new word. Say MYNAH, HOORAY. You may
have to repeat it before the bird says it. Now CHEW GUM and you're ready to
enter the bank.

OPEN DOOR THEN SOUTH and you will find a couple of queues. Experienced
adventurers will have learned long ago not to try to get in the short line,
so ENTER FURTHER QUEUE and you will immediately be at the teller's window.
SHOW CARD TO TELLER and you will be whisked into the Bank Manager's office.
He will begin explaining to you that he can't let you have any of your
valuables, because the bank would be out of business. The timing is pretty
critical here so pay attention. As soon as you are in his office DROP CAGE
AND BOTTLE. Then WAIT one turn, then SHAKE BOTTLE. At this point he should
escort you out of the office. You may have to WAIT a turn after shaking the
bottle, but as soon as your are outside his office and he has locked the
door behind him, PUT GUM IN KEYHOLE. It is important that you do this while
the Bank Manager is outside his office, so that he can't get back in.

If you've done everything right, you should hear the Mynah say "hooray" and
there will be an explosion. Everyone will panic and leave you alone in the
bank. You will notice that the roof has been blown off; this is your big
chance.

It's time for music so PLAY LUTE AND SING URFANORE PENDRA. You will be
floating in the air having dropped everything you were carrying. Now go
SOUTH and when you land you will be in the Bank Manager's office, and about
to begin a very clever and perplexing puzzle.

Go EAST into the bank vault. You will notice three exits besides the one
you came in. Remember that I said dice were very important in this game?
Well, the exits in the rooms from here on, are equivalent to spots on a die.
You must roll a number on the die that does NOT contain a spot corresponding
to one of the exits in the room you are in. In other words, you must use an
exit that does NOT appear on the die after you roll it. (You may have to
read that several times to catch on to what I mean.) To make it more
complicated, each time you use an exit, the number you rolled will disappear
from the die. You must make your moves so that when you reach the final
room (which is ALWAYS reached by rolling a FOUR) ALL the numbers will have
disappeared off the die. It stands to reason that as you get closer to your
goal it's going to take longer to get a number...rolling the final four may
take 30 or more rolls! Luckily, you rubbed the horseshoe and have Lady Luck
on your side to make things easier.

Okay, here we go. The room you're in has three exits. ROLL DIE and ask for
a TWO. Then go DOWN (See, the center exit was not represented on the die).
Now the room you are in will have the same number of exits, in the same
position, as the number you previously rolled, in this case there will be
two exits, NW and SE. This time ROLL DIE and ask for a ONE. Go NORTHWEST.
Now ROLL DIE and ask for SIX and go DOWN. Now roll a FIVE and go WEST. Now
roll a FOUR and go DOWN.

Aha! Here are all the treasures you deposited! But wait! There's more!
EXAMINE THE PILLAR and you will discover that there is a weighing machine on
it with a cube which appears to be VERY valuable. The weighing machine is
delicately balanced so that if you disturb the weight, you will die. If you
EXAMINE CUBE you will see that it is about the same size as the one in your

@endnode

@node ha "Hare Raising Havok"
@next he
@prev gu


                     Roger Rabbit's Hare Raising Havoc

    

                                LIVING ROOM

   Go left, press enter to lower the ironing board. Go right,
   just past the ottoman (foot rest) and kick it left. One step
   left, pick up magnet. Go to fishbowl, use magnet to get key. 
   Not necessary but you get more time later. Go to left middle
   seat of couch, jump up and keep jumping until fan is turned
   on. Get down, go to right seat of couch jump up and down
   until you wind up in the fan. You must press enter as Roger
   goes left, bad timing and you hit the door and must repeat
   this. When you go left the escape sequence activates, going
   off ironing board to ottoman through top vent over door.

                                  KITCHEN

   Turn on burners on stove. Use key on locks. If you get
   timer, fine that's it. If you get cheese, put it down next to
   mice and grab them when they come out. This gives you more
   time too for some reason. Now go nest to right door and move
   old fashioned clothes dryer. Now go left and eat stuff out of
   refrigerator until banana peel shows (if you screw up from
   here, return to refrigerator and cycle through food to banana
   again). Go over banana peel and hit enter as you hit table or
   you will not go over the sink. On the sink hit enter until
   all dishes are trashed. Walk left, stand on burners. On
   light, use arrow keys to swing and hit enter when going right,
   this activates the escape sequence through the dryer.

                                 BATHROOM

   My favorite. Although they add nothing to the solve, you
   should throw the rubber ducky and even better, by the toilet
   paper hit enter. I love it, he wraps himself in the paper. 
   I think this was my favorite superfluous sequence, even better
   that Jessica saying "Did you hurt yourself" in the
   Construction sequence. Oh yeah, the solve.

   Move over to the chair, get up and get towel. get down, put
   towel over water. go back, kick stool over towel. Get up,
   and get soap. Go right, jump on scale until skylight is open. 
   Go right, turn on fan. Do not turn heater off!!! Pick up
   plumber aid which sticks to right wall (if it sticks to left
   go pull it again it will go to right wall). Go left, turn on
   water. Play with soap in water. Soap goes on floor. Go step
   on soap that goes in toilet. Go back up on shelf where you
   got soap. Go right on top on towels and press left or enter
   to activate sequence, which does not require action from you. 
   You should land on scale, bounce off aid, into toilet, down
   toilet, come out as bubble and float out.

                                 BACKYARD

   Walk right into rake. Whoops, just kidding. Turn water on. 
   Going left blocks water in hose. Then go right, press up and
   enter to grab line. Use arrows to swing or you will drop. Go
   right, drop past rake. Spill fertilizer on tree. Get bucket
   on far right. (For fun, swing on tire and have dog bite your
   ass or grab the burning steaks). Walk left through rake to
   water. Put bucket down and let it fill. Pick up bucket. Go
   back across rope same as before. Put water from bucket on
   steaks. (Step over Two Steps exactly here or time will expire
   on fire and it will return). Grab steaks, one will flop onto
   see-saw. Go to tree and shake i think three times for apple
   to drop on see saw and send steak to dog. Get on swing, swing
   right left and hit enter going left to get over fence quickly
   or time will expire on dog and he will return.

                               STREET SCENE

   Pick up ball. Put in hydrant. Turn on hydrant. Get on Pogo
   stick and get on wire (you should have this concept down by
   now). Go right on wire to bird. Drop down, get feather. Go
   back up on wire and stop just lsft of clown. Press enter
   twice to tickle clowns nose. Magnet will drop. Drop down,
   get into garbage can. Walk over with garbage can on you and
   slowly bet magnet over to right over the manhole, which will
   come up after you move off it. Dump garbage can, come back
   press down and enter.

                            CONSTRUCTION SCENE

   This one gave me fits for some reason. Check out jessica for
   fun. Tilt the mixer. Get a brick, put it in the mixer. Get
   some dynamiter, put it in the mixer. Elevator now comes down
   halfway. Repeat brick and dynamite. Elevator now all the way
   down. Get dynamite and set mixer upright. Get on elevator,
   kick bricks.  Go right, grab onto hook and drop into mixer. 
   on wood, saw until you drop into hole.

                               MILK SEQUENCE

   Turn on switch, left side. Go to far right control (QC FIR
   QUALITY CONTROL) and hit enter on all bottles with tops on
   them. Good ones will go into the crates, bad ones will break. 
   Go to first wheel on left, press when empty dirty bottles come
   by, it will clean them. Go to second wheel and press to label
   all bottles. Go to fourth wheel and press enter to fill with
   milk (just inside arm is the right timing, ill let you scope
   out the timing on the others, not too hard to figure). Go to
   third wheel to add rubber tops to bottles (tougher timing
   actually). Start at quality control and repeat as necessary
   to fill all crates and get to roof

                                   ROOF

   Beats me, tried all five keys got the same result each time,
   through the door and scolded by mommy.

@endnode

@node he "Heart of China"
@next hi
@prev ha

                           
                            Heart of China                          
                                                                                                            
                                                                     
                                                                     
                             IN HONGKONG                                                        
                                                        
                                                                     
Jake Masters (JM) goes to town. His first trip leads to the pub. After a 
talk to the keeper Ho (1-1-1-1) , 2 dirty guys are threatening him (1-2). In 
a talk he manages to persuade the Chinese Chi to get with him on a rescue-
trip (1-3-3 OR 3-3-2). Chi fears going by plane. So JM leaves the pub, takes 
the paper and constructs a little plane out of it, that he presents Chi. Chi 
has the idea to get herbs at the chemist's shop. Wu doesn't react when JM 
talks to him. Chi manages to persuade the chemist. The chemist needs "gull-
guano". JM and Chi go to the dock. Chi gives a prune to the gull. The gull 
shits and JM puts the shit into his pocket. Again at the chemist Wu. JM talks 
to him and puts the guano into the mortar. He gets the herbs, a faked pass-
port and a map. JM and Chi visit Lomax before the journey. At the airport JM 
decides not to show the ticket-collector his passport. Inside the plane JM 
takes the crowbar, the rope and the anchor.                               
                                                                     
                                                                     
                             IN CHENG DU                                                        
                                                       
                                                                     
After arrival a farmer appears who talks to Chi (3-2-3). Chi changes his 
clothes against the farmer's. JM tries to catch the cow with the rope. After 
several useless tries he gives the rope to Chi who has less problems. With 
the caught cow they both go to the castle. There they watch a farmer who is 
allowed to enter the castle with his cow. Of course, Chi tries the same trick
. JM gives him the anchor which Chi connects to the rope. Arrived inside, Chi 
puts on his ninja-clothes at once. At first he explores the door-keeper's 
home and takes the keys. Then Chi sneaks into the palace and listens to Li 
Deng's talk. In the big hall he finds Kate and tells her he'll come back with 
help as fast as possible. Back in the entry-hall Chi goes into the dining-
room and takes the bottle. He goes on to the kitchen and narcotizes the dog 
with the wine. He takes both the fried chickens. Then he enters the Cooks    
room. There he gets the knife. He opens the door and discovers a second entry 
to the big hall. After exploring the palace Chi walks to the castle-wall. He 
throws the anchor over the wall and pulls JM over it. To hide from the guards
, they both sneak back into the door-keeper's home. When the danger is over, 
they both run into the palace. When the guards have left the room, JM and Chi  
go into the dining-room. There JM throws down the lamp and lights a fire. 
Through kitchen and bedroom they arrive in the big hall. JM locks the door 
and kills the snakes with his gun. Unfotunately he can't stop the snakes 
from biting Kate. JM carries Kate on his arm and escapes to the balcony. 
There Chi connects the rope with the balustrade and all three they escape to 
the tank-garage. In the tank JM uses the key and pushes the starter. Now fol-
lows the first action scene (better skip it). In the plane JM gives the herbs 
to Chi.                    
                                                                   
                                                                     
                             IN KATHMANDU                                                        
                                                        
                                                                     
JM leaves the plane and talks to Chi about the situation. JM goes getting 
help, Chi walks back to he plane. There he takes a tent-roof and a blanket 
and puts it around Kate. He gives her his ninja-medicine and the guano-herbs. 
JM talks to Ama (2-2-3) and after that he looks around in the village. In the 
post-office he posts a telegram to Lomax. Then he visits the restaurant and        
talks to the keeper (2-3). The keeper sends him to Sardar (2). Now JM goes to 
the Lama. After a short talk to a young monk he is allowed to enter. The 
first talk to the wise man is resultless. JM goes to the local dictator. 
After a wrong remark he flies into the prison. Chi runs to Ama and she res-
cues JM. JM has a short talk to Kate and after that he has a trip to the 
scrap yard where he meets a boy. The boy offers, after a short talk,  a tube     
which is full of petrol for a swap. Chi builds from a cigar-box, the eating-
sticks and four coins a play-car; for this he gets the petrol-tube. Now he 
goes back to the Lama and receives some more news. In the rstaurant he mana-
ges to persuade Sardar to help (1-3). JM gives him his gun as a present and 
the revolution starts. The game continues in Turkey.                                       
                                                                     
                                                                     
                              IN ISTANBUL                                                         
                                                         
                                                                     
On the runway JM gets no petrol from the seller. On the way to town Kate and 
JM notice a little boy selling oranges. JM finds in a side-road the officers' 
club and has a little call from there to Lomax; after that Jake is caught by 
the sultan's crew. Kate swaps her brooch at the seller's and gambles in order 
to obtain more money. After that she goes to the orange-seller and overthrows 
his cart. She says sorry and gets a flower from her young fan. Now she buys a     
camel for 200. She goes back to the shop and buys a saw. Now she rides on a 
camel - back to the palace. In a side-road she meets a woman to whom she 
gives the flower. Kate rescues JM and they escape to the town-gate. There 
Kate gives the camel to the boy and JM whispers some words of excusing (3-2).                              
Arrived at the airport they see bursting their plane into flames. They es-
cape to the station and buy a ticket for the orient-express. 
                                                                     
                                                                     
                              IN THE TRAIN                                                        
                                                        
                                                                     
 JM's scene   : (1-1-3-3)                                            
 Kate's scene : (2-1-3)                                              
                              

                               -THE END-

@endnode

@node hi "Hitchhiker's Guide to the Galaxy"
@next ho
@prev he


                     Hitchhiker's guide to the galaxy


                                 PART ONE

 Put your "DON'T PANIC!" button on your gown, grab your towel and get
ready to don those peril sensitive sunglasses because you're about to go
on one of the strangest adventures from Infocom to date: THE HITCHHIKER'S
GUIDE TO THE GALAXY!
 You wake up and notice everything is dark...have you gone blind? No,
just turn on the lights. Oooh, your aching head! You realize you must've
had just one drink too many at the party last night. Time to get out of
bed. Stand up, get your gown and put it on. As you do, you notice
something in your pocket. All this activity isn't helping your hangover
any, so look in your pocket. Ah, an analgesic! Take the analgesic.
Feeling better? Good! Now get the screwdriver and the toothbrush. Oh!
What was that noise? What's that big, yellow bulldozer doing out there?
Better go outside and find out!
 Go south to your front porch, collect your mail, and south to your
front yard. The big, yellow bulldozer is heading straight for you! And
this lunatic is shouting at you to get the hell out of the way! Don't
Panic! Humanity hasn't gone completely insane, just lie down in front of
the bulldozer. The driver (who's getting Union Scale wages) doesn't mind
this minor inconvenience and stops the 'dozer within inches of you!
 As Prosser madly waves his arms about and shouts at you, you see your
friend, Ford Prefect, hurrying toward you. Now what does he want? Oh,
he's come to return the towel he borrowed from you. Nope, don't take it.
As Ford insists on returning the towel, you tell him about your house
and Prosser's intentions. Ford, who was about ready to leave the Earth
(which is being demolished to make way for a new Hyperspace Bypass),
decides, insanely, to take you with him! But seeing that you're not
about to budge until your house's future has been assured, goes to
Prosser, gesticulates toward you and the bulldozer, and convinces
Prosser to take your place in the mud. What a friend! The bulldozer
driver, in the meantime, sits calmly and dreams of overtime.
 After you've regained your feet, take the towel from Ford and go south
and west with Ford into the Pub. Buy a cheese sandwich from the barman,
drink the three beers Ford has given you, and listen as he explains
what's about to happen to the Earth. Somehow, the situation regarding
your house keeps creeping back into your mind, and Ford's words make
little sense to you. All of a sudden, you hear a crashing sound that can
only be the death throes of your poor house being demolished! Get up and
go east.
 A small dog comes yapping up to you. It's obvious the poor thing hasn't
eaten in several days. The humanitarian within you surfaces. Give the
cheese sandwich to the dog. The poor, ravenous thing is in puppy heaven!
As it devours the meal you've provided, it completely ignores a
microscopic space fleet that just happens to be passing by at the
moment! No time to wonder about this miracle, though. Go north and wait.
Now look! Overhead, you see huge yellow machinery that amazingly
resembles monstrously oversized bulldozers! Good God! What's happening?
Suddenly, gale-force winds blow across the landscape, whipping trees
around! Ford appears by your side and is fumbling around with a strange
looking device! The thing your Aunt gave you tumbles away, but the wind
is blowing so hard you can't get it!
 Ford drops the device and it lands at your feet. He seems to be trying
to tell you something, but the wind carries his words away! Pick up the
device and examine it. You see red and green lights and note that it's
curiously shaped. It appears to be shaped like a hitchhiker's thumb!
Quickly push the green button and everything goes....
 Dark. You will find yourself spending a lot of time in the dark in this
game, so get used to the series of events you have to follow in order to
see where you are. Do "looks" (which takes fewer moves than "waits").
Each "DARK" sequence takes 4 looks until you regain one of your missing
senses. When you recover that sense, perform it. If you can see, type
"SEE". If you can hear, type "LISTEN". If you can smell, type "SMELL".
If you can feel, type "FEEL". If you can taste, type "TASTE". Right now,
though, your 4 LOOKS will tell you that you have regained your sense of
smell.
 Smell the shadowy figure and then look at the figure. Ah, it's Ford and
you find that the Sub-Etha Signalling Device has landed you a ride on
one of the Vogon Construction Ships! Ford hands you some peanuts to
replace the energy you lost during the hitchhiking transfer. Eat the
peanuts then look around you. What a disgusting place this is! But there
are a few interesting items here which you will explore as soon as Ford
decides to take his nap. Before he does, he hands you an odd contraption
and tells you it's THE HITCHHIKER'S GUIDE TO THE GALAXY and that it
contains all sorts of useful information. After Ford nods off, remove
your gown and hang it on the hook, cover the drain with your towel, get
Ford's satchel and put it in front of the panel and put your junk mail
on top of the satchel. I've had you do this correctly so that you can
get the Babel Fish the first time. You might want to save your game and
try getting the Babel Fish without putting the junk mail on the satchel,
just so you can see what happens. Now, examine the dispensing machine
and consult the Guide about Babel Fish.
 You learn that Babel Fish, when placed firmly in one's ear, are
universal translating devices! Flip the switch on the glass case that's
housing the Plotter. Strange words issue forth, but it's all garbled and
you can't understand one syllable of it! Better get a Babel Fish pretty
soon! Push the button on the dispensing machine and watch the circus! As
the Babel Fish comes flying out of the chute, a tiny cleaning robot
comes skittering across the room. The Babel Fish hits the gown, slides
down the sleeve and lands on the towel (which is covering the drain).
The little robot grabs the Babel Fish and goes tearing across the room
toward its service panel. Just as it gets there, it smacks into Ford's
satchel and loses its grip on the Babel Fish! The Babel Fish and the
junk mail go flying up into the air where an upper-half-of-the-room
cleaning robot is frantically gathering up the junk mail! So intent is
it upon the mail that the Babel Fish falls and lands in your ear!
SQUISH! Who said junk mail was useless!
 Now, flip the switch on the glass case again. It will tell you how to
open the case so that you can get the Sub-Atomic Plotter. Poetry? Ah
well, worse things could happen. Write down which word of the poetry
you'll have to type in because it changes from game to game; and if you
type in the wrong word, you'll blow yourself to teensy little bits! Get
your robe and the towel. Ford will get his satchel. Put your gown back
on and put everything you're carrying into the Thing your Aunt gave you
(yes, it came back...it will ALWAYS come back to you, no matter how many
times you try to lose it!) and put the Thing in your robe pocket. By
now, you should be hearing warnings about hitchhikers coming over the
intercom system. Just wait until the guards come for you.

 
                                 PART TWO

 Eventually, the Vogons will find you and take you to the Vogon Captain,
who is a cruel cuss! He'll subject you to his poetry, but don't panic!
Just sit back, relax and enjoy it. Literally! Enjoy the Poetry. So
gratified is the Captain by your enjoyment, that he decides to read you
the second verse! Now listen carefully, and when he reads the word the
glass case told you about, write it down. He appears impressed that
you've been able to withstand his poetry; and instead of killing you and
Ford outright, he decides to "space" you! Argh! This is better than
death? You betcha!
 Pretty soon, you're going to type something in wrong along the way.
Your typing error has been noted, and sometime soon, you'll get the
results of your foolish error! It seems that those erroneous words have
started some sort of space war that has destroyed an entire world! The
remaining members of that doomed civilization are not happy about it
either, and they're out gunning for you!
 When you're returned to the hold, type the word from the poetry on the
keyboard of the case. The case opens and the plotter is yours! Take the
plotter. (If your load is too heavy, put everything you're carrying into
the Thing and put the Thing in your pocket.) Ford tries to talk the
guard into letting you both go free, but the guard will have none of
that and throws you and Ford into the Airlock. Ford sits pondering your
respective fates and comes up with an equation about the probability of
being picked up by another ship in the vicinity. Unfortunately, the odds
aren't too good and as you and Ford are unceremoniously sucked out into
space, the Guide bleeps to life and says that you can hyperventilate in
space for 29 seconds before you explode! Ugh! Just as you reach your 29
second limit, you're picked up by a passing ship and find yourself in
the....
 Dark! Talk about miracles! Go through the "LOOK" routine and eventually
you regain your sense of hearing. LISTEN. You hear a sound to port, but
as you try to go port, you find that the program is lying to you!
Instead go south. Aha! You find yourself on the Heart of Gold (HOG)!
Ignore the brochure, it's not important, and let Ford lead you to the
Bridge. When you get there, you see two strangers (who begin to look
familiar). Hmmm, Trillian and that two-headed guy with her were at that
party last night! They greet Ford and eventually all three of them head
port, leaving you quite alone. Get the pincers, the Pocket Fluff from
your gown's pocket, the handbag and put them in the Thing. Drop the
plotter and the Sub-Etha Signalling Device and go down and aft three
times.
 As you try to go aft the third time, the program asks you if you really
want to go in there. Tell it YES. It asks if you're serious! Tell it YES
again! The program will decide you really didn't mean it and take you
fore. Go aft twice. The program will ask you if you want to reconsider.
Tell it NO. Be persistant and eventually, you will be allowed to enter
the doorway. As if not letting you enter wasn't enough, now the program
will tell you there's really nothing here to see. Again, it's lying, so
look two times. Aha! There's a rasp, pliers and a Spare Improbability
Drive here! Get the rasp and pliers, put them in the Thing, put the
Thing in your pocket and get the Drive.
 Eventually, you'll meet Marvin, the Paranoid Android. He'll depress the
heck out of you, but there's nothing you can do about that. He wanders
in and out, but just ignore him for now. His use will be made known at
the end of the game.
 Now go fore twice and port to the Galley. Look in the carton, get the
gun and put the gun in the Thing. Now for some Brownian Motion (consult
the Guide about this). Touch the pad and the machine whirrs a few
seconds, then shoots a cup of Alternate Tea Substitute into the chute.
Take the cup, go starboard and up to the Bridge. Drop the Drive and the
Cup of Tea Substitute. Let's get this contraption going!
 Put the small plug in the small receptacle and put the long dangly bit
in the Tea Substitute. You're all set to begin some pretty far-out
experiences! Since flipping the switch on the Plotter will take you to
five random scenarios, they will be explained in separate sections of
this walkthru. You may find yourself visiting one of the scenarios a
second time, but you won't be able to do anything in them. You're
automatically taken back to the dark and there's nothing to do but run
through your "LOOK" routine. So flip the switch and you find yourself in
the....

 
                                PART THREE

 Dark. Do the "LOOK" routine until you find your sense of hearing then
LISTEN. It seems you've been returned to the HOG because you hear a
sound to port. Again, the program's lying, so go aft instead. Hey...this
isn't the HOG! You see an awl laying here, so get the awl and put it in
the Thing. Wait a minute...Who are these guys? They seem to be in deep
conversation. Listen to their conversation. Uh-oh, YOU seem to the be
the topic of discussion! Seems like that small galaxy you wiped out with
your careless typing has finally figured out what happened and is
speeding toward Earth to do likewise! Just as the Vl'hurgs and G'guvunts
arrive, they spy a huge dog tearing into a cheese sandwich! As the fleet
gets closer, the dog ignores it and finishes its meal. The obvious
happiness of the dog is not lost on the aliens and with softened hearts,
they head toward home, forgiving (and depositing you) along the way. But
WHERE are you? You seem to have materialized inside your own brain! The
confusion in here is obvious because no matter where you go, you can't
get anywhere. Just keep ploughing along (it doesn't matter which way you
go, all directions are the same) until you find a dark particle.
Examining it reveals it to be your Common Sense! Take your common sense
and suddenly you find yourself in the....
 Dark. "LOOK" until you regain your sense of hearing, then LISTEN and go
aft twice and up to the Bridge. Make sure that the Awl is safely tucked
in the Thing. Flip the switch. As you do so, you find yourself in
the....

 
                                 PART FOUR

 Dark. "LOOK" until you regain your sense of sight then SEE. A bright
light is shining in your eyes. Look at the light and you find yourself
looking at an alien sun! But IS it really? Type "WHO AM I" and you see
that you're no longer Arthur Dent, but Zaphod Beeblebrox, President of
the Universe! And you also discover that you're sitting in a speedboat
which is currently heading toward some mighty rough looking rocks!
Quickly steer the boat toward the spires. Now then, while you're waiting
to arrive, look under the seat and get the key and the seat cushion
fluff. Also take the tool box. Now, just wait until you get to
the...wait a second! Those spires are getting closer and closer and the
boat doesn't appear to be slowing down any! Just in the nick of time,
the auto-pilot activates itself and brings you safely to shore! Stand up
and get out of the boat.
 As you step to the Dais, a wildly cheering crowd greets you! Fools!
Don't they realize you're not here to dedicated the Heart of Gold, but
to steal it? Ha! Wait until Trillian shows up and starts the charade. As
she grabs you around your neck, rifle-brandishing guards rush onto the
scene! As calmly as you can, tell the guards to drop their rifles.
Trillian may hiss nasty remarks about your ineptitude in your ear, but
ignore her. Now then, to complete your plan, tell Trillian to shoot the
rifles that the guards have dropped! The crowd, deeply impressed, cheers
wildly! Don't take time to take any bows, though, just head east and you
find yourself in the....
 Dark. "LOOK" until you regain your sense of hearing, then head aft
twice and down. Here you find the tool box, key, and seat cushion fluff.
Unlock the tool box with the key. Inside you find a magnifying glass and
a wrench. Put these two tools, the key, and the seat cushion fluff in
the thing. Go up, fore and up to the Bridge. Flip the switch and you
find yourself in the....

 
                                 PART FIVE

 Dark. "LOOK" until you regain your sense of smell, then SMELL. Ugh!
What a repulsive odor that shadow has! Look at the shadow and you find
yourself face to face with the stupidest creature in the Universe: The
dreaded Bugblatter Beast of Traal! (Consult the Guide for further
information about its stupidity.) As it roars toward you, it demands to
know your name! Tell it that your name is DENT, then beat feet east! No
time to linger! Get the stones you see here and then put your towel over
your head. The Beast is so incredibly dense, it believes that if you
can't see it, it can't see you! While it's trying to remember where you
are, take this opportunity to add your name to the memorial that has the
names of all the poor souls who've been unfortunate enough to have been
invited for dinner by the Beast. After carving your name on the
memorial, the Beast (still living up to its reputation) looks at the
memorial; and seeing your name carved there, decides that it must've
eaten you already and curls up in its lair for a post-dinner snooze!
 Remove your towel from your head and go back west and southwest to the
Beast's Inner Lair. Reposing here, in eternal rest, is an alien skeleton
clutching a Nutrimat Interface in its hand! Get the Interface and wait.
Suddenly you find yourself captured and placed in a cage in a zoo!
Amazingly, you've been mistaken for the Bugblatter Beast! The nerve!
Eventually, the zoo's error is duly discovered and you're released.
Unfortunately, instead of being returned to the HOG, you've been given
work as a paint scraper! After several months of experience, you are
allowed to leave your job and take with you the tool of your trade...a
paint chipper! Suddenly your surroundings shift and you find yourself in
the....
 Dark. "LOOK" until you regain your sense of hearing, then LISTEN and go
aft twice and port to the Galley. Open the Nutrimat panel, remove the
circuit board and put the Interface in the panel. Close the panel and go
starboard and up to the bridge. Put the chipper in the Thing, flip the
switch and you find yourself in the....

 
                                 PART SIX

 Dark. "LOOK" until you regain your sense of feeling, then FEEL. Odd,
you seem to have your hand in some sort of liquid. Taste the liquid and
you take a sip of a nice white wine. It seems you're at a party! "WHO AM
I" reveals that you're Trillian and this bore by the name of Arthur Dent
is standing here trying to pick you up. Look at Arthur and you see a
piece of Jacket Fluff on his lapel. Hmmm, you seem to need another hand,
so drop the plate and the wine, take the fluff from Arthur's jacket and
put it in your handbag. Arthur is so moved by your interest in his
appearance that he becomes even more annoying (if that's possible!).
 To add to your dismay, you see the hostess approaching you! She's been
known to put people out of their misery with her small talk! Now she's
insisting that you pick up your plate and glass. Better do so or she'll
bore you to death! Say, who's THAT handsome fellow? Phil? Well, anyone's
more interesting than Arthur right now, so close your purse and follow
Phil. Arthur (the dear man), follows you. Phil, noticing your
discomfort, takes you by the shoulder, says some unkind words for
Arthur's benefit, and takes you away from the party. What an interesting
form of transportation Phil has with him! As he guides you into its
interior, you find yourself in the....
 Dark. "LOOK" until you regain your sense of hearing then LISTEN and go
south and up to the bridge. Open the handbag, get the Jacket Fluff and
the Tweezers and put both items in the Thing. Drop the handbag and flip
the switch. As your surroundings change you find yourself in the....

 
       
                                PART SEVEN

 Dark. "LOOK" until you regain your sense of sight, then SEE. Through
your squinting eyes, you can see a bright light. Look at the light and
you find yourself back on Earth hurrying toward your friend, Arthur's,
house! Go north. You are amazed to see Arthur prostrate in the mud in
front of a bulldozer! No time to worry about Arthur and his problems
right now. You've got to give him back his towel and get the heck out of
here before the Vogons arrive to demolish the Earth. Open the satchel,
get the Satchel Fluff, the Towel and the Sub-Etha Signalling Device.
Close the Satchel and offer the towel to Arthur. As you do so, you
realize how much you'll miss Arthur and what a complete, uh what's the
word? IDIOT! Yes, idiot you're being trying to give Arthur his towel at
this moment of turmoil in his life. With calming words to Arthur, go to
Prosser and tell Prosser to lie down in the mud in Arthur's place. Some
softness in your head has made you decide to take Arthur with you! As
Arthur stands up, go south and west to the Pub. Buy beer and peanuts and
drink three beers.
 As you're explaining what's going to happen to the Earth, Arthur seems
wrapped up in his house problems so much that he hardly hears you. And
when the crash of his house comes wafting through the open doof of the
Pub, Arthur jumps up and races out the door. Go east. You see Arthur
stop long enough to feed a cheese sandwich to a small, starving dog,
then he rushes north. Go north and drop the satchel. Now put the Satchel
Fluff on top of the satchel. As you stand there watching Arthur bemoan
the fate of his house, a gale-force wind whips across the landscape and
the Vogon (true to their famous timing) Construction Ships arrive! As
you try to reach Arthur's side, the Sub-Etha Signalling Device falls
from your hand and lands at Arthur's feet! Although you try to tell
Arthur to push the green signalling button, your words never reach him!
You watch in fascinated horror as he picks up the device, looks at it
for a few seconds, then pushes one of its buttons. Everything fades from
view and you find yourself in the....
 Dark. "LOOK" until you regain your sense of hearing, then LISTEN and go
aft and up to the bridge. You see Ford's satchel sitting here and on top
of it is the Satchel Fluff! Take the satchel, then take the Satchel
Fluff. Put the Satchel Fluff in the Thing and drop the satchel. Flip the
switch again and as everything disappears, you find yourself in the....

 
                                PART EIGHT

 "LOOK" until you regain your sense of hearing, then LISTEN and go aft
and port to the Galley. It's time to tidy up all these loose ends and
bring the HOG succesfully and safely to the legendary world of
Magrathea. After all the travelling you've been doing, your source of
Brownian Motion has about had it! So let's go back to the Nutrimat and
get another cup of tea!
 Touch the pad on the Nutrimat. As it whirrs to life, it gets completely
confused regarding what it is you want and asks Eddie, the ship's
computer, to lend it a hand. Eddie, in the meantime, has issued a
warning that he's becoming overloaded with instructions and starts to
panic! All around you, you hear shouts of anger, fear, hostility! Don't
wait around for your tea, though! Go starboard and back up to the
Bridge. When you arrive, you see that the HOG has, indeed, reached
Magrathea! But the planet's inhabitants aren't to thrilled with this
supposed invasion. Out the viewing screen, you see hundreds upon
hundreds of missiles headed toward the HOG! No wonder everyone's
panicking! Put the large plug in the large receptacle and flip the
switch! As you watch the viewing screen in horror, you see the missiles
turn into giant, harmless sperm whales! Ford, Trillian and Zaphod
congratulate you on your fast thinking and return to their sauna,
leaving you alone once more. (Whew...that was a CLOSE call!)
 Go down and port back to the Galley. Sitting in the chute is a cup of
Real Tea! Obviously the previous circuit board didn't know the molecular
structure of real tea and the new Interface did! Get the real tea. As
you pick it up, you find you've dropped no tea. Get No Tea. Wow...this
is truly amazing! Well, no time to wonder about this for long, so go
starboard and back up to the Bridge. Remove the long dangly bit from the
tea substitute and drop your real tea. Put the long dangly bit in the
real tea, drop everything except the Babel Fish and the Thing and flip
the switch. Strangely, you find yourself in the....
 Dark. "LOOK" until you regain your sense of touch, then FEEL. Your hand
seems to be in some sort of liquid. Taste the liquid. UGH! It tastes
like Whale Juice! My God! You're in the tummy of a giant Sperm Whale!
Sitting here is a flowerpot. Get the pot, put it in the Thing and keep
trying to go north until you find yourself back in the....
 Dark. "LOOK" until you regain your sense of hearing, then LISTEN and go
aft twice and up to the Bridge. By now you should have all four fluffs.
Plant the fluffs, one at a time, in the pot. Wait until the fluffs start
to sprout and you see a tiny stem in the pot. (Consult the Guide about
Fluffs and required growing conditions.) Hmmmm, warmth and moisture?
That steam coming from port might just do the trick! Go port. In a
couple of hours, you emerge a changed man with a changed plant! Examine
the plant and you see it has, indeed, had a fit of furious growth! It
has also produced a fruit! Take the fruit and eat it.
 In addition to the wonderful flavor of the fruit, you find yourself
having a dream about Marvin, the broken Hatch Mechanism and Marvin
asking you to hand him a tool. Remember that tool (it changes from game
to game). As your dream fades, drop everything except the Babel Fish. If
you find that you haven't got the tool that the dream told you about,
Don't Panic! You'll find it in Marvin's Pantry (which is behind the
Screening Door). If you do have it, though, get the required tool, the
Real Tea (and pick up your No Tea!), and go up and aft to the Screening
Door. If you fooled with trying to open this door at the beginning of
the game, you know that it needs proof of your intelligence before it
will allow you to open it.
 What better proof than the fact that you're carrying Tea and No Tea at
the same time!? Open the door. In your encounters with Marvin you have
felt his waves of depression pouring over you whenever he enters the
room. Well, right through this door is the absolute soul of his
depression! Better drink something to calm you before you enter here, so
drink the Real Tea! Your quest for Real Tea was not wasted. The tea is
the most calming, wonderful substance you've ever tasted! Go port
through the door.
 If you didn't have the required tool, you should see it here. Also here
is Marvin, moross and despondent as usual. Tell Marvin to fix the Hatch.
He'll grumble about nagging humans, but will tell you to meet him in the
Hatch Mechanism Access in 12 turns. After he leaves (and you're sure you
have the required tool), go starboard and down. Drop everything you're
carrying except the Babel Fish and the required tool and go starboard
again.
 After waiting awhile, Marvin will stalk into the room and look at the
Mechanism. When he asks you to hand him the tool, do so. In short order,
he repairs the Hatch Mechanism and leaves. Go port, open the Hatch and
go down.
 Timidly, you step down the steps. Eddie says something about humans who
go out into strange environments without any clothing; but Zaphod,
Trillian and Ford all urge your forward! As you plant your first step on
the hitherto legendary planet of Magrathea, you wonder what fate awaits
you! You'll have to wait to find out...in the sequel, perhaps?

@endnode

@node ho "Hook"
@next hu
@prev hi

                      
                                   Hook


                                 PART ONE

You're at the pirates square. Go down muggers alley. Go to Dr. Chop. (a bit
to the right!). Take rollerblinder off the window. Ask Dr. Chop how to get
clothes (hat,pants,etc.) Ask Dr. Chop how you can earn some money. Let him
take two teeth of you. (do it again!) Check the map before you go there. Go
to Jolly Rogers place. Ask the manager about the war. Then ask him how to get
the hat, then leave. Go to pirate's square. Take washing line pole take an-
chor. Look at jacket. Go to pirate's square. Go to dead mans pier. Take rope.
Use rope with anchor. Take cups. Go out of there. Go to bait and tackle.
Take cup. Go upstairs and out. Now you're at the balcony, overseeing pirate's
square. This is the tricky part in Hook, you have to syncronize this other-
wise it is made in vain. You have to use the anchor tied to the rope at the
very top of the clock while at the same time you're in momentum of swinging
yourself to the other balcony you have to take the pirate's hat, tricky in-
deed. Now you use the door, then get back to the pirate's square (as fast as
hell!) and then to behind pirate's square. This has to be made really fast
because otherwise mrs. Smeedle's will make your day. At behind pirate's
square you take the jacket using the washing pole. Hope you made it fast
enough otherwise you'll have to do it again. Examine jacket. Go back to pi-
rate's square. Go to the muggers alley. Go to Jolly Roger's place. Go and
talk to fake Jake (the man who sits nearest the bar). Ask Fake Jake if he 
needs a drink. Give the bartender the 3 mugs.(again and again!) Give the bar-
tender the 3 coins (again and again). Give Fake Jake the 3 mugs filled with
cocoa. Take Fake Jake's pants. Go out the muggers alley. Go to the pirate's
square. Go to the muggers alley. Go to good form pier. Go to the ship. Go
to the right and take the coins that are in the pots. Go back to good form
pier and muggers alley, pirate's square. Go to ye' pirate's tailor. Ask the
tailor for any metaldetectors, then give the money to her. Go out to pirate's
square. Go to muggers alley. Go to good form beach. Use magnet on "X" on the
beach. Go back to muggers alley. Go to good form pier. Go to ship. Go to the
left of the ship.


                                 PART TWO

You're at the bottom of the sea. Examine the steelpiece. Examine the big
shell. Use washing line pole with the ropes. Use the big shell. You're now at
the lookout-point. Go right into neverforest. Now you're into neverforest,
just follow the signs if you're lost. Will help you a lot here. (though they
are not to be trusted fully!) Here's at least how I made it: Go right. Go
right. Go right. Go up. Go right. Go up. Go left. Go left. Go left. Go left.
Go up. Go right. Go right. Now you've made it. (by being trapped!) Go into
the tree.


                                 PART TREE

Now you're at the lost boy's dining area. Go to the round pond and talk to
Tink. Ask her everything. Go to the slingshot. Talk to Ace. Ask him every-
thing too. Go to the dining area. Go to the Lost Boys'workshop. Take the
arrow. Go to the jogging area. Use jogging equipment. (at least thrice!)
Go to the Avenger. Take the net. Examine the net. Go back to the jogging
area. Go to four seasons. Take the piece of dead wood. Use the dead wood with
the string. Take the flower. Go to the chicken and use the conchshell. Take
the eggs fast. Go to the jogging area. Go to the Lost Boys'workshop. Give
the eggs to the boy. Go to the dining area. Go to the round pound. Give the
flower to Tink. Take brnach from the tree. Go to the dining area. Go to the
slingshot. Use the piece of strong elastic with slingshot. Use the branch
with the string. Go to the dining area. Go to the Lost Boys'workshop. Use
bow with panpipes. Take panpipes. Go to the dining area. Go to slingshot. Go
to the cliffside. (upper!) Use yourself with the far corner of the fence. Go
back and do this thrice. Then ask Thudbutt what he thought about that. Go
back to slingshot and use slingshot with yourself. Ask Thudbutt what his
happy thoughts are. Go to slingshot. Go to dining area. Talk to Rufio. Say
"Oh Rufio!" to him. Go to the round pound and walk to the middle of the
screen. Now you're inside nevertree. Talk to Tink. Examine the brown pile in
the middle. Examine the chair to the right. Examine fireplace. Now wait and
watch the movie.


                                 PART FOUR

Now you're into the war with Hook, you're now fully Peter Pan. Back at Hook's
ship. This part is exactly the same as Monkey Island 1, slagging the more, 
the more you gain. This is how I did it: Tell Hook "Peter Pan the Avenger!".
Tell Hook "Good form James". Tell Hook "Tick Tock Tick Hook's of dead old
croc!". Tell Hook "You kidnapped my kids, Hook, you deserve to die!". Tell
Hook "Put up your swords, it's Hook or me this time!". Tell Hook "Peter Pan
the avenger".

@endnode

@node hu "Hugo 2"
@next in
@prev ho


                           Hugo II: "Whodunit?"
                    

Following the instructions in this list of points should get you all the way 
through Hugo 2: "Whodunit?", from Hugo's sudden disappearance to the surprise 
ending.  In a few cases, it is helpful to have "prepared commands. Type the 
commands while you are moving, or you may be able to type while on the pre-
vious screen, then hit <CR> as soon as you are in the new screen.


Parlor            --   --   Go upstairs to third bedroom (you can't do
                            anything else)

Bedroom            3    3   Hugo takes yellow book and disappears
                   5    8   Look through keyhole
                   3   11   Take yellow book and go through bookcase

Study              1   12   Talk to bird (who saw murder)
                   5   17   Take matches
                   5   22   Use telephone (with no result)
                  10   32   Enter dumbwaiter

Baby's Room       --   --   (Nothing but the author's little joke)

Kitchen            5   37   Take garlic

Venus Fly Traps   15   52   Get magnifying glass
                  --   --   (Find your way through the venus fly
                            traps.  It is a roundabout route.
                            Exits return to house and gate.)

Gardener's Shed   15   67   Eat Garlic (to get rid of gardener)
                            Red button  -- Overhead light
                            Yellow button -- Gate lights
                            Green button -- Bug light at bees (you
                            must see it first)
                  10   77   Blue button -- Gate to maze (you must
                            see it first)
                  --   --   Go right to gate and maze.  (If gate is
                            not open, return to shed and push blue
                            button again.)

Maze              10   87   Get gun
                   5   92   Get bell (good to call for help)
                  15  107   Get bottle (contains serum)

Bridge             5  112   Get catnip (sprigs by path)
                  --   --   Drop matches, take a step, pick up the
                            matches, repeat until over bridge
                  --   --   Go right

Bees              --   --   Stop when you enter area, then return to
                            gardener's shed.  (Note:  Drop matches
                            before you recross bridge, and pick
                            them up again later.)

Gardener's Shed   10  122   Push green button

Bees              --   --   Wait for bees to fly to light, then walk
                            through.

Old Man            5  127   Hit old man for asking dumb questions
                            (automatic)
                            Leave at right; Prepare for next scene

Snake             15  142   "Drink serum" -- prevents or cures snake
                            bite
                            Leave to right

Doghouse           5  147   Get stick
                   5  152   Throw stick (dog runs after it)
                  --   --   Get dynamite from doghouse
                  --   --   Return to snake area (dead end)

Snake             --   --   Go south

Phone Booth       --   --   Read wall across street
                   5  157   Enter phone booth (call police, meet in
                            living room of house at 6:00)
                  15  172   Dial 1-800-333-HUGO

Underground       10  182   Shoot robot (prepare while scene is
                            forming)
                  --   --   Walk into underground area
                  15  197   Meet doctor, who gives you screwdriver
                            (automatic)
                  --   --   Return via phone booth, snake, old man,
                            then down

Well               5  202   Climb down rope
                  --   --   Place dynamite (near pile of rocks)
                  --   --   Light dynamite -- then . . .
                  20  222   Climb rope (type as you walk left)
                  --   --   Climb down rope after blast and walk into
                            cave

Left Cave         10  232   Get lamp

Center Cave       --   --   Cross chasm by walking along front of
                            screen (can not be done after you have
                            met genie)
                   5  237   Get banana

Right Cave         9  246   Rub lamp
                  --   --   Talk to genie
                   7  253   Give banana (he will open trap door)
                  --   --   Climb ladder through trap door into house

Room with Safe     1  254   Look at mouse hole (bite is no problem)
                   8  266   Open safe with screwdriver
                   5  271   Take will (automatic)
                   8  279   Read will

Dining Room       --   --   Go right to cat room

Cat Room          --   --   Rub catnip on bell
                   5  284   Give bell to cat

Dining Room       --   --   Take album -- before maid returns
                   5  289   Look at album

Kitchen            5  294   (automatic)

Music Room         5  299   Talk to Harry

Hester's Room     15  314   Read letter -- while Hester is pouring
                            drink.  (This must be done on your
                            first trip to room.)

                            Note:  Some of these activities must be
                            performed to cause the policeman to
                            arrive.  If they are not done, you can not
                            play out the end of the game.  I do not
                            know which ones they are, except for the
                            one that I had to find to end my own game.

Living Room       --   --   Policeman assembles everyone in game (in-
                            cluding genie and snake)
                   1  315   Answer "whodunit" question correctly

Hugo, in Laundry   5  320   Take pencil
                   5  325   Take newspaper
                   1  326   Read newspaper
                  --   --   (Note: The answer is "herring," as in red.
                            Ha, ha.)
                   7  333   Slide paper under door
                  12  345   Push pencil through keyhole
                  --   --   Get out of room (automatic)

In Hallway        --   --   (automatic)

                            Note:  This gives you 345 out of 350
                            points.  You can get 5 more points if you
                            take the bell back after the cat uses it.
                            I presume this accounts for the last 5
                            points.

@endnode

@node in "Indiana Jones 4"
@next inf
@prev hu

                 
                  Indiana Jones 4 : The Fate of Atlantis
 
                                  
                                  INTRO 
 
 
You can skip the intro by hitting ESCAPE. Or you can play it. Here's what you 
have to do: Click on the pecuilar statue just to the right of you. You'll 
fall into the next room. Now, click on the rope to the right. Hit ESCAPE once 
to bypass the credits, but still play the intro. 
You'll fall into a library. Click on the books on statues to the left. You 
will fall again. Click on one of the four cat figurine. One of them is REAL. 
You will fall into the basement. Click on one of the lockers. One will have 
a statue inside. Like some things in this game, it's random. Get the horned 
statue and you're done with the intro! I thought that was a nice way for a 
game to begin. 

 
                                 THEATER 
 
 
Pick up the newspaper. Go to the back entrance. To get pass Biff the guard, 
just say that Madame Sophia is the greatest; she's smart. And when he asks 
you what he likes about her, tell him that she makes things so easy to under-
stand. Inside, talk to the stagehand. Keep bugging him. You'll have to watch 
Sophia's oration about Atlantis or you can ESC it. Ask him if he wouldn't 
rather be doing something... like READING. Then give him the newspaper. Play 
around with the levers until the three lights on top turn green, then push 
the button. You can talk to Sophia in her office or you can just ESC through 
the whole thing and go straight to Iceland. 

 
                                 ICELAND 
 
 
Go inside the dig site and talk to Dr. Bjorn Heimdall. Talk to him about 
Plato's Lost Dialogue. He'll tell you to speak with Costa and Sternhart. 
Go to Tikal first. 

 
                                  TIKAL 
 
 
Go into the jungle. You want to take the dark jungle path in the middle. 
To get pass the snake, chase the jungle rodent until he's at the entrance 
of the dark jungle path; then use your whip on it. The snake and the rodent 
will fight and fall over the chasm. Walk on the tree to get on the other 
side. Try to go into the temple and Sternhart will come out and stop you. 
You have to tell him the name of Plato's Lost Dialogue before he lets you in. 
Just say you don't know the title. And the parrot the tree will echo "title." 
Ask the parrot about title and he will tell you it's Hemocrates, a friend of 
Socrates. Try to go into the temple to get Sternhart out; this time, answer 
'The Hemocrates'. Inside the temple, ask Sophia to keep Sternhart busy. Now 
go outside and get the kerosene lamp while they're talking. Go back inside 
the temple. Open the kerosene lamp (Sternhart will remark that you took his 
lamp, but who cares). Use the lamp on the spiral designs on the left. Now 
pull the spiral design to get it. Use the design on the animal head on the 
left. Pull the elephant nose to open the tomb. Sternhart will take off with 
the Worldstone. Don't worry; he'll get what's coming to him later in the 
game! Just pick up the orichalcum bead instead. Now fly back to Iceland. 
 

                             ICELAND (again) 
 
 
Go into the old dig site. Poor Dr. Heimdall has frozen to death. Use the 
orichalcum bead on the exposed eel head. Get the eel figurine. Now fly to 
The Azores. 
 

                                THE AZORES 

 
Talk to Sophia and tell her to talk to Costa. Ask him about Plato's Lost 
Dialogue and where it is. He'll want to trade for something ... like Sophia's 
necklace. Refuse and ask Costa if he'll do business with Indy instead. Return 
control back to Indy. Now talk to Costa and give him the mysterious eel fi-
gurine. He'll tell you that Plato's Lost Dialogue is in the Sprague Collection. 
Now, sometimes the game will say Pearce Collection instead of Sprague, but 
either case you'll fly back to Barnett College. 
 

                             BARNETT COLLEGE 
 
 
Go down into basement. Get the dirty rag and the piece of coal. Go up to the 
library. Look at the school desk; get the wad of gum. Climb up the rope. Get 
the arrowhead to the right. Look carefully; it's damn small and easy to miss. 
Push the big crate to the left. It'll reveal a dusty old box. Now, I think if 
Costa tell you it's in the Sprague Collection the dusty old box will be the 
Pearce Collection, and vice versa. In any case, climb down the rope into the 
library again. Use the dirty rag with the arrowhead. Use the wrapped arrow-
head with the screw on the tipped-over bookcase. Unscrew all five screws. 
Open the bookcase. You now have Plato's Lost Dialogue. Now fly to Algiers 
first. 

 
                                 ALGIERS 
 
 
In Algiers, go all the way to the left and into the back alley. Go into 
Omar's Antique Shop. Get the mask. Omar will stop you; just ask him how much 
the mask cost and he'll give it to you free. Now talk to the knife thrower. 
And he'll say that he needs a volunteer. Then talk to Sophia and tell her how 
safe it is and how dexterous the knife thrower is. When Sophia's walks up to 
the knife thrower, PUSH her. And you'll get a nice knife in return. Now fly 
to Monte Carlo. 
 

                               MONTE CARLO 

 
Now you got to find Trottier. Alain Trottier is the guy in the brown suit and 
grey hair. Talk to him. Tell him you're Indiana Jones from Barnett College. 
If you tell him you're the greatest adventurer he'll tell you go bug off. 
In this case, go inside the hotel and talk to Sophia. She'll tell you to name 
drop Nur-Ab-Sal. Go back down and talk to Trottier again and tell him Nur-Ab-
Sal send you. He'll ask a question about Atlantis. The answer can be found by 
read Plato's Lost Dialogue. Then ask him to come up to see Madame Sophia. 
Don't say that Madame Sophia wants to trade wisdom, or come up to see the 
greatest show. Just get him up to the hotel room. In the room, tell Sophia to 
keep him busy while you try something while they're talking. Open the cabinet 
under the mirror and get the flashlight. Get the bedsheet. Open the fuse box. 
Pull the circuit breaker. Lights out! Use the bedsheet; use the flashlight; 
use the mask. In that order. Trottier will run out of the room, leaving the 
Sunstone behind. Now go outside and use the taxi to fly back to Algiers. 
 

                             ALGIERS (again) 

 
Go back to Omar's shop. Tell him you're interested in Atlantis and show him 
the Sunstone as proof. He'll tell you that he's made a map of a dig site. 
Tell him that you'll go in his place to check the site out. Don't worry if 
you come back empty handed. He'll ask you if you'd like to trade your mask 
for something. Say yes. Take the item Omar offers when he says something like 
red wagon, yellow scarf, etc. It's the color that's important, not the item. 
And it changes from game to game. Just take the item and offer it to the 
grocer (he's outside to the left of the knife thrower). If the grocer tells 
you he won't accept gift for himself and not of this color, go back to Omar's 
and trade it for another item, but of DIFFERENT color this time. Keep trying 
items of different colors until the grocer says something like this is a 
pleasant color. Once you know the color he wants it's just a matter of 
picking the right item. Once the grocer gives you the squab-on-a-stick, give 
it to the beggar and he'll let you have the balloon ticket. Go up to the roof 
and show the ticket to the balloon vendor. Get in the balloon. Once you're up 
in the air, cut the rope with the knife. 
 

                              UP IN BALLOON 
 
 
It shouldn't be too hard to figure out how to fly the balloon. Just land at 
each nomad camp and ask him about the map. He'll point you in the right di-
rection. Sail to the "X" when you see it; you'll get shot down. Go left to 
the abandoned dig site. 

 
                            ABANDONED DIG SITE 
 
 
You'll have to get Sophia out of the hole. Go down the ladder. Turn up your 
monitor's brightness and contrast (if you have them) if you're in the dark. 
Get the long rubbery thing (it's a hose). Get the clay thing (it's a clay 
jar) to the right of the track. Go back up to the truck. Use the hose with 
the gas tank; use the jar with the hose to get the gasoline. Go back down the 
ladder. Use the gas-filled jar with the metal cap. Turn on the portable ge-
nerator. Now, pick up a ship rib. Use the rib on the crumbling wall to the 
right. Pick up the wooden peg on the table. Use it on the mural. Use Sunstone 
with peg in hole. Use the Sunstone. Look at Plato's Lost Dialogue to find out 
how align the stone. This changes from game to game! Sophia will come out if 
you align the stone correctly. She'll give you an amber fish on a string 
(orichalcum detector) and a distributor cap. Open up the generator. Turn it 
off and get the ceramic thing, which is the spark plug. Go back up to the 
truck. Stick spark plug and distributor cap in engine, and close the hood. 
Get in truck and go to Crete. 
 

                                  CRETE 
 
 
Go to your right and follow the path. Go up to the log bridge and go ALL the 
way to the left. Get the surveyor's instrument. Now go down to the dig site. Explore all the rooms until you come to a mural. Again, 
the location of the mural varies from game to game. (I really hate it when 
Lucasfilms does this; makes writing a solve THAT much harder.) Once you found 
the mural go outside and locate the tall horns; they're in the center of the 
site. Look at the stone to left of the horns; you'll see a statue; use the 
surveyor's instrument on it. Align the crosshair so that it points to the 
left tall horn. Click on the crosshair. You should see a dotted line shoot 
out with an "X" trailing it. Look at the stone to the right of the tall horns 
and do the same; the same thing should happen. You'll now see an "X" on the 
ground. Dig with the ship rib and get the Moonstone. Leave the dig site and 
go to the right. Use Sunstone and Moonstone on spindle. Consult Plato's Lost 
Dialogue for the proper alignment. Go inside the Greater Colony of Atlantis. 
  
 
                        GREATER COLONY OF ATLANTIS 
 
 
Explore the area a bit. Walk around until you come to a minotaur statue. Use 
your whip on the statue's head. Walk to the fallen statue's head. You'll go 
down. Get the staff and Worldstone from Sternhart (he got what he so richly 
deserved). Look at the waterfall to the right. Use the chain and climb up. 
Get those statue's heads (it's near the entrance). Don't worry; without So-
phia you can pick up the last head and just make it through the closing gate. 
Put those three head on the other shelf/lever. Go inside the gate. Use the 
staff to free the counterweight. Walk around until you see a big statue of a 
head. Use the staff on its mouth. Up you go; get the gold box. Go back to 
where Sophia is. Give her the orichalcum beads and gold box. Go north and 
through the door. You have to talk Sophia into climbing in that small hole. 
She'll pull the pulley to open the gate. Go through the gate and walk around 
until you come to a room with a crumbling wall (you won't see it say that 
when you cursor around) with a pile of bones on the left and a broken column 
on the right. Use you orichalcum detector (amber fish on a string). Use ship 
rib on crumbling wall. Go to map room of Atlantis. Use all three stones on 
the spindle. Once again, consult Plato's Lost Dialogue for the correct align-
ment. Once the door is open go through it. Klaus Kerner will then take Sophia 
away. Give him the stones and he'll leave you alone. Go to the right and use 
the ship rib on the wall. Go out and go to the submarine. 
 

                                SUBMARINE 

 
Climb the ladder and go into the sub. Use the comm. and tell everyone move to 
the aft (or stern?) of the sub. Climb on down. Get the stein, bread, and cold 
cut. Use bread with cold cut. Use the stein to get the battery acid. Get the 
plunger. Climb back up to the conning room. Use the plunger on the control on 
the left. Use the acid on the strong box. Get stones and key. Go to the left 
of Sophia. Communicate with her. She'll pretend she's talking to Nub-Ar-Sal. 
Tell her to distract the guard or something. Go down and confront the guard. 
Sophia should knock the guard out cold with the bucket. Use the key on the 
emergency steering wheel. Now you have control of the submarine. Drive it so 
that it goes to the underwater dock. Getting the submarine align with the 
dock is a bit tricky, but not impossible. 

 
                             INSIDE ATLANTIS 
 
 
Sophia will be kidnapped. Get the ladder and use it on the steep incline. Get 
the ladder. Open the stone box. Get a rod and use a orichalcum bead on it. 
Instant light source! Now you need to use the three stones discs on the sta-
tue. Align the stones and give a orichalcum bead to the statue and the door 
will open. 

 
                             MAZE OF ATLANTIS 
 
 
You'll be presented with an overhead view. The rooms that a darkly shaded are 
ones you should explore. You'll see a "?" when you cursor over the unexplored 
ones. I can't tell you where EVERY item you need is. Just explore and you'll 
find it. I also can't tell you where every room is either. Go the Statue room
. Use the ladder to cross the chasm. Get the stone cup. Go to the subway, not 
the one right next to the entrace, but the one all the way to the right. Get 
rib cage from skeleton. Go to Crab room. Use either the sandwich (which you 
made on the sub) or the piece of food (which you can get from fighting a 
guard) with the rib cage. A word about fighting the guards, they're push over
. A few punches and it's lights out for them. Or you can simply run away from 
them. Use the crab trap on the pool of water in the Crab room. Wait until a 
crab gets trap and then get the cage. Get fish head statue. Go to Lava room.  
Use stone cup on the lever (?). Use fish head statue on plaque. Get the cup 
full of lava. You should also come across a wheel spoke and a piece of gear. 
They're both located in separate rooms where you see a dismantled Atlantean 
robot. Go to Machine room. Use wheel spoke in the place where it's missing a 
wheel spoke. Use the cup of lava on the funnel way on top of the machine. Get 
those orichalcum beads. Remember to get the wheel spoke again; you'll need it 
later on. Now in your exploring you should crawl into a grate that leads to 
Sophia's holding cell. You'll be in the air vent and you can't open the vent. 
Use an orichalcum bead on the robot right next to the vent. It'll go and 
crush the guard (literally!). Go to the Sentry room. You should have in your 
possession an eel figurine or statue. (If you don't go find it first.) Use a 
bead on the fish mouth statue. Use a bead with the eel figurine. Use another 
bead on the fish mouth. Go to Sophia's holding cell. Pick up that piece of 
statue. Go to the canal. Let Sophia rot in her cell. 

 
                                  CANAL 

 
Use the crab in rib cage on the octopus. Use a bead on the float's mouth. 
Use the Sun, Moon, or World stone on the spindle above the gates to open them
. Explore the canal. You should see a stairway leading up to another room. Go 
in the room and you should see a crescent shaped gear. Get it. Now close the 
cupboard. Look at the cupboard. The diagram on it is VERY important, so copy 
it down. Go back to the canal and sail around. You should come to a doorway. 
Go through the doorway and you'll be in a room with a sentry. Use the chain 
with sentry statue's right arm. Use ladder on sentry. Look at chest plate. 
You should have FOUR gears and one bead. Arrange the gears following the cup-
board's diagram. What you want to do is have the sentry's right arm come FOR-
WARD. Then you can attach the chain to the bronze loop on the door. Rearrange 
the gears again so that the right arm pulls BACKWARD. This will open the door
. Get the hinge pin on the floor and go through the door. Walk around and ex-
plore the door. Be sure to get the scepter from that room with the lava pit. 
Find the room with the hulking machine in it. Put an orichalcum bead in the 
mouth. Use the scepter and hinge pin on those slots. Push all the slots UP. 
Use the scepter or pin again on one of the empty slot. The hulking machine 
should start up. To stop it, push the levers down. The hulking machine will 
fall into the lava. Follow the bridge and you should be in a place with door-
ways and streams of lava. Go into each doorway until you're at the lava 
squares. Just walk across it. There will be a path no matter which square 
you step on. Walk down the stairs. Go into the building ahead. Use the Sun, 
Moon, and World discs on the spindle. Align them in this order: 
 

                                 Tall Horns 
 
                                   Full Moon 
                                          Volcano 
 
                          Noon Sun 

 
The top disc (Worldstone) should have the Volcano pointed to the RIGHT. The 
Moonstone should have Full Moon pointed to the Tall Horns. And the Sunstone 
should have Noon Sun pointed in a SW direction. 
 

                               END OF GAME  

 
Klaus and the mad German professor will come out. They'll argue about who 
should try the godhood machine first. Klaus will take the first crack at it. 
Indy will remind him of Plato's tenfold error about putting how many beads 
into the machine. Either way Klaus will be transformed into a goat-like crea-
ture who will fall into the lava. The mad doctor will then want YOU to try it
. Just convince him that if the experiment does work then you will be majorly 
pissed with him and will send him straight to hell. After that just stand 
back and watch the ending.

@endnode

@node inf "Infidel"
@next k1
@prev in


                                  Infidel

    
get up, s, s, get rock and pack and matches, w, w, get axe and shovel, e, e,
s, s, open sack, put pack and matches and axe in sack, get canteen, get sack,
n, n, n, n, break lock with rock, get lock, drop lock and rock, open trunk, 
get beef and map, s, w, w, drink, open canteen,fill canteen, close canteen, e
, e, e, s, s, e, e, dig in sand, again, again, again,again, unfold map, put 
cube in opening,drop map and shovel, d, drop sack,eat beef, open canteen,
drink, close canteen, drop canteen, get rope, tie rope to altar,throw rope 
north, get torch and jar and matches, open jar, pour liquid on torch, close 
jar, light match, light torch, put matchbook and jar in sack, get sack, d,
push statue, get head, push statue, nw, drop head,se, se, se, get opal, nw, 
nw, nw, get head, push statue, se, again, drop, head, nw, nw, nw, get diamond
, se, se, se, get head,push statue, nw, push statue, ne, drop head, sw, sw, 
sw, get emerald, ne, ne, ne, get head, push statue, sw, again, drop head, ne, 
ne, ne, get ruby, sw, sw, u, drop all but torchs, d, ne, nw, n, e, d, w, put 
torch in knothole, get shim, drop shim, push up beam, get torch, e, u, w, get 
beam, s, w, n, e, n, d, d, n, n, e, s, get silver chalice, n, w, w, s, get 
golden chalice, n, e, s, s, u, u, s, w, s, e, se, sw, u, u, put ruby and dia-
mond and emerald and opal in sack, get sack, w, s, get first brick,drop first 
brick, get third brick, drop third brick, get fifth brick, drop fifth brick,
e, n, d, drop sack, get axe, break plaster with axe, get sack, w, w, w, put 
beam in niches, stand on beam, break plaster with axe, open door, w, get beam
, s, put beam in doorway, open door, w, drop sack, put diamond in first hole, 
put ruby in second hole, put emerald in third hole, put opal in fourth hole, 
open slab, get book, get jar, open jar, pour liquid on torch, drop jar, get 
sack, e, get beam, n, n, put beam under lintel, break seal with axe, drop axe
, open door, n, e, put silver chalice on left, put golden chalice on right,
drop sack, put pack in silver chalice, get scarab, w,put book in large recess
, put scarab in small recess turn neith, turn selkis, turn isis,turn nephthys
, open sarcophagus.

@endnode

@node k1 "King's Quest 1"
@next k3
@prev inf


                               King's Quest 1                              


King Edward's domain has been ravaged. Through trickery, three of the King's  
items of power have been stolen from him. The kingdom lies in ruin. Its down-
fall is imminent. It is up to you, Sir Graham, to recover the King's treasures
. Succeed and you shall be crowned King of Daventry!  Fail and the worst of 
fates shall befall you.

One word of caution before you start: Never drop anything until you're told
to do so. Once an item is dropped in this game, you cannot pick it up again.  
For some reason, you're never weighed down by too many items; so you should 
be able to pick up and carry every item with you at all times.  Also, in or-
der to get maximum points, you must pick up everything you can and look at it
, read it, or whatever is required.  (I lost 2 points for pouring some water 
on the ground!) Enough said.

Begin your quest by going northwest to the garden. Once there, pick a carrot 
and go west to the other side of the garden, south to the left of the castle  
and west to the rock. Stand on the north side of the rock and move it. Doing  
so reveals a dark hole. Look in the hole and then get the dagger. Then go 
west and swim west across the pond (both screens). Once out of the pond, go 
north to the well and west to the gate in the corral.

Open the gate and enter the corral. When you see the goat, show it the carrot
. Now he'll follow you wherever you go. This is important as you'll soon see.   
Exit the corral and head west twice. You may or may not see a fairy godmother 
handing out blessings. If you do see her, she'll give you a short lived pro-
tective spell. If you don't see her, no problem.  She'll pop up every now and 
then.

Now go north to the clover patch and get a clover. This is a four-leaf clover  
and will protect you from Leprechauns if the need arises. Go north to the 
wooden bridge. (Goat still with you?) As you start to cross the bridge, an  
ugly troll bars the way and refuses to let you pass unless you throw him a  
treasure. However, your goat, which hates trolls, rushes the troll and butts 
him off the bridge! The troll is swept downriver, never to be seen again. The 
goat, having fulfilled its use, strolls away.  So wave goodbye and cross the 
bridge and continue north.

You've found a crotchety old gnome and when you talk to him, he informs you
that he has something to give you that might be useful...but only if you can
guess his name! The crusty old fellow gives you three chances. Type "IFNKVOHG
ROGHPRM" and the gnome, in amazement, says "That's Right!" and leaves a hand-
ful of magic beans laying on the ground. The gnome's name, by the way, is a 
cryptogram. The alphabet's been reversed and the new letter set has been sub-
stituted for "Rumpelstiltskin".

Get the beans and go east to another wooden bridge. Be careful you don't fall 
in the gorge! Cross the bridge and go east to the flower patch. Plant the 
beans here and all of a sudden, a huge beanstalk stretches up out of sight 
into the clouds! Don't climb it yet, though. Go east and swim east across the 
lake. When you exit the lake, continue east Look in the hole in the big rock  
as you pass...what an odd green glowing!) Go east again.  A little dwarf may 
come and make a quick inspection of your possessions to see if there's any-
thing of value. You don't have anything of note and he leaves. Now go east 
once more to the little beach by the river. Get the pebbles you see laying 
here then go west back to the beanstalk. CAUTION! Save your game here. Clim-
bing the beanstalk is a risky business and you'll most certainly fall off it 
many times before you reach the top.

Climb the beanstalk until it enters the clouds. Leave the beanstalk by going  
east into the clouds and continue east until you enter an area of trees. When  
you reach the first set of trees, head south then east twice until you come 
to a tree with a hole in its base. Look in the hole and get the sling. Go 
back west twice to the fruit tree then north. Now this is a bit tricky. There 
is a tree on the upper right edge of the screen that you should go to before 
you go east to the next screen.  This area will give you the most amount of 
time to evade the giant before he kills you!

Go east...there he is! Go as quickly as you can and hide behind the center
tree. Make sure Graham is completely hidden behind the tree. Now just wait
there. Eventually, the Giant will become tired and lie down under the tree
and go to sleep. Now's your chance...

The chest he's carrying is King Edward's Magic Chest! Get it and head west
back to the beanstalk. Make sure you walk in the right places or you'll fall  
out of the clouds! It would be a good idea to save your game before you de-
scend. Go back down the beanstalk and head south three times then east to the 
well.

Stand on the north side of the well and cut the rope. Cutting the rope gets
the bucket for you. Now lower the rope into the well and climb down the rope.   
When you get to the end of your rope (so to speak!), dive under the water and  
head southwest into the hole. Careful not to become tangled in the weeds!

When you exit the hole, you're face to face with a fire-breathing dragon! 
Stay in the middle of your screen and go only as far as the second rock. 
Throw water on the dragon's fire and he's vanquished! In fact, he's so emba-
rassed that he moves a boulder blocking the western exit from the cave and  
skulks away! On the northern side of the cave is the King's Magic Mirror! 
Take the mirror and leave the cave by going west twice. Outside the cave, you 
see a large, friendly bird flying back and forth. We'll get to him later, 
though, so head south twice to the stump.

Look in the stump and you see an old canvas pouch. Get the pouch and look in-
side it. When you do so, you see it's filled with sparkling diamonds! Go east  
and swim east across the lake twice, then continue east to where you found  
the dagger and north to the big tree. Climb the tree and go to the nest. 
Craddled in the nest is a large golden egg! Get the egg and climb back down 
the tree and go north twice to the tree.

Laying on the ground under the tree are walnuts. Get a walnut and open it. On  
the inside you find a solid gold walnut! Go east and get the bowl you see,  
then go south. Running around the banks of the lake is a friendly little elf.

Talk to the elf and he's so impressed by your manners that he gives you a ma-
gic ring! Wearing it will make you invisible...but only once! So save it un-
til you need it!

Go north, east twice and north twice to the back of the woodcutter's house.
Now go west and enter the front door. Inside you see a deplorable sight. A
starving woodcutter and his wife sit dejectedly at an empty table. Too bad
you can't help  them...say perhaps that bowl...? Look at the bowl and you see 
the word "FILL" written on its bottom. Give the bowl to the woodcutter. He  
looks at you wonderering why you'd give them an empty bowl. Say "FILL" and  
the simple ceramic bowl fills to the brim with hot stew! For this precious  
gift (an unending supply of food!), the woodcutter gives you his only other  
possession, an old fiddle laying in the corner. Get the fiddle (careful you 
don't fall through the floor!) and leave the cottage.

So go south from the woodcutter's house, swim across the lake in a southerly
direction, then continue south and go around to the front door of the Witch's  
Cottage. (Taste her house if you must, it's quite good!) Save your game at 
this point. Open the cottage door and make your way to the bedroom. Now wait.  
Eventually, the witch will come home. She won't see you because you're in the 
other room. Sneak up on her and push her into the stove! You done the old hag 
in and can move about her house without fear now.

Go to the cabinet on the north wall, open it and take the cheese wedge. Now
go back south and leave the cottage. Now comes the fun part. Go west and go
south to the front of the cave where you found the Magic Mirror. The large
friendly bird seems to be waiting for you! Go down to the lower middle por-
tion of your screen and keep jumping up until the bird (which is actually a 
Condor) catches you.

The Condor flies high up in the air and carries you to a small island which
lies in the moat in front of the castle. When he drops you, your head spins
as you try to regain your bearings. There's an odd hole in the ground here,
but  don't go down into it just yet. Head west and get the mushroom you see
growing here.  Now go back east and down into the hole. Oops, the long drop
seems to have set your head spinning again! When it stops spinning, go south 
to the end of the tunnel then - cautiously - head west.

There's a hungry rat running in circles here and when you talk to it, he says  
he won't let you pass until you give him a treasure. Don't get too close to 
it! Throw the cheese to the rat. Being hungry, he's just as satisfied with 
the cheese as he would have been with a treasure, and he scurries away into 
some unseen crevice in the rocks. Go to the door,open it, and go west through 
the door.

On the other side of the door is a tiny leprechaun, who, upon seeing your
clover, lets you pass unmolested. Go south and play the fiddle for the King
of the Leprechauns. They dance and dance to your music then finally they all  
leave the hall. As the King of the Leprechauns leaves, he forgets to take his 
Sceptre! Get the sceptre and look! Next to the Leprechaun King's throne is 
King Edward's Magic Shield!

Get the shield and go west up the stairs. Continue west until you come to the  
little hole in the western wall. Now, eat your mushroom and you're shrunken  
down to a size small enough to allow you to enter the hole. Go west into the 
hole and you find yourself in front of the big rock where you saw the strange  
green glow! Eventually, you regain your former size, but wasn't it fun being 
so tiny?

Go north twice then east three times to the left hand side of the castle.
Walk (carefully!) across the bridge and open the door. Enter the castle and
follow the hallway to the throne of King Edward. Bow to the King and he de-
scends his throne. You've managed to recover the Strength of Daventry and
the king places his crown upon your head! As he does so, he falls to the
ground in a seizure and dies. Heavy lies the head that wears the crown. You  
ascend to the throne to govern Daventry as King Edward had...guarding the  
Treasures of Power that you labored so long to recover. Thus ends the King's 
Quest.

@endnode

@node k3 "King's Quest 3"
@next k5
@prev k1


                              King's Quest 3


KING'S QUEST III starts a bit different than the first two. You begin a sim-
ple slave. As always, keep the role in mind. This means you will have to 
think like a slave and act accordingly. If you are to ever escape the wi-
zard's evil clutches, you will have to use stealth and guile. Keep your own 
counsel, and don't get caught even thinking of escape! You begin at the entry 
of Manannan's abode. The wizard appears, and remarks that you have been lax 
in handling the chores. Being who you are, you immediately carry out all of 
his orders. You will need to carry out whatever task it is (usually the kit-
chen), then, if it was something else, go to the kitchen, where this walk-
thru begins. One more thing: I prefer a two save approach to such games. That 
is, I use one as a miscellaneous save at the bottom for most of the little 
things. After a scene has been thoroughly examined, I do a "normal save," 
such as: "AFTER ALL SPELLS--0:30:27--62PTS." This way I find that I don't 
have a bunch of useless saves that only add to the confusion. Good luck and 
happy Questing! You get the knife, spoon, bowl, fruit, mutton, and bread, 
then go south to the dining room and get the cup. Head west and you're back 
at the entry. Now, up the stairs and east. "Look" and you find yourself in 
your own pitiful bed chamber and recall that Manannan never comes in here. 
"Drop All" and notice that it's a safe hiding place. "Get All" then out into 
the hall (still in the same scene) "Look" then "Look Behind Tapestry." Hmm,
seems to be a threat! Go west and you are again at the head of the stairs. 
Oh, NO! It's him again! What's this, he's leaving? Well, while the cat's 
away.... Go north and you find yourself in the "Master Bedroom." Totally in-
decent in its opulence! Decadent in the extreme when compared to the meager 
cot in your own room. (What if he comes back?) You stop to admire the reflec-
tion in the mirror but are only reminded of your lowly position. "Open Drawer
" and you find a small mirror (keeping it for yourself). Now what else might
be useful? "Look in Closet" and sheesh what a fancy wardrobe! Somehow you
resist the temptation to wear such finery but "Look Behind Clothes" and WOW!
A map could be very useful, if you ever get out of this place! Now "Get Map" 
and "Look at Map." Seems to be a rather unhelpful piece of parchment, but who 
knows? Being cautious you "Close Closet" (pun not intended) and "Look on Top 
of Closet." A key? Now what could that open? This could be important so, of
course, you take it with you.  Then it's over to the dresser and "Open Drawer
" to find a vial of essence. Doesn't mean much but probably worth more than 
the map and it, too, winds up in your seemingly bottomless pockets. Go south 
then up the stairs to the observatory. "Look Through Telescope" (So That's 
his Secret!), then "Get Fly" (My you really are desperate, aren't you?), and 
go all the way back downstairs, to the first floor. At the entry, go north to 
the study and "Open Cabinet" and VOILA! (Worry sets in now, to get caught is 
to be -- well, let's not think about it!) You gather your courage, and con-
tinue the search. Since anything could help, you "Look at Books" and "Move 
Book." Now what? "Move Lever" and panic almost overcomes you!  This has got 
to be one of his biggest secrets! So that's why he doesn't want you in the 
study alone! You tremble and shake but press on. After all, if he caught you 
now, well you certainly would be on his bad side. Down those dark stairs you 
go, but extreme caution is the word, as even something as silly as a cat on 
the stairs could spell your doom! (This is the only place I've found where 
the cat is actually dangerous.) Down and down again. Most certainly this is 
the dungeon, where he tortures his victims and...no! Why, it's a laboratory! 
"Look" then "Look at Book" and hope shines anew! You "Look at Shelf" and "Get
" the six ingredients. An odd combination of emotions begins to take hold of 
you now as you experience a dreadful fear and hope at the same time. So close 
to freedom, yet so close to the wrath of one of the most contemptible of all 
creatures, a slave owner! The die is cast, there can be no turning back now. 
It's all or nothing and you know it! You keep the goodies, and head back up 
those stairs. (Has he returned yet?) Cautiously, you stick your head up into 
the study, half expecting a most horrible confrontation. Surprised to find 
you're still alive and human, you quickly close the trap door, replace the 
book and return the wand to the cabinet. You go south twice, and find your-
self outside. Ah, the chickens! You "Open Gate" and "Get Chicken Feather." 
Knowing that you need to know more about Llewdor before making good your es-
cape from the tyrant, you head down the mountain. (Be sure to save your game 
first!) The trail down the mountain is treacherous, but make it you do. (The 
bottom of the mountain is a good place for the miscellaneous save.) Once at 
the bottom, head west, then west again, desert country -- what? That was 
quick! Oh well, "restore game." (You did save it at the bottom of the moun-
tain, didn't you?) From the bottom of the mountain, you go west and stop long 
enough to get ready to "Show Mirror to Medusa," then west again and turn 
around. (Where is she?) You sense her approach and <CR> Got her!! Perseus 
would be proud! But you aren't here to do battle, you are on a scouting 
mission. So you decide to move on quickly. After all, stealth and guile are 
important, but so is time! You head south and spot a nice cactus by the rock, 
"Get Cactus" and further south (nothing here), south again and "Get Snake 
Skin." Go east and there's an eagle!  As the eagle flies by, he drops a tail 
feather, so you "Get Feather" and go east again. The scenery here is just 
lovely. So much prettier than the desert that you tend to linger. (Sierra's 
famous "if it's slow, it's important".) You take in the lovely scene and no-
tice the mud along the river. "Get Mud" and continue east. (If you are really 
tempted to try the cave, save game first!) From the cave you head east once 
more to find a coast line. Hmm. Can't go any further this way. You go north 
along the coast and "Get Water." Not much around here so, north again. Aha! 
Now this is more like it! Looks like civilization, so up the ladder and west.
Decisions, decisions! Okay, you try the bar. Nothing much here, no action at 
all as a matter of fact. (Unless you try to "Kiss Barmaid!") So it's off to 
the store.  Finding that you can't buy anything without money, you pet the 
dog (he's irresistible) and leave. Outside you take the easiest route -- 
south. Here you find stunted trees, but on closer inspection, there's a sprig 
of mistletoe. (Now where *is* that barmaid?) You "Get Mistletoe" and head 
west. Why this is right out of a fairy tale! After making sure there is no 
one home, you boldly break into the house. Looking around, you don't find 
much, so it's upstairs for some real searching. The beds look comfortable, 
but you have no time to nap. "Open drawer," and a shiny, silver thimble is
there. You "Take Thimble" and take your leave. Downstairs again, you can't 
help but feel there is something missing. Must be your imagination, so out-
side and "Look at Flowers" because they are so pretty. You "Get Dew" and go 
west again. Nothing here, so it's north.  Here you find nuts, but none to 
suit your needs. Hmm, could be some in that hole though, so you "Reach in 
Hole," and nah. It couldn't happen twice in one man's lifetime. (Better save 
game since this is unpredictable!) You climb the ladder only to find the o-
riginal robber's roost! But since he is asleep, you do what you must, and 
steal from him. (It's only fair.) After you have the purse, you don't even 
wait to get away, you count the coins, eight of them! With this much money, 
you know what to do! You look at the map, point to the village and -- WHOOSH!
Back to the store. What a way to travel! You re-enter the store, "Look at 
Shelf," and buy the four items that seem most important to you. These items 
are salt, lard, fish oil, and an empty pouch. Suddenly you are almost over-
come with fear! The wizard! He could be home by now! You look at the map a-
gain and point at the top of the mountain, and -- WHOOSH! Nope! It didn't 
work. Oh well, you sigh and start up that long, dangerous path. (Don't forget 
to save your game first!) At the top of the mountain, the fear is the worst! 
What if he is back? What will you do if he's waiting just inside the door? 
You open the door and the coast is clear! Better get rid of all this stuff! 
Upstairs, and east to your own little room. You drop all and hide it way un-
derneath the bed. Now if only he doesn't come in here! Oooopps! Better get 
some of that food, he's always hungry whenever he returns. You "Get Fruit" 
and start downstairs. You worry and fret; but when he does return, he doesn't
seem the least suspicious. Just hungry, the self-centered lout! Being a slave 
and all does have its drawbacks. Not only do you have to fetch his meals, you 
are expected to stand there and watch! The man has absolutely no class. But 
you stand there in case he wants something else. Such is the lot of a simple 
slave. They way he eats, it's too bad it isn't poison! After belching loudly, 
he takes his leave, and not even thanks! Ah, to heck with him! You think for 
a minute, he always takes a nap after he eats like that. Hmm! And then you 
can get back to plotting the escape! But not before, you caution yourself, 
since it is far too risky with him about, And you almost got caught coming 
back up the mountain! You go back upstairs, waiting in front of his bedroom. 
When he does take a nap, you'll want to know.  And there he is. Don't disturb 
him? You wouldn't even dream of it! Now, quickly you go to the east, to your 
own room. Wait, there's the cat. You "Get Cat" and "Get Cat Hair," then into
the bedroom and "Get All." You try to calm yourself, but still you race back 
to the stairs and down. You go into the study, and with trembling hands, open 
the cabinet. Taking the wand, you close the cabinet and go to the bookcase. 
Taking a deep breath, you open the trapdoor and carefully go down those dark 
and dangerous stairs. The laboratory brings back the fear, but you calm your-
self and go to the table. The ancient book calls to you. This is where the 
hope is! Slowly you "Open Book to Page II." The room begins to glow and 
strange music plays. Shivers run through your body, but you are as if trans-
fixed. You read from the book (the handbook not the disk) and follow the 
steps most carefully. (Except step II must be: "Put the dog fur in the bowl" 
since you have both.) The last of the incantation is read, and you wave the 
magic wand. Whew! Success! Since that one worked, another is called for, so 
you return to the book and "Open Book to Page IV" and follow directions 
exactly! Again you complete the spell and hope gives you strength. You decide 
on just one more for now, where was that spell? Transforming another into a 
cat! That's it! Once more you go to the book and "Open Book to Page XXV." The 
odd colored lights again return, and the music starts anew. With shaking 
hands and strained nerves you begin the spell. Carefully you follow directions
, but is it right? Tension builds, and builds still more. The longer you work 
at it the more you shake, until at last! You wave the magic wand and Ahh....
Strained to the breaking you realize that at last you have the means to eli-
minate the evil, old Manannan forever! Then you realize that you have lost 
all track of time. When will he awaken? Has he already finished his nap? No, 
plenty of time. Looking at the cookie it occurs to you that it's going to be 
tougher than you thought to get him to eat the disgusting cookie. Somehow it 
will have to be diguised.  But how?  You try to "Put Cookie into Bread," but 
that doesn't work. Hmm. Have to think of something. You look at the map, and 
readily see that there isn't much that you have yet to see. You point to the 
bottom of the mountain and WHOOSH! Yes, this is the bottom of the mountain, 
so east. Ah, there's that cave again. Not much left then, so it's east once 
more and -- nope. Just more coastline. Hmm, back to the west. Go north and 
you are again facing the mysterious cave. Let's see, how do you pass a spider 
web that size? You don't want to chance it so, "Dip Eagle Feather in Essence" 
and fly into the cave. Navigation seems a bit odd as an eagle. Hard to con-
trol where you go. Hey! Spider alert! As you get close to the spider, some-
thing comes over you and it's curtains for the spider. As the spell wears off 
you notice that the web has been torn to shreds. You oh-so-cautiously enter 
the cave, and a presence causes you to freeze. What is this place? There in 
front of your eyes appears an oracle. It seems she knows you! More than that, 
she also knows who you really are. As you gaze into the vision she creates, 
it is revealed to you that there is another whose fate is far worse than 
yours. Not only that, but it is your duty to go to their aid! How are you 
ever going to manage? They say it's always darkest before the dawn. You gird 
yourself and go forth. But how can one such as yourself be of any aid to one 
such as that? And in a land far, far away! The spells! You realize that your 
only hope is to be rid of the tyrant wizard (which you had in mind anyway) 
and finish the spells. In order to finish the spells, you still need three 
dried acorns. Where might they be found? The desert is dry, but nothing grows 
there except cactus. Perhaps near the desert? You head west and cross the 
stream, but what's this? You overhear two birds discussing, of all things, 
YOU! Further west and two squirrels seem to have the same thing on their 
minds. Seems like you are the prime topic in all of Llewdor. The conversation 
is only moderately interesting, but it seems to clear your senses, for in-
sight strikes. The thing that was missing! That fairy tale cottage! You hurry 
off, to the north twice, then east. Yes, it is the house of the Three Bears, 
and there they go now! As soon as they leave, you enter the house. There on 
the table is the thing that bothered you so when last you visited, simply be-
cause it should have been there. Porridge! What an ideal way to hide the 
cookie! You "Get Porridge" and exit quickly. (Those bears may no longer have 
a sense of humor!) Outside the house you continue the search for the acorns. 
Nothing here, so west again. Nope. Nothing but a couple of noisy squirrels. 
Argh! And two nasty bandits! They assault you severely, hit you right on top 
of the head, and steal everything! At least you know where the hideout is, so 
north you go. And there it is! Wait a second. You pause long enough to search 
those nuts just one more time. Lo, and behold! You find three dried acorns. 
You "Get Acorns" and "Reach in Hole." (Save the game.) The ladder appears 
again so up you go. Quietly you enter, finding the thief sound asleep. Care-
fully you approach the table and nab the purse. Now, where is the rest of it? 
You spot a bin in the corner that you hadn't noticed before. You "Open Bin" 
and "Look in Bin", there it all is! Quickly, you abandon the treehouse, climb 
down the rope and run to the east. Even here you don't stop, you feel like 
just running forever. Almost blindly you head north where the treacherous 
mountain path brings you up short. You know that you can't risk hurrying up
that trail.  Maybe they aren't following. You can't help yourself, you simply 
HAVE to know. Carefully, you take inventory, even to counting the coins in 
the purse.  What's this? There's eight coins! But that's more than...oh, well
. That path, hmm. There should be an easier way. Wait! Why walk? You "Dip Ea-
gle Feather in Essence" and take to the air. Not only is this a lot safer, 
it's FUN! At the top of the mountain, you say the magic words, and look for a 
safe place to land. Oops, right in the middle of the chicken coop! Any lan-
ding that you walk away from is a good one! You "Open Gate" and head for the 
house, "Open Door" and hurry to the study. Yup, you left the trapdoor open, 
and the wand! Got to put that back, too! You're too close to freedom to let a 
little mistake ruin it all. So you "Open Cabinet," "Move Lever," and "Move 
Book". There that's better. Now it's back to the entry and up the stairs. You 
go to your room, and "Put Cookie in Porridge" and when you "Look at Porridge" 
you relax for a moment. It will work! It HAS to work! You "Drop All" and "Get 
Porridge" and it's off to the dining room. Patience is an asset to a slave, 
but was never one of your virtues. As a matter of fact it's all you can do to 
keep from dancing from one foot to the other. But wait you must. You have 
time on your hands for a short time, but it seems an eternity! You reflect on 
the danger ahead and the task set before you. Desperately you try thinking of 
anything but the porridge and the waking wizard! There he is now! Somehow you 
calm yourself so as not to give any clue that something is amiss. Now, go to 
the kitchen, must make it appear that you are preparing a normal meal. You 
can't control yourself, you turn right around and return to the dining room. 
You "Feed Wizard" and anxiously watch his every bite. He eats, and eats, and 
"Ding-dong, the witch is dead..." or something like that! Hooray! Up the 
stairs, and back to your bedroom again. (For the last time!) You "Get All" 
and go back to the stairs, then down to the study. You get the wand and open 
the trapdoor and cautiously go down to the laboratory. You feel a sense of 
exultation, but also a sense of purpose. You are almost driven to complete 
the spells, because, after all, she is your sister. Going to the table, you 
open the book to the proper page, and begin to tremble anew as the lights 
play tricks and the weird music starts to play. Hope carries you as you pa-
tiently carry out the instructions for the spell to teleport at random. Each 
step is completed in accordance with the book, you recite the verse, and wave 
the wand. Again you find success, and again you go to the book. Only three 
spells left, and the powers of the wizard are yours! You open the book again, 
this time to the spell marked Deep Sleep. This one seems to be a bit harder. 
The trembling is more pronounced. You get the feeling that you aren't going 
to make it, the words on the page begin to blur. But finally it's over and 
you have still another spell to call your own. The last two are certain to be 
tough! Again you open the book, now to page LXXIV. The music causes tension, 
the strain is great. The spell is very exacting, but so were the others. This 
spell, and the next come hard, but in the end they are yours. At last you are
, in truth, a wizard in your own right! The feeling of power is intoxicating! 
POWER! What a feeling! With this much power, what could not be done?  Why, 
perhaps you should put the cat/wizard to sleep forever? No, have him telepor-
ting at random for the rest of eternity! Slowly, you come back to your senses
. The wizard is already suffering his fate. To do more would be to become as 
he was. No, you realize that you have been called to a higher purpose. You 
must save your sister and the kingdom of your parents. You wonder what they 
must be like. Transportation will be a problem. To know this is to know that 
the tiny village is the only hope. You look at the map and point to it. 
WHOOSH! And here you are.  You feel that already you have become used to such
methods of travel. It all seems so natural. Barely hesitating, you go into
the bar, find three sailors and try to strike up a conversation. Aha! That's 
just exactly what you do want. Money is no object, so you "Give Gold to Cap-
tain." Why the louse! Such poor manners! Grabbed all of your gold, and left
without so much as "glad to have you." (Maybe he would like to be a cat?) No, 
that's bad thinking. No time to scold yourself though, so it's off you go for 
a long walk out on the pier. And this must be the ship. Yes, there's the cap-
tain now, and he seems anxious to get you aboard. That gangway looks a bit 
tricky, but you are becoming used to such narrow walks. As you step aboard, 
you get the feeling that something is wrong. But what could it be? Why these 
men aren't sailors! They're PIRATES! Before you can even manage a simple 
spell, they grab all of your possessions and throw you rudely into the hold.
What a predictament! A short time ago you felt as if you were all-powerful,
now you couldn't feel more powerless! You look around and find that there is 
a ladder just above you but just out of reach. You go east and look some
more.  There! That small box will surely do. You "Get Box" and go back to the 
west, "Drop Box," and "Jump on Box." Yes, it will work! You "Jump on Box" 
again and the "Jump" to the ladder. Cautiously, you stick your head up out of 
the hold, then climb right up from there. Hmmm, this seems to be the cap-
tain's quarters. You go west and "Open Chest" then "Look in Chest." Quickly 
you take your leave, lest you be caught and the possessions taken from you 
again -- or worse! At the ladder you face another tough decision. Up, or fur-
ther east? Not down, you know what is down there. Wait a second, what about 
the map? You "Look at Map," only to discover water all around. Well, that, at 
least, figures. Hmm, how far to Daventry? How soon will you return to the 
land of your birth? Time is wasting and you decide to chance a look at the 
upper deck, so it's up the ladder. As long as you're climbing, might as well 
go all the way, so up still higher. Nothing but the crow's nest, and it looks 
like a dangerous climb. Down you go, and back to the quarterdeck. Might as 
well see what's at the back of the ship. West and into the galley. DRAT! The 
cook has seen you! You find yourself thrown back into the hold with a loss of
, among other things, your dignity. You ponder a moment. What should you do? 
Since they seem not to have noticed how you left the hold before, why not try 
it again? Up the ladder, (carefully) and peek out slowly. No one around so...
Nah, they wouldn't put your things in the same place. Nothing better to do, 
so west you go and into the captain's quarter's once more. The chest is still 
open, so you look in the chest, and beat it fast! Sure enough! They DID put 
it all in the same chest! Not wanting to risk going up top side again, you 
decide to go east. A quick look around doesn't show much, but here's a shovel 
so "Get Shovel" and scoot back to the west. Kinda risky around here. What you 
really need is a place to hide out and just think. Of course, the hold is the 
safest place to be right now! So back down into that dark, dank hold. You 
spend some time just thinking about the problem, pacing back and forth like a 
caged animal. As a matter of fact you begin to feel just like those mice. Ex-
cept not quite so talkative.  What are they chattering about, anyway? A trea-
sure?  Five steps east of a lone palm tree? Yeah, well it won't do you any 
good here! Got to think of a way out. You look at the map again, noting that 
the ship is considerably closer to Daventry. You'll need a plan before long. 
What about the storm spell? No, that could sink the ship and you right along 
with it! Hmm. Suddenly it strikes you just as surely as a bolt from a thun-
dercloud! Of course, the sleep spell! "Land Ho!" A cry comes from high above. 
Soon, very soon, but the timing will be important. You are sure that you must 
wait until the anchor is dropped, but equally important is everyone must still 
be aboard. Another cry from above. "Drop Anchor!" You pour the sleep powder 
on the floor, and recite the verse. Quiet falls all around. even the mice are
stilled.  As if the slightest sound would break the spell, you slip back up
the ladder and out on the main deck. You "Look for land" and see mountains in 
the north and land to the east. Cautiously, you step off the deck and into 
the water. Not the best dive you ever made, but you're in the water. East is 
land so east you swim, only to find the horror of the sea bearing down on you
. You give your best impression ever of Johnny Weismuller! Whew! That was 
CLOSE! The trials you've seen! At last you are free from worry. The wizard 
will bother no one ever again, the pirates are caught in the sleep spell, and 
you have come at last to the land of your birth. It would be so nice to just
lie here in the sun for awhile. No, that won't do. You still have a sister in 
the gravest of danger; and from what the oracle said, the Kingdom itself is 
in deep trouble. It's on your feet, and off to the east. Huh? It's the cap-
tain! He escaped the sleep spell! You deftly dodge him by going north. Some-
thing about that beach bothers you though. Wasn't that a lone palm tree in 
the sand? You step back to the south and find that he is gone. Over to the 
tree and take a close look. Yes, it is a palm tree, but can mice be believed? 
Only one way to find out, so stepping slowly you count: One, two, three, four
, five, and "Dig." Eureka! Why there's a King's Ransom here! You wonder if 
you should rebury it, or try to drag it along. How much farther? What the 
heck, with whatyou are already packing, it hardly makes a difference. You 
grab the chest and move off to the north. Yes, the trail does look tough, and 
no way to get there from here. East, and the the trail begins. A step or two 
north, around that sharp corner, and back again to the west. You stop at the 
base of the Horse Head Rock, and scale the very face of it. No, this isn't 
nearly as bad as the trail from the wizard's. East, following the trail as it 
winds around to the north, then east to a lovely waterfall. Growing weary of 
the climb, you decide on a shortcut. You "Dip Fly Wings in Essence" and fly 
right up to the top of the waterfall. Following the trail east, you see a 
cave in the distance. No, you decide to press on. No more sidetrips, no more 
distractions. Further east and the trail seems to go in all directions, and a 
big footed foe comes up behind you! He seems to be a bit confused, and heads 
back to where he came from. The impulse to buzz around leaves you, and you 
land on the path to the south. Deciding it to be as good a direction as any, 
you take that path, only to find yourself scaling an almost vertical cliff!
Slowly, just as slowly as you can, you climb down. You feel carefully for 
handholds and any possible loose stone or ice. Straight down, until you feel 
a ledge and carefully let it take your weight. Whew, glad that's over with. 
Looking around, you realize that it hasn't even begun! Staying close to the 
cliff wall, you carefully move to the west. It looks spooky, but you enter 
the cave. DARK! You fear that you will become lost in the maze, but you come 
at last to the far side. This isn't an improvement at all. Moving out to the 
end of the ledge, you begin scaling down again. No point in trying for the
closer ledge, what you want is to get to the bottom. Slowly you move down,
til at about the midpoint you fail to find a foothold. You move to the west
a bit and then down even more. At last you feel the ledge below you, only to 
find that the dark caverns are to be risked again. Entering the cave again 
brings you out on the west side of the cliff base. It looks like you are 
trapped, but you dare to risk the long climb back up. Moving a few steps to 
the east, you begin the climb. You begin to tire, and more than a little 
fear arises within you. On you go until you gain the center ledge. This has 
got to be the way out! You enter the cave; and at last! Finally you are back 
on the path. You follow the path east, and east again. The mountain scenery 
is very beautiful, and you begin to feel relaxed, almost carefree. You are 
lulled into a state of recklessness! The path turns south, and you follow it 
blindly, right off the mountain! Actually, it's more like a large hill for 
you get more of a bruised ego than anything else. You pick yourself up and 
have a look. That looks more like a tunnel than a cave, and that looks as if 
it's a stairway! the hole you go, somewhat more aware now of where you place 
your feet. Up the old stairway you go. A sense of ancient times pervades this 
dark place. Up to a landing, and up again. Out into the daylight and warm 
mists surround you. Why is it so dreadfully warm? Perhaps dabbling with the 
mantic arts has given you a sixth sense, or maybe it comes naturally. You 
have a feeling that danger is near, and you "Rub Ointment on Self," before 
going further west. The Dragon! Your instincts have proved themselves. The 
dragon doesn't see you as you "Stir Storm Brew With Finger." With great care 
you utter the words that so long ago were memorized in haste. The storm 
appears and rages on! The dragon is struck, and down he falls! As the storm 
subsides, and the ointment wears off, the struggling girl captures your 
attention. You talk to her, trying to calm her, but she only screams, "Untie 
me!" You untie Rosella, explaining your relationship. The doubt shows plainly 
on her face, but she agrees to follow you. Rosella follows you east and down 
the stairs, and out into the daylight again. Go west, and you come to place 
that looks to be under siege! The well has been filled with stones, and that 
trench seems to run on forever. What purpose can that great stone wall serve?
Go north, and at least there appears to be some sort of civilization. There
is even a castle in the distance. The gnome greets you and calls you by name. 
Obviously, you are home at last! The gnome seems to know the way, so you fol-
low him toward the castle. What kind of kingdom has a plank in place of a 
drawbridge? That plank more than anything tells the dire circumstances of 
this land. Somehow, this is not the home you had expected to return to. A 
sadness comes over you as you cross that moat, and even the rich entry of the 
castle does little to dispel your gloom. You turn at the end of the hall and 
try to guess how the throne room and your parents might look, and sadly walk 
the last short leg of your long journey. A nervousness comes over you. Can 
this truly be home? Will they know me? Questions come quickly to the mind, 
but there is no time for answers. As one, you and Rosella enter the throne 
room of Daventry and no doubt can remain. This is HOME! It could not be 
otherwise. Hugs and kisses, and more of the same! A tear comes to your eye 
as the King tells of his pride in both of you. He explains of the once magic 
mirror, and before your eyes it clears! The moment could not be more perfect. 
You could not feel any greater joy, or so you thought. King Graham brings out 
his old adventurer's cap and flings it toward you. What an honor, to wear the 
cap of the King himself. You reach to catch it, but what's this? Rosella, too
, must think it an honor, for her hand goes up as well. In that moment, time 
seems to stop. Revelation strikes you. There are no endings, only beginnings. 
When life brings you to an apparent ending, it is just life and adventure be-
ginning anew. For whom does life begin this new adventure?

@endnode

@node k5 "King's Quest 5"
@next le
@prev k3


                              King's Quest V                            


Once upon a time the late King Graham was walking around in his forest Daven-
try, when he decided to head for home he could not see his castle, and all 
his family! gone........................ King Graham will know (from the owl 
Cedric), that a bad magician has shrunk the whole thing and dragged away with 
it. The bad magician is named Mordack ! Graham is now led to Cedrics master, 
the good magician Crispin. He will learn Graham the language of the animals, 
and give him a magic stick.

After the visit by Crispin, Graham and his friend and aid Cedric goes to the 
tailor in the town.Graham looks at the nice warming coat, but finds it expen-
sive. When leaving the store he finds a silver coin next to the door and 
picks it up. Now he goes to the barrel, on the opposite site of the street 
and gets the dead fish in the barrel,and then he leaves the town. At the ba-
kers shop just outside town he buys a cake. And then go on to the west,where 
he find a tree with a hole. The tree is at the moment occupied by some honey-
bees,and a bigbear,which has been attracted by the smell of honey. Graham 
throws the fish at the bear,and the bear takes the fish and leaves the scene. 
As a thank you, you recieve a honeycomp from the queen bee,you have to get 
the honeycomp from the tree by yourself. Near the tree you discover a wooden 
stick which you take,it might come in handy,sometime. Go north to where the 
termitary is.Throw the wooden stick at the dog and he will leave the scene. 
The termite king thanks you for rescueing him from the dog,and offers you his 
services. Now you have to enter the desert ! Look at the map ! And don't for-
get to visit the oasis to get some needed refreshment.

In the northwest you find the temple,here you have to hide outside and wait
for the two "desert bandit" to arrive on their horses. One of the bandits
knocks on the tempel door, with a diamond headed stick, and the door opens.

The bandits have a camp south of the temple,here you go to get the diamond
headed stick,it is in a small tent. Then you go back to the temple and knock
on the temple door, which then opens, and you enter the treasure palace.

All you have to get inside the treasure room is the oil lamp and the goldcoin
close to the door on the right. Then you have to exit before the doors closes
again,since the doors only opens from the outside.

Now before leaving the desert you have to go to THe sKeLEtOn and get the shoe
,now leave the desert and go to the gipsy.

Look at the card ! The man at the door lets you pass for the prize of a gold 
coin, which you give him,to get to see the fortune teller. The fortune teller 
now explains to you why Mordack has kidnapped your family.

Mordack is the brother of Mannanan (Look Kings quest III©To heiris human). 
Which Alexander, Sir Grahams son at that time turned into a cat ! And only 
Alexander can turn Mannanan back into human again. Now Mordack is threatening 
to kill Alexanders mother and sister, if he doesn't turn Mannanan back to hu-
man again. The only major problem is that Alexander has forgotten the magic
spell ! The fortune teller gives you a amulet,to protect you against evil 
spells.

Then you leave the fortune teller,and go to the east where you see a big wee-
ping willow (Tree).The tree tells you that it once was a princess,and that 
the witch has stolen her heart. Now you dont have to be afraid of the witch,
because of your amulet. So you give her the oil lamp,which she opens and im-
mediately she's been neutralized by the ghost from the lamp. Now you have to 
go to the witches house where you open the casket and get the spinning wheel.
In the drawer you find a bag containing 3 jewels,Then you have to get the key 
in the lamp. The key you have to use,to open the small door in the weeping 
willow,the easiest way to get to the tree is east. Behind the small door in 
the tree is the golden heart of the princess.

Now to get out of the spelled forest,you have to make some small tricks.

Go to the west side of the witches house and press the honey out of the 
honeycomb, the dripping honey will create a sticky substance. Now you have to
drop the 3 jewels so that the last one is directly in the sticky honey.Now a
little troll comes into the screen and he collects the jewels one by one, un-
til he get stuck in the honey. You have to free him,and as a gesture he 
guides you out of the spelled forest and gives you a pair of boots. Now go to 
the weeping willow and give it (the princess) the heart back. He then re-
cieves a harp,and at the place where the gypsies were at you find a tambou-
rine. The midget family is interested in the spinning wheel,so you trade it 
in for a wooden doll. At the backer,a mouse is in great danger,its almost be-
ing caught by the cat. So you have to throw the shoe at the cat, which then 
exits the scene. As a thank from the mouse you recieve the promise of help if 
ever needed.

Then you have to visit the town where you go to the toy maker,he will change
your wooden doll for a sledge. Then you go to the shoemaker,he will change
your boots for a little hammer. Then you visit the taverna,and soon you will
get mugged by two of the bad guys, they will tie you up and drag you into the
cellar. Here you call for the mouse which will arrive rapidly, and will bite 
the ropes. You get the rope, and break the lock on the door with the hammer 
and then you can enter the kitchen. Here you have to take the lambmeat from 
the supply room. Then you have to leave the house, by the backside, that is 
the left door.

Next to the taverna,is a barn with a big haystack in front of it.Now you have
to search the haystack to find the needle ! But remember the termites. The
will arrive and search the haystackin no time,and the termite king will pre-
sent you with the golden needle. You the go back to the tailor, which will
give you the nice warming coat you saw there before. Now Sir Graham has all
the things needed to cross the mountains !On the east your pass is blocked by
a snake, use the trambourin it will scare the snake away. When your in the
mountains you must be aware of the cold weather there and wear your warm coat,
and dont forget to eat when your hunger starts to appear. Feel free to eat
some lamb meat. The pass ends by a deep ravine, here you have to use the rope
as a lasso and throw it (a lot of throwing in this game !) at the rock NOT at
the branch it will collapse,and then good bye. Now climb up the rope and you 
will get to a plateau which is separated by a deep ravine, at the forward 
rocks there are some projecting steps, almost like a stair, use them to pass 
the ravine. Then all by the sudden, a wolf appears and it takes Cedric and 
runs away. You have to get on the sledge and persuit the wolf, then you will 
come to the castle of the ice princess. In front of the castle, there is a 
big eagle, who asks for something to eat, so you give him some lamb meat, and 
he will fly away. At the castle you will find out that you have been trespas-
sing and that you will be sentenced to be eaten by the wolves. So you better 
act fast and start playing your harp,then you will get a second chance.A wolf 
will take you to the crystal cavern where the terrible yeti has his residence
,your task is to get the yeti out. You just throw (you see, throwing again) 
the cake at the yeti and he will fall into the sure dead !

Now you have to take a piece of crystal, you loosen it with the hammer. The
ice princess is very moved from what she have seen and lets you and Cedric
leave. Shortly after a twin headed vulture arrives and grabs you, and takes
you to its nest. In the nest you discover a medallion. Soon the eagle will
come and take you to the sea, where Cedric is already waiting.

You pick up the wood chisel that somebody left on the beach, and head for the
north. Here you find a sailing boat, but before you proceed you have to tigh-
ten the hull of the boat with some wax (From the honeycomb). Now you go sai-
ling.Look map ! At the Harpyien island you play the harp to calm down the 
Harpyiens. At the lay by where you been taken you find a fish hook lying on
the ground,then go south where you find Cedric, hes been hurt by the Harpy-
iens. At the beach you get the big shell,enter the boat and head for the 
mainland. Look map. There you meet a hermit which helps Cedric and will help
you to get to Mordackscastle. But before that you have to give the old hermit
the shell,he needs it as a hearing aid, you see he cant HEAR you. You will be
guided to Mordacks castle by a mermaid, his castle is located on a island of
rocks. Just before you reach the island the boat is crashed against the riff,
so now there is no way back. You have to get the dead fish from the beach and
then you proceed up the stairs to Mardocks castle.

The entrance to the castle is guarded by two rock dragons,which will burn any
intruder to ashes if they come close. Here you have to use the crystal, it
reflects the energy back to the dragons, which then is permanently out of or-
der. Just let of the trenches which surrounds the castle you find a stair
which leads to a fence solid plantet in the ground. You use the wood chisel
to open it,and you enter a underground labyrinth, here you have to find a
monster.

I cant tell you where it is,since its changing its location all the time.
When you find the monster you give it the tambourine,and it will make a
somersault of joy and thereby loose its hairpin. You get the hairpin and use
it on the door to the supply room which leads you to the castle of Mordack.
You search the supply room and in one of the cabinets you find a bag af dried
peas, next to the supply room you find the kitchen where you meet one of Mor-
dacks prisoners, princess Cassima. Give her the medallion and she will trust 
you.

Now you have to walk around in the castle until you meet the servant of Mor-
dack which will put you in a prison cell. In the prison cell you search the 
mouse hole and discovers a piece of chease which you get with the help of the 
fish hook.Then princess Cassima will free you from the prison and take you 
back to the kitchen. Next time you meet the servant you just pour the peas on 
the floor and he will fall. It is also possible to meet a black cat, which is 
Mannanan, if you do, just give him the fish and put him in the bag with the 
peas. Now you have to go to Mordacks library. Look map !

In the library you have to read the magic book which lies on the table. After
a while you can see Mordack is going to bed in the room next to.He leaves his
magic stick on his night table, you get it and go to the laboratory, its op-
posite of the bedroom. There you see a big round shaped machine, two trays is 
connected to the machine, you put Mordacks magic stick on the one tray and
Crispins on the other.

Now you have to throw the cheese in the hole of the machine and it will run,
it will then transfer all the magic from Mordacks stick to Crispins stick.

Just when the machine is finished Mordack will arrive and grab for his useless
stick. However the mad Mordack is not yet beaten. First he will transform
himself in to different monsters,just to finish of Graham.The only chance you
have is to transfer Mordack into something else.So you use Crispins stick and
you can use four different spells. If you dont want to try them yourself, try

4
2
1
3

Mordack finally turns himself into a firewall which you quickly responds to
with a raincloud. That was the end for mr.Mordack.

Now the good magician Crispin will appear and cast a spell that will bring
your castle back to where its supposed to be. Then princess Cassima and the
rest of the royal family can return to the castle.

@endnode

@node le "Leather Goddesses of Phobos"
@next leg
@prev k5


                        Leather Goddesses of Phobos
      

Hey! Them fellers at Infocom ain't dummies, ya know. No, siree, Bob! They
were right up there at the head of the line when the "smahts" got doled out.
(That, I'm told, is how it's properly pronounced in New England where, for
totally obscure reasons, Infocom fellers are said to live.) Heck, they know
all sorts of important stuff, like, well, girls use the ladies' loo and boys
use the gents'. They also know that both boys and girls play their games,
and in this one (hereafter to be referred to as LGOP) it's important to get
the sexes straightened out right quick.

That's because LGOP is a sci-fi sex comedy adventure. This means there's a
fair amount of ravishing going on, at least there is if you play it in
either the "Lewd" or the "Suggestive" mode. (Not sure about "Tame" mode;
never tried it.) Anyway, if you want the full impact as you play, it's
important to determine which you are: ravisher or ravishee. ('Course, if
you're kinky, you can be both. But you'll have to play the game twice, once
as a man, once as a woman, to do that.)

All of which gets us to the start of the game. You find yourself in Upper
Sandusky, Ohio, in Joe's Bar, to be precise. You've quaffed a fair amount
of no-name beer (at five cents a glass, who cares about names?), and you
feel an urge. You trace the urge to the region of your bladder.

You are told that the ladies' facility is northeast and the gents' is
northwest. Okay, go in the direction of whichever one you normally use.
Yes, I said NORMALLY!

Clever, huh? This is how those subtle smahties at Infocom get you to
determine what sex you will be in LGOP. In any case, you will find either
bathroom to be filthy and fly-specked. Moreover, each contains a stool.
Get the stool if you think it will come in handy (and no cracks about which
stool, either! It's the three-legged one). Under certain circumstances,
the stool may prove useful, but it isn't vital.

Also, while you're in there, you might want to follow instructions and use
the Scratch 'n' Sniff card which comes with the game. (Honest, the scents
on the card really do smell pretty close to what they're supposed to. Well,
some of them do, anyway.) On the other hand, if card-sniffing isn't your
bag, simply type, "Smell the odor," hit RETURN and each time you'll be told
what you're supposed to be smelling. In the case of the bathroom, it's an
old pizza slice, dubiously discarded in the corner. Finally, before leaving
the bathroom, use it. I mean the bathroom, silly, not the pizza slice! And
no prurient entries, please. Just type, "Use the bathroom." After you have
done so, exit back into the bar and order a drink.

Usually, the bartender will tell you you've had enough. If he does,try
ordering again. You won't get another one, of course, but Infocom has to
have a little delay in the game before you get zapped by tentacled aliens
(?) from your cozy bar into a cell. That's right, a cell. You are
suddenly, and with no logic whatsoever, a prisoner of the dreaded LEATHER
GODDESSES OF PHOBOS, whose dastardly plan it is to invade and take over
Earth for their own sinister purposes. This bodes ill, I fear for God,
country, the old ball game, mom's apple pie, and all those other values we
hold so dear.

Oh, at this point I should interject that you start LGOP in what is called
"Suggestive Mode." In movie lingo, this roughly corresponds to "PG." At any
point in the game, including the beginning, you can change modes by typing
in either "Tame" (ho hum), which gets a "G," or "Lewd," which is "R." This,
of course, permits you to play the game all the way through in any of three
modes, not to mention as a male and/or a female. If this is confusing,
well, don't fret on it. One other thing, you have to be eighteen or over to
play in "Lewd" mode. No cheating! (Remember those tentacled aliens?)

Okay, you're in your cell and you find some things to take: a flashlight, a
painting of a pussy cat and a blanket. Take all. Also, someone thrusts a
tray containing a hunk of brown food into your cell. Get the food (it's
chocolate candy) but forget the tray.

Evidently, one of those aliens was asleep at the tentacle because he/she/it
forgot to lock your cell door. Open the door and go south.

Across the hallway, you find another cell door. You also see a sign at the
head of some stairs which go up and down. The sign says, "Observation
Room." Don't go up yet. Instead, open the other cell door. (Some jail!)
Inside the other cell you find (a) a man named Trent, if you're playing the
game as a male; (b) a girl named Tiffany, if you're playing as a female.
Trent or Tiffany will be your faithful, albeit not too bright, companion
from now on.

On the floor of this cell you spy a crumpled piece of paper. Get it and
read it. It turns out there's a seemingly meaningless matrix of letters on
the paper. The operative word here, folks, is MATRIX. If you scan the
letters very carefully you will make out words, for the matrix is one of
those "scramble-grams." Some of the words run backward from left-to-right,
others are forward, right-to-left. Some run vertically, others diagonally
and several intersect. In any case, encircle the words as you find them.
You should wind up with eight circled items: blender, rubber hose,
phonebook, angle, cotton balls, photo, mouse and headlight.

For the present, you are not told the significance of these objects.
Eventually (rather soon, as a matter of fact), you will learn what they're
for. However, as with many Infocom puzzles, all is not as obvious as it
seems with this matrix. If you are paying very, very close attention, you
will discover that its real significance is with the letters you DON'T
circle. If you put these together, you will read the phrase, "Hissing
frightens flytraps." You are encouraged to stash this information in your
memory banks. It comes in handy later on.

Okay, leave the cell and go upstairs to the Observatory Room. (Note:
there's a basement downstairs, and one flight up from the Observatory is the
Roof of the Observatory. The basement isn't important; the roof is.) Once
you're upstairs, go north into the tiny closet where it's too dark to see
anything. Turn on your flashlight. Now you can see, and you notice a black
circle on the floor and a wicker basket up on a shelf; but the basket is too
high to reach.

Here, you can either drop your stool (if you took it) and stand on it, or
you can stand on the shoulders of your newly acquired companion. Either
way, take the basket. It's a good idea to put your possessions into the
basket, too, since this will permit you to carry more stuff, at least until
you find a roomier receptacle. No? You don't want to do that? Well, at
least put the blanket in the basket. You'll be sorry if you don't put your
other stuff in, too. When you get the dropsies, don't come crawling to me
for sympathy. Finally, stand on the circle.

Whoosh! You're zapped away to the Jungle. Slithering up to you through the
excessive heat and humidity is a gigantic Venus Flytrap. It looks (and is)
hungry!

I've got some explaining to do so I'll pause here. First, I should tell you
that the sequence of events in LGOP does not necessarily have to follow my
walkthru scenario. For instance, if you had gone upstairs one more flight
to the Roof of the Observatory, you would have seen another black circle.
If you had stood on this one instead of the circle in the closet, you would
have been teleported to the Martian Desert instead of the Jungle.

The sequence isn't especially important. What matters is that there are
black circles (teleporters) located at key locations throughout the game.
You should make a note of where each circle is situated and where each one
takes you. Otherwise, you will quickly get lost and doubtless die and be
forgotten, never to taste mom's apple pie again. One other thing: whenever
you stand on a black circle, your faithful companion will emerge right
behind you when you reach your destination. Well, most of the time he/she
will.

Back to the action. There's this flytrap, see? Well, we know what to do,
don't we? Hiss at the flytrap. (Oh, and it might be a good idea to turn
off your flashlight, too!)

Your hissing promptly causes the flytrap to cooperatively expire. (He
mistakes the hiss for a spray can of weed killer.) With the flytrap out of
the way, you can now proceed west to the Spawning Ground for Venusian slime
beasts. Only one spot is free of slime and it contains a black circle.
Next to the circle is a jar of ointment. Get the jar, but do not stand on
the circle. Examine the jar. It turns out to contain untangling cream,
whatever that is.

At this point, Trent/Tiffany will toss you a matchbook. You notice it is
empty, but there are notations scrawled all over the cover. Your companion
tells you this is a list of things he needs to whip up a Super-Duper
Anti-LEATHER GODDESSES OF PHOBOS Attack Machine! As it turns out, the list
is a duplication of the objects you so laboriously decoded from that
meaningless matrix you found back in your cell. Anyway, now you know what
you must obtain in order to win the game. You also note that, so far,
you're batting zero. On with the quest!

Having read the matchbook cover, go east from the Spawning Ground back into
the Jungle. Go east again. At this point, a mighty tree rises before you!
Suddenly, the tree dies and is consumed by Venusian hypertermites, leaving a
gigantic hole in the ground.

What to do about the hole? Well, you can go down into it if you wish. But
that's pretty boring. Besides, you won't be able to get out again unless
you have your stool. (That's really the only use I found for the thing, by
the way.) On the other hand, Infocom doesn't just allow things like
unexplained tree-dyings to occur, do they? I never tried this, but I gather
the purpose of the hole is to permit another solution to the flytrap puzzle.
I suspect this is included in case you didn't/couldn't decipher the
meaningless matrix of letters. (Those Infocom guys know that not everyone
is as smaht as they are!)

Anyway, one of the places you will teleport to at some point in the game is
Cleveland. There, you will find a trellis and a sack. If you are following
a sequence of events which gets you to Cleveland before you get to the
Jungle and the Venus Flytrap, here's what you can do. Presumably, you will
be astute enough to take the sack and the trellis when you find them. The
sack is full of leaves (69,105 to be exact). Now, when you get to the
Jungle put the trellis over the hole left by the tree, and dump the leaves
on the trellis. The flytrap will sidle up to you across the trellis and
fall into the hole. End of problem.

Since you have just hissed the flytrap into oblivion, you may completely
disregard the foregoing, ignore the hole and proceed east yet again. This
takes you to a Clearing. In the Clearing is a can of black stain. Get the
can and go northeast.

You come to the front door of a plasticoid house. It is closed and locked.
What's more, you don't have a key. Go east to the Rocky Clifftop. There
isn't much here except, oh, a black circle and a neat view. Off to the
northwest you can see a Vizicomm Booth. Go northwest. (The black circle
can keep.)

Enter the Vizicomm Booth, which is out of order. Turn or pull the coin
return knob and you'll here a clank. Open the return box, and a coin drops
to the ground. Get the coin and examine it. The coin reads "Ten Marsmids."
Fine. Now go back to the Rocky Clifftop (just type "Exit"). From the
clifftop, go north. You find yourself at the back door of the plasticoid
house. And you are NOT alone!

An extraordinary number of door-to-door salesmen are camped out here. One
of them approaches you and offers to barter one of his machines for
something of equal value you might be carrying. Offer the flashlight to the
salesman. In exchange, you receive what is described as a TEE-Remover
Machine.

Before the salesman can explain, he turns on your flashlight and a giant
Venusian Megamoth swoops down and carries him off. The other salesmen
scatter to the four winds. Hm -- a Tee-Remover?

Open the machine. Put the jar (of untangling cream) into the machine.
Close the door and turn on the machine. The machine whirs and grinds. When
it stops, open the door and get the jar. It now contains unAngling cream.
(Oh, brother!) Now knock on the back door.

You are welcomed by a Mad Scientist (mit a Cherman accent, uff courze). He
welcomes you because you look like a grand candidate for his next mad
experiment! Go downstairs.

Oops! You're in the Mad Scientist's laboratory. It contains a cage. The
cage contains two gorillas. The cage also contains a rubber hose. Quick!
Throw the candy (the hunk of brown food, remember?) into the cage. Just in
time! The mad scientist straps you and Trent/Tiffany down to a couple of
slabs. Then he throws an ominous looking switch.

Suddenly, you find yourself inside the cage. You also find yourself inside
a gorilla skin! Odd, you can also see your own body still strapped to the
first slab. Gee! The female/male gorilla in here with you looks better and
better all the time. Kiss the gorilla.

This seems to satisfy the Mad Scientist that his experiment is working chust
fein, zo he bounds up the stairs, leaving you locked in the cage with the
gorilla. Your companion, who has been transported to the "body" of a Venus
Flytrap, is of no help. He remains strapped to the second slab.

Let's see, wasn't there a rubber hose on that list? Yep. Get the hose.
Now eat the candy. You feel a sugar rush. (For those of you not quite so
smaht as those Infocom fellers, a sugar rush means you feel super strong.)
Good. Open the cage. Wow! You really are super strong! You part the bars
easily and can exit the cage. Do so.

Drop the hose outside the cage. Then, go to the second slab and unstrap
Trent/Tiffany (watch out for those "tentacles!"). Next, unstrap your body.
While your sugar rush is ebbing, pull the switch. Good! You're back in
your own body again. Get off the slab and retrieve the rubber hose and put
it in your basket.

If you were paying attention when you entered the laboratory (it's always a
good idea to read the descriptions, no?), you noticed there was a black
circle at the foot of the stairs. This might be a good time to stand on it.

Zap! You're back inside the Vizicomm Booth. Exit the booth and you're back
on the clifftop. Now you can stand on the black circle you saw the first
time you came here. Doing so takes you to the Royal Docks. Moored to the
end of this dock is a royal barge. To the south is a ruined castle. Go
south.

You are in the throne room of King Mitre. It seems that we've been wrong
all along about the legend of King Midas; he, who we always thought could
turn things into gold by his mere touch. It seems his real name was King
Mitre, and, in fact, everything he touched turned into forty-five degree
angles. Everything, including his own daughter. You notice one angle in
particular -- prominent because of its long golden tresses and flowing white
gown. Unlimber your handy-dandy jar of unAngling cream.

Rub the unAngling cream on the daughter. Slowly, the angle turns into King
Mitre's beautiful daughter, Princess Theta. Mitre is so happy to see her
again that he rewards you with a truly useful gift, a perfect eighty-two
degree angle. (He explains he only brushed against it.) Take the angle.
Hey! Your batting average is going up! You now have two objects out of
eight. Put the angle in the basket with the hose.

By the way, at this point your inventory may be a bit top-heavy. I mean,
what good is a jar of unAngling cream, now that it's empty? And who needs a
TEE-Remover Machine after it's done its work? That stool isn't much good,
either. Unless you're terribly possessive about such things, go ahead, drop
them, along with the matchbook, the scrap of paper and any other flotsam you
still have. On the other hand, no sense being a litterbug. Why not pick a
central spot where you can drop them unobtrusively? (I chose the basement
below my cell.) Nothing like being tidy, eh? And you never know when
something might come in handy. On the other hand, if you're a slob, there's
no penalty in the game for dropping things wherever you please, once you've
used them. Just make sure not to drop anything prematurely.

After you've got your angle tucked away, leave good King Mitre. As you
depart, you realize the dummy has inadvertently touched the princess again,
but you can't do anything about that. It's time to visit the Martian
desert. Go south.

You've come to a Ruin, one of many you'll encounter. Go south again.
You're still in the desert. Go east to Another Ruin. Sitting on a rock is
a truly repulsive frog. I mean, this one is the repulsive frog of all
repulsives in the frog kingdom. It is also wearing a little gold crown. Go
ahead, kiss the frog.

Yuck! The frog is so ugly you just cannot bring yourself to kiss it. Yet,
instinctively you realize that somehow, some way you've just got to screw up
your courage, pucker up and plant one on its repulsive kisser. For now,
though, go west, then, north to Yet Another Ruin. This one is unimpressive
except for the fact that it does seem to contain a black circle. No, don't
stand on it (unless you have a hankering to visit the basement below your
cell). Retrace your steps by going south to the frog, then, east to the
Dessert.

Very sharp-eyed gamesters will have noted the word "dessert" above. "Ha!"
they will proclaim, "I knew the Sysop editors around here didn't know how to
spell!" Wrongo, smahties. The word IS Dessert. In fact, you're looking at
a fifty foot Martian Cream Pie. It is a mirage, of course. So are the
trails which appear to lead to the northwest and southwest from here.

You were advised that all is not always as it seems in an Infocom
production. Those trails are not mirages after all.) Go southeast.

You've come to an Oasis. There is a little bunny rabbit hippity-hopping
around the premises. Get him. (What you do with him, I confess, I haven't
the foggiest. But I got him anyway, so you might as well, too. Maybe he
makes good rabbit stew.) On the other hand, you also see a black circle
here, and I DO know what to do about that. That's odd. The black circle
mysteriously turns white! Get out your can and pour the black stain on the
circle. That's better. Now it's black again. Stand on the circle.

Whoosh! You're in Cleveland. (Remember, Cleveland?) Go south. Well, now,
here's a lawn that somebody cares about. Actually, it's a muddy patch of
crabgrass, but there's a rake and a sack full of leaves. Forget everything
except the sack. Take it and dump out the leaves. Now that the sack is
empty, you've got a much better receptacle than your wicker basket. Put all
your goodies except the blanket in the sack. Leave the blanket in the
basket. It looks cute in there. Now go north, then, northeast.

You're standing inside a Teensy-Weensy House. Go upstairs and You find
yourself in a Bedroom containing an open window, an unmade bed and a sheet
lying half on the floor. Get the sheet.

Tear the sheet into strips and tie the strips together (which forms a rope),
then tie the rope to the bed. Throw the loose end of the rope out the
window. Your faithful friend, Trent/Tiffany, will now shinny down the
sheet. (If you try, you soon learn you're too heavy and fall to your
untimely demise. This is not terribly important except that it ends the
game.) Once on the street, your pal will just have time to unscrew a handy
headlight before being unceremoniously struck by a truck and, evidently,
killed.

Before you can burst into tears over your loss, your companion reappears in
a cloud of falling plaster as the ceiling above you collapses! He offers an
explanation of his startling reincarnation, but I won't bore you with it
here. After all, I presume you can read it for yourself if you're playing
the game. Anyway, take the headlight he/she is carrying and put it in the
sack. That's three out of eight!

Time to leave picturesque Cleveland, so go downstairs and go east into the
garden behind the Wee House. There's a trellis against the house and a
fresh piece of sod. Lifting the sod reveals another black circle! (If you
need to be told about the trellis, you're not paying attention.) Stand on
the circle. You're teleported to the basement below your cell. You see,
you could have come here from the black circle in that ruin I told you
about. But if you did that you might have missed Cleveland, and...oh,
forget it.

Right about here is where I dropped all my superfluous, used-up junk. You
see, I didn't have a walkthru like you've got, and I didn't know whether I
might not need my superfluous, used-up junk again. For some reason which
only a tentacled alien could divine, the basement seemed like a logical
spot. Of course, being tidy never hurt anyone, but I think I've covered
this ground already.

Go upstairs. Go 'way upstairs, all the way to the Roof of the Observatory,
upstairs! This time, stand on the black circle there. You will be back in
the ruin just south of King Mitre's castle. Go north. Mitre will still be
sitting on his throne, surrounded by forty-five degree angles, looking
dejected. One of them has long golden hair and a flowing white gown (sigh).
If only old Mitre could keep his paws to himself! Well, leave him to his
ruminations and go north to the Royal Docks and board the barge.

You see some simple controls. Examine the controls. One is a huge orange
button, which reads "Magnetomoor On." The other is a huge purple button. It
reads, "Go With the Flow." Pushing the orange button causes the words to
read "Magnetomoor Off." It also causes the barge to drift away from the dock
into the channel. Pushing the purple button causes the words to read "Full
Speed Ahead."

As soon as you have pushed orange, push purple, wait one turn, and push
orange again. (You can pretty much forget about purple from now on.)
Anyway, by pushing orange you have reactivated the Magnetomoor.
(Magnet-O-Moor, get it?) This is your dock/undock device. Since all the
docks in the canal contain barge magnets, all you need do to moor at one is
push the orange button in a timely fashion. To unmoor, push it again.

All right, the first dock you'll clank against is Baby Dock. Disembarge and
go north. You find yourself among the Dunes, and there is a strange alien
warrior lying dead here. Next to the alien is a chapstick. Get it.
Partially buried in the sand nearby is a strangely coded message. Get that,
too.

If you carefully read your 3-D comic book which comes with LGOP, you will
recall a bit in there about a transposition code. You say you forgot the
code? Well, go back and reread it. In the meantime, I'll translate the
strangely coded message. It says, "Your mission is to contact wife number
nnn (the number is inserted randomly) of the sultan/sultaness and get the
secret map. Identify yourself to her by asking her to kiss your kneecaps."

Now, wasn't that easy? Leave the alien in the dunes and go back to your
barge. Board the barge and go through the orange button ritual.

The second and extremely opulent dock you come to is THIS is My Kind of
Dock! When you reach it, exit the barge and go east. You will be in the
Main Hall of the Palace. Go south to the Laundry Room and get the
clothespin. Now go back north into the Main Hall and east into the Oriental
Garden. Here, you see a well containing handholds downward. Climb down.

At the bottom of the well is a black circle. You land upon it and are
immediately transported back to the barge. This is a good circle to know
about. It teleports you to wherever you've parked your barge, and this
knowledge will come in mighty handy later in the game. For now, though,
re-exit the barge and go back into the palace. From the main hall, go
northeast.

Now, if you're playing this game as a male you will be in the sultan's
palace. If you're a lady-person, your host-person will be a sultaness. In
either case, you find yourself in the Audience Chamber confronting one or
the other, as the case may be. Whomever it is, sultan or sultaness, will
confront you with a riddle. Your faithful companion will burst out with a
dumb answer and wind up being tossed to the tigers by the palace eunuchs.
Alas! You were beginning to be fond of him/her, but on with the game.
Alas, again! You're next if you don't get it right.

The answer to the riddle is, "Riddle." So type SAY "RIDDLE." Oh, goody! The
sultan/ess begrudgingly rewards you with an hour of rapturous bliss with one
of his/her 8,379 wives/husbands. Hie thee west into the harem. Here you
are confronted by a harem guard who asks you to make a selection, any number
from 1 to 8,379. Naturally, you pick the number you gleaned from the coded
message. (Remember, the message was written backward, which means the
number was backward, too.)

Wait a bit and soon your choice will beckon you to her/his obscenely
luxurious bed chamber. Ahem <er> afterward, type TELL WIFE/HUSBAND, "KISS
MY KNEECAPS." Your partner will present you with a secret map of the
catacombs. (It comes in your game package, by the way, but you'll probably
still need my directions to get through the maze. Try it without them,
you'll see.) She/he also pulls aside the covers and indicates a secret
passage down. You are told it's the only way out of the harem. Take the
torch he/she gives you and go down.

You are now in the catacombs. Well, what do you know. Here's your faithful
companion Trent/Tiffany with another outlandish explanation of his/her
reappearance. You listen and then decide to push on.

For my money, your visit to the catacombs is the toughest part of the game.
I have to admit I had help here. (Oh, all right, I had help in a couple of
other places, too. Golly! I never can get through these dumb games without
help! Besides, I HATE games!) Anyway, you need to follow these directions
carefully, including those about "Hop, Clap and Kweepa." (I TOLD you to read
the comic book.) Okay, here we go:

NW, N, NE, E, CLAP, NE, NE, SE, HOP, CLAP, KWEEPA, D, NW, NE, CLAP, N, S,
HOP, NE, CLAP, U, KWEEPA, NW.
Get the phone book. (Four out of eight!)
CLAP, NW, HOP, S, SE, CLAP, SE, D, KWEEPA, NE, CLAP, HOP, W, N, NW, CLAP, E,
W, KWEEPA, HOP, CLAP, SW, SW.
Get the raft.
N, CLAP, NE, E, HOP, KWEEPA, CLAP, NW, NE, SE, U, CLAP, NW, HOP.
Stand on the black circle.
That's it. But be sure to follow the directions precisely. Of course, if
you prefer being devoured by a Martian crocodile or some such, you can
always find your own way.

Presuming you wind up at the black circle and stand on it, you will be
teleported directly to the Well Bottom. You've been there before so you
know the black circle at the bottom will take you right back to your barge.
After the catacombs, the royal barge is kind of cozy. But there's no time
to dally. Exit the barge and go east into the palace again. This time, go
east into the Oriental Garden and from there, southeast to the base of a
Tower. Actually, it's a Minaret with stairs leading upward so go up.

The view here is breathtaking, almost as nice as the clifftop back in the
jungle. But there's also a black circle here. Stand on it.

Zowie! You find yourself in a cramped space which, as it turns out, is
right over your cell! You don't know that, of course, until the floor
collapses and you find yourself tumbling through the resultant orifice into
your cell. Hm, that's odd. There's a black circle here. Never noticed
that before. (That's because it wasn't there before, Venusian Bird Brain!)
As it turns out, this circle takes you to the main hall of the palace, but
we don't want to go there this time. Exit the cell (south) and go up to the
Observatory Roof. Stand on the circle and you're back in the Martian Desert
(with one "s" this time). Go east to the frog.

Ah, yes, you remember that ugliest of ugly frogs? Now you have both the
will and the means to kiss this total grossness. Put the clothespin on your
nose. Rub the lip balm on your lips. Then, drop everything you're carrying
and cover your ears with your hands. Close your eyes. At last! Kiss the
frog!

Ooooh, another rapturous interlude with one of the opposite sex. It turns
out you're not quite (humph!) satisfied, but at least "the one" leaves you
with a small token of affection. It's a household blender. Take it. Put
it in the sack. (You have been using the sack, haven't you?) If I reckon
right, that's five out of eight. We're getting there!

Leave the ruin and go east into the Dessert once more. Yes, the one with
two "s's." Then meander southeast to the Oasis. Stand on the circle and
return to Cleveland. No particular reason for another trip to Cleveland,
really. You could have gone to the other ruin which has a black circle and
gone directly to your cell. It's just that I sorta feel sorry for
Cleveland. Nobody in his/her right mind would EVER go there twice, would
they? On the other hand, nobody in his/her right mind would play computer
games, either. Would they?

Anyway, you're back in Cleveland. Go northeast, then east (into the garden)
and get yourself zapped back to the hallway near your cell. Go down into
the basement and dump your extraneous jetsam, especially the clothespin.
You'd look pretty silly going up against the Leather Goddesses wearing a
clothespin on your nose, right?

After you've lightened your load, go up into your cell and stand on the
black circle. You find yourself back in the Main Hall of the Palace. You
might want to wipe off that gooey lip balm here. Exit the palace to the
west and enter your barge. Push orange. Wait. Push it again. (You know
the drill.)

Wait until your barge clangs up against Wattz-Upp Dock. You hear a gurgling
noise to the west (it's the Oasis). Exit the barge. When you're standing
on the dock, reach over and push orange. That's right, push it! So what if
your barge goes shooting out into the canal without you. Trust me.

Go west to the Oasis, stand on the circle and, voila: Beautiful, downtown
CLEVELAND! (I told you I felt sorry! Now I'm sorry I did this one more
time. I mean, who needs Cleveland tha-ree times?) Oh, well, you're not here
for long. Go back to the garden, the black circle and...the hallway near
your cell. Go up to the Observatory Roof and stand on the circle.

A pause here for a comment or two. Make that a rebuttal. Yeah, I can hear
all you wisenheimers out there knocking my route. And I freely admit there
might be better ways to go, bypassing my revisits to dear, picturesque
downtown Cleveland. Didn't I tell you there was no particular sequence you
had to follow? C'mon, didn't I? You know it, fella. Hey, if you've got
something against Cleveland, go ahead, write your own walkthru.

I digress. You're back in the desert. You've sent your barge down the
canal, pilotless. What to do? Go west to Yet Another Ruin. Now go
northwest. You've reached Hickory & Dickory Dock. What's this? A mouse!
Show the picture (of the pussy cat) to the mouse. The poor thing is frozen
with fear. Get the mouse. (Only two more goodies to go!) Now go south,
back to Yet Another Ruin. Stand on the black circle.

Once more, you are in the basement below your cell. Got anything to drop?
How about that torch? It went "phhttttt" long ago. Okay, let it go. Next
stop, upstairs to your cell. Stand on the black circle. You arrive at the
palace. Go east into the Oriental Garden and enter the well.

Well, well (a little humor there, folks) you're zapped from the Well Bottom
right slap dab onto your barge. Where is it? Why, it's right here at the
Icy Dock, 'way, 'way down at the southern terminus of the canal.

Okay, I'll bite. Why didn't you just take the scenic route aboard the barge
all the way down the canal to here? It would have been restful and, well,
scenic; not to mention saving a lot of aggravation, wouldn't it, boobie?
Well, for one thing, you would have missed those neato trips to Cleveland.
For another, you probably would have missed the mouse, too. Oh, and one
other point: If you'd taken the barge route you would have died.

It seems there is this gigantic machine just before you get to the Icy Dock.
It's some sort of Martian (Phobotian?) energy machine, and it used to supply
power to the whole planet. It doesn't work quite like it used to, but it
works just well enough to send a lethal ion beam out over the canal. If you
try to pass through it, say, on a barge, well, first you get a little
headache. Then you get a truly humungous headache. Finally, after the
humungous headache assumes gigantically unbearable proportions you, er,
explode. And that's a fact.

Aren't you glad we went to Cleveland?
Okay, from the Icy Dock, exit the barge and go south. Oh, no, your faithful
pal Trent/Tiffany slips on the ice and disappears into the frigid waters of
the canal. No matter, go south, like I said. You are at the edge of the
polar ice cap. Needless to say, it's cold. Go southeast.

Oh, good grief! Your passage forward is blocked by a whole waddling phalanx
of penguins! One of them is carrying a sign. Read the sign. It suggests
that you donate to the Penguin Relief Fund. Well, there's nothing for it
but to give your coin (the Marsmid tenner) to the penguin.

The penguin thanks you graciously, and gives you your change, a one Marsmid
coin. (You don't know it yet, but the little guy just did you a favor.) The
penguins part to let you pass, so go southeast.

You arrive at a gypsy camp. About the only thing here is a single forlorn
tent, pitched on the north side of the camp. You are greeted by two robots,
a male and a female (they're gypsies, see). No sooner do they invite you in
for tiffin than a meteorite swoops down and kills both robots dead. Oh,
dear, from inside the tent you hear the wail of a baby crying, "Mommy."

Enter the tent. Sure enough, it's a gypsy robot baby. Get the baby and put
it in your wicker basket. Oh, that's nice. The baby appreciates the warmth
of the blanket and instantly goes to sleep. As for you, exit the tent and
go south - to the South Pole, as a matter of fact.

What else would you expect to find at the South Pole? Righto! It's an
Igloo! But the front door is locked. Gazing through the igloo window you
are tantalized by the sight of a pair of cotton balls. Instantly, your
brain cells focus, cutting through the fog of forgetfulness like lasers.
You suddenly recall that cotton balls were on the list. How to get them?

Let's re-read that description of the igloo one more time. Yessir, I
thought so. There's a sign over the door. It reads, "Martian Orphanages,
Inc., South Polar Branch." Well, what do you suppose might be an appropriate
action for someone carrying an orphan in a basket to take, standing like you
are on the doorstep of an orphanage? Listen, if you can't figure this one
out for yourself, you never, ever should try another text adventure game
again. After all, you might have to get through the next one without a
walkthru.

Hey, you're smahtah than I thought you were! You put the wicker basket on
the doorstep. Then, you hide behind a snowdrift and wait. Sure enough,
from inside the igloo emerges a matronly woman of immense proportions. She
takes the basket and its contents into the igloo and closes the door. But
she doesn't lock it.

Open the door, enter the igloo, get the cotton balls and scram. Retrace
your steps north to the gypsy camp, northwest to the penguin park, then go
west to the Allusion Room. As it turns out, the Allusion Room is nothing
more or less than a black circle. Stand on it. You are whisked back to the
Oasis. Well, I'll be a petrified penguin! Here's Trent/Tiffany, emerging
alive and well. The saga of how he/she survived the fall into the icy
waters is too bizzarre to bear repeating, so we'll move right along. Stand
on the circle at the Oasis. Guess where we are now?

Cleveland!!! This is really ridiculous, so let's beat feet. Get into that
garden and onto the circle. You're back in the hallway so go on up one more
time to the Observation Room (the one with the closet to the north). Go
into the closet. It's too dark to see, but you can still stand on the
circle. I'm sure you remember it takes you to the jungle. Leave the jungle
by way of the circle on the clifftop. Go ahead, there won't be any
flytraps, salesmen or mad scientists to stop you.

You are teleported for the last time to the Royal Docks. (Just a tad away
is Mitre's castle, but you're not going there this time.) Instead, put your
raft (the one you've been lugging along since you found it in the catacombs)
into the water. Board the raft.

Here, you have to be alert. As you drift down the canal in your raft, you
might be lulled into your customary state of not carefully reading the
descriptions in the game. Do not permit this to occur. What you're looking
for is a passage indicating that a dock is close enough for you to grab.
Actually, you will pass several docks which are eminently grabbable. Grab
them all just to be on the safe side. The one you want is Donald Dock.

When you've grabbed Donald Dock, exit the raft (you pull it onto the dock
for safe-keeping). Go south to the Dunetop. From here, go east to the
Canalview Mall. There appears to be just one shop in the mall worth
visiting and it lies to the south. Go south. You are in the Exit Shop.
The sign says, "Exits bought and sold." Buy an Exit.

Now, I told you the penguins did you a favor. If you had tried to buy the
Exit with your ten Marsmid coin, the shopkeeper (one of the more lively
gents in the story, by the way) would have refused you. It seems Exits cost
just one Marsmid and he wouldn't dream of overcharging you nor can he make
change. As things stand, he takes your one Marsmid coin and, sleepily,
hands you a cardboard tube. It falls into the dust. Retrieve the tube,
open it and you find your Exit. What's an Exit, for goodness sakes? It's a
sort of collapsible black circle, that's what. Tuck it away and go north,
then west, then north, back to Donald Dock.

Re-launch your raft, board it and drift. Once again, grab any dock you see.
Eventually, you will come to Wattz-Upp Dock. Exit your raft, leave it and
head to the Oasis. Stand on the circle.

Now really, gang! I'm sorry. But there was no other way. Just forget it's
Cleveland, go to the garden and stand on the circle. I promise. We won't
be coming back. Hey, you've got seven items out of eight. That ain't all
bad. Isn't it worth just one more trip to Cleveland? Oh. Listen, you
don't have to get nasty about this.

Once back in the hallway, go up to the closet in the Observation Room and
stand on the circle. When you get to the jungle, go west. You're in the
Spawning Ground. And there's just one circle left you've never used before.
Stand on the circle.

You find yourself in the hold of a giant spaceship. There's a sword here.
Oh, Lord! A dark figure appears from the shadows of the hold and hurls a
radium-powered grenade onto the floor! Your faithful friend Trent/Tiffany
hurls him/her self on the thing, saving you and giving up his life...quite
messily if I may say, in the process. No time to lose! Get the sword.
Don't dally either. Go south.

You are in a stable where you find a magnificent white stallion. Actually,
you are aboard the flagship of the LEATHER GODDESSES OF PHOBOS Main Attack
Fleet. The stable you're in contains the Leather Goddesses' Main Attack
Fleet Cavalry Mounts, of which the stallion is one. Mount the stallion and
kick it in the flank. Go west.

The stallion dashes down a long east-west corridor in the ship, reaching
with stallion-like speed the main hatch of the ship. Here you spy a white
therma suit. Dismount, put on the suit and open the hatch. Go north.

You are in space. Floating near the battle cruiser you have just left is a
small passenger spaceship. Near the small passenger spaceship is a sinister
figure. He/she turns out to be Thorbast/Thorbala, who is further identified
as the Chief Assassin of the LEATHER GODDESSES OF PHOBOS. 'Twas he, it
appears, who hurled that grenade. Thorbast is busily engaged, strapping a
beautiful, helpless young lady/man to the hull of the small passenger
spaceship. Your move. Attack Thorbast with your sword.

For awhile, Thorbast will parry your thrusts, and it will be nip and tuck
whether you get by this episode or not. While you're fighting for your dear
life, you notice a perfectly dreadful bug-eyed monster, oozing its way
toward Thorbast's helpless victim. The hideous monster reaches the
woman/man and starts to remove her/his garments, one at a time. The
helpless victim shrieks in terror.

Meanwhile, you keep attacking Thorbast. Eventually, in the furor of the
action, he drops his sword. Ever the gallant, you retrieve the sword and
give it back to your foe. Realizing you are truly the good guy, Thorbast
knows now that he doesn't have a chance. So he saves us all a lot of
trouble and impales himself upon his own sword. Farewell, Thorbast. Now
it's the monster's turn.

Interestingly enough, the bug-eyed horror is getting down to the interesting
part when you attack. He squawks once and flees, leaving his victim just
barely clad and grateful as all get-out that you happened along. You
release her/him and follow her/him into the cabin of the small spaceship.
From the wall of the ship she/he plucks a photo and gives it to you. (It
just happens to be a picture of Jean Harlow/Douglas Fairbanks, the very
thing you've been looking for.) You are told that, written on the back, is
the address of daddy, who will reward you handsomely if you ever visit
Ganymede. With that, the lady/man exits to the east, closing the door with
a flourish. Naturally, you follow.

Shocked to see you, the lady/man is nonetheless receptive to your advances.
What follows is another one of those boring orgy type events which we'd just
better skip for now. After all, we still have to deal with those Leather
Goddesses before they launch their invasion fleet and all is lost. We have
all the items Trent/Tiffany wanted. But golly! When last we saw
Trent/Tiffany, he/she was splattered all over the hold of that LGOP
battleship!

Exit the small passenger spaceship and go south twice. You will be back
inside the LGOP battle cruiser. Walk (do not ride the stallion) east down
the long east-west corridor. Well, I'll be a Thorbast's Thorax! Here's
Trent/Tiffany, following along behind, explaining how he/she got here! Keep
walking until you reach the black circle. Stand on the circle.

You are back in the Oasis. This time, though, don't use the exit here.
Instead, drop your own Exit. Stand on that.

You are in a boudoir, lying on a divan. Next to you, actually, is a figure
you can barely make out in the shadows. You can't see who it is, but the
heavy scent of leather is unmistakable. Go ahead. Touch the goddess. Oh,
go on!

Yipes! You have violated the sanctity of the LEATHER GODDESSES OF PHOBOS
private boudoir! For this transgression, you are summarily ejected through
a trap door, down a long chute into the Plaza.

What follows is a hilarious description of the attack upon you and
Trent/Tiffany by the entire armed minions of the LEATHER GODDESSES OF
PHOBOS. It's worth the price of the game. While the attack goes on, all
that remains is for you to hand to Trent/Tiffany each of the items you have
procured at such great peril, one by one as you are instructed. Suffice to
say, Trent/Tiffany puts them to good use, constructing the best doggoned
Super-Duper Anti-LEATHER GODDESSES OF PHOBOS Attack Machine ever crafted on
this or any other planet by a faithful companion.

Suffice also to say that the machine works and the minions of the LEATHER
GODDESSES OF PHOBOS are routed. As for you, you're back in Upper Sandusky,
Ohio, lying dazed in the roadside near a sleepy-looking gas station. From
within emerge three uniformed attendants, cooing prettily (or booming
manfully), "Are you all right?" The game has ended, and all you can do now
is await patiently for the sequel. Coming soon from those smarties at
Infocom: Gas Pump Girls Meet the Pulsating Inconvenience from Planet X.

@endnode

@node leg "Legend of Kyrandia"
@next l1
@prev le

                             
                          The Legend of Kyrandia 

                       
Getting Started: 
 
                                TREEHOUSE: 

We start off as Brandon, the grandson of... your grandfather. Pick up the
garnet (red jewel) on the table. Pick up the note from the table. 
Pick up the saw from under the table. Click on the big pot (you get an apple). 
Leave this place. 
 
                           OUTSIDE: (FOREST 1) 
 
Two screens to the right you will find a pond of (salty) water. Click on the 
pond and get a teardrop. Proceed to the right. A leaf should fall and will 
turn into a (green) peridot. Pick up the peridot. (On your way around this 
place, you will find an Amethyst. If you do find it, pick it up also. It's 
a purple jewel.) After you pick up the peridot, go up and then left. Here 
is the Forest Altar. Pick up a lavender rose here. Go to the right. (The 
Amethyst usually appears here.) Let's proceed back. Go left, left, down, 
left, left, left, left. Here lies a half-dead willow tree. Use the teardrop 
on the willow. Merith comes a long at this moment and asks you if you want to 
play. Merith has the marble so follow him to the right. Follow Merith until 
he has disappeared. Go to the south. Go south again and then to the left. 
There's Herman.  He tends this bridge, which is now broken. Talk to Herman. 
Give your saw to Herman. Leave the cave to the right and go north and north 
again. Go all the way to the left until you can no longer proceed that way. 
Now go up and enter the church building. Brynn enters the room. Talk to 
Brynn. Give Brynn the note. She will decipher it for you. Give Brynn the 
lavender rose.  You now have a silver rose. Leave this place and go south. 
Go all the way to the right and then up. Merith should be here. Just watch. 
Pick up the marble when Merith is gone. Go to your right. Here is the forest 
altar. Use the marble on the altar. Use the silver rose on the altar. You now 
have the amulet. Now go left and all the way south and then left again.You're 
back in the cave, and by this time, Herman should have fixed up the bridge. 
Now you can cross the bridge safely. 
 
                           AREA 2:  (FOREST 2) 

Once across the bridge, proceed to your left. Enter the hut. Talk to Darm the 
wizard. He will tell you to find a quill for him. Leave the hut and go south. 
This is a small forest and is a near quadilateral shape so it is not hard to 
find your way around. During your exploration, you will find certain gems and 
jewels. It would be convenient to put these in front of the golden plate 
altar once your inventory is full. Look for three items. An acorn (on a tree)
, a walnut and a pinecone. Once you have found these items, go to the screen 
(at the bottom of the  area) where there is a hole in the ground. Drop these 
three nuts into the hole. A Pseudobushiahugiflora will appear and will give 
you the first stone to your amulet. It allows you to have the power of hea-
ling. Now go north a few screens until you see a bird nest with a bird on it. 
Click on the yellow stone on your amulet. Pick up the quill. Go back to the 
hut and give the quill to Darm. In return, he will give you a magical scroll. You can try this scroll out if you wish. Once you have the scroll, 
Darm will tell you about the birthstones. The first birthstone you seek is 
at the fountain in the river. Go to the river and click at the bottom of it.  
Voila, a SUNSTONE. During your exploration around this forest, you should 
have found quite a few gems and jewels. (i.e. Onyx, Topaz, Opal) Anyhow, the 
other three birthstones you need are in order: (SUNSTONE) GARNET, TOPAZ, and 
RUBY. To get rubies, grab a few from the ruby tree.  Use the yellow stone 
on your amulet after you've gotten your rubies. Once you have all the right 
stones and have placed them in order, you will get a flute. Now go to the 
bottom right screen of the forest. Here is the entrance to the fiery dragon 
cave.  Let's go in.  Well, here's ol' Malcolm trying to stop you. Once he 
throws one of his knives at you, throw it back at him. Malcolm will chicken 
out but he shields the cave now. Here's your chance to use your flute. 
 
NOTE:  Before you enter the cave, make sure you have some empty slots in 
       your pockets. You will no longer need the flute nor the note. 
       Nor do you need any gems. Drop the apple outside of the cave. 
       So you should only have a scroll when you enter the cave. 
 
Enter the cave. 
 
                             IN THE LABYRINTH 

The Labyrinth is pretty deep and dark. If you wish to explore this labyrinth 
on your own, you can draw a grid map for yourself. It'd make it a lot easier. 
 
Here I will just direct you through the labyrinth from the cave entrance where 
there is a pond of water: Go right. Go right. (Gate will close behind you) 
Go right. Pick up three fireberries here from the bush. Go up. Drop a 
fireberry here. Go right. Drop a fireberry here. Go down. Drop a fireberry 
here. Go down. Pick up three fireberries here. Go right. Drop a fireberry 
here. Go up. Pick up the rock. Drop a fireberry here. Go up. Drop a 
fireberry here. Go right. Pick up two fireberries. Go up. Drop a fireberry 
here. Go right. Drop a fireberry here. Go right. You have now reached the 
Pantheon of Moonlight. Talk to the purple wisps here. Go right. Pick up 
three fireberries. Go down. Pick up the rock. Drop a fireberry here. Go 
down. Drop a fireberry here. Go left. Drop a fireberry here. Go down.  
Pick up two fireberries. Go down. Drop a fireberry here. Go down. Drop a 
fireberry here. Go right. You have now reached the Cavern of Twilight. Pick 
up the gold coin and the rock at the right of the screen. Go right. Pick up 
three fireberries. Go right. Drop a fireberry here. Go up. Drop a fire-
berry here. Go left. Drop a fireberry here. Go up. Pick up one fireberry. 
Go up. Pick up the rock. Drop the fireberry here. Go down. Pick up three 
fireberries. Go right. Drop a fireberry here. Go up. Drop a fireberry 
here. Go right. Drop a fireberry here. Go down. Pick up two fireberries. 
Go right. Drop a fireberry here. Go up.  You have now reached an Emerald 
Cavern. Pick up the two emeralds. Go up. Drop a fireberry here. Go right.  
Pick up two fireberries. Go right. Drop a fireberry here. Go up. Pick up 
the rock. Drop a fireberry here. 
 
You should now have five rocks, two emeralds, a gold coin and a scroll. 
Now return to the gate. To make your life easier, go: 
down, left, left, down, down, left, up, left, down, left, down, right, 
down, left, left, left, up, up, up, right, up, up, left, left, left, 
down, left, down, down, down, left, up, up, left, down, left. 
Okay.  Put all the rocks on the counterweight thingio. The gate opens. 
Let's get out of here. Go to the (wishing) well. Drop in the golden coin.  
Et voila, you have a moonstone. Let's go back into the cave, and into the 
Pantheon of Moonlight. To make your life easier again, start at the gate 
and go: right, up, right, down, down, right, up, up, right, up, right, right. 
Here we are at the Pantheon of Moonlight again. Use the moonstone in the 
altar.  It should fit nicely.  Now the two purple wisps will combine into 
one and combine with you. You now have a purple stone in your amulet. Eager 
to find out what the purple stone does? Save it and see. Click on the purple 
stone. Your are now a ball of (purple) moonlight. Travel: right, right, right
, right, down, down, left, down, left, down, right, right, right, right, down, 
right.  Here we are. You're at a river of fire. You should shift back to 
your normal self now. Use your magical scroll. Go north. Get the key. Go 
south. Click on the purple stone. Travel:  left, up, left, left, left, left, 
up, up, up, up, left, left, left, left, left, down, left, up, (cross chasm), 
up, and right. We are finally out of this darn cave. 
 
                           AREA 3:  (FOREST 3) 
 
Now I'm going to let your worry about your inventory. When you run out 
of room, drop an item somewhere, but make sure you can find it at your 
convenience. Go to your right two screens. You will be clobbered by a tree. 
You will wake up in Zanthia's home. After a brief conversation, she will tell 
you to fetch magic water. Pick up the empty bottle. Go left three screens. 
Here you meet Malcolm. Malcolm has taken a magic lamp (or whatever) from the 
fountain. You have to get it back. I think you go all the way down, one 
screen to the left, and a few screens up. You should find a place on fire.  
If you are not in the right place, find it yourself. Once you find this place
, use your magical scroll once more. This will be the last time you use this 
scroll so you can throw it away if you like. Get the lamp and find your way 
back. Use the lamp on the magical fountain and get some water. Drink it.  
You now have a blue stone in your amulet. Get some more magic water. 
Go three screens to your right to Zanthia. Give Zanthia the magic water. 
Another brief conversation with Zanthia and she'll tell you to gather some 
blueberries. Go two screens to the left. Here would be a great place to drop 
items which you might need later. Such as the emeralds, gems, jewels. Blue-
berries are:  extreme South, extreme Right, Up, right, up.  Somewhere there.  
It shouldn't be too hard to find. Get one blueberry, it's all you need. 
Go back to Zanthia and she'll probably tell you to get some fresh blueberries. 
Go get another blueberry. Come back to Zanthia and she should be gone. Put 
the blueberry in the pot. The liquid should turn bluish. 
 
------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
Here are the potions which you want to make:               Amount:  
                                                                     
(BLUE) SAPPHIRE + (BLUE) BLUEBERRIES = BLUE POTION           (1)    
                                                                     
(RED) RUBY + (RED) EXOTIC FLOWERS = RED POTION               (2)     
                                                                      
(YELLOW) TOPAZ + (YELLOW) TULIP = YELLOW POTION              (1)    
------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
 
Go get your sapphire, rubies, tulip, topaz, apple and rose back in forest 2.  
You need the apple & rose for later on in the game. Even though you've used 
the jewelry they should reappear. Make sure to click on the purple stone be-
fore you re-enter the cave. Once in the cave. Go all the way down and all the 
way to the left. Get the items. To get the EXOTIC FLOWER go back to Zanthia's 
place and click on the carpet.You've discovered a secret doorway. Go in. 
 
                           AREA 4:  (FOREST 4) 

Well, the exotic flower, should be to the NORTH EAST. (UP AND RIGHT) 
The exotic flowers are on a beach where there are two golden unicorns at 
the side of a chopper landing place. Pick one up. Go and mix your potions 
now. Once you have a blue potion, a yellow potion, and 2 red potions. Go 
through the secret doorway again. From here, go: 2 screens down, 1 screen 
left, 2 screens down, 1 screen right, 1 screen up. You should now be at a 
place where there are two big green crystal towers. 
 
MIX BLUE POTION WITH RED POTION. 
Result = magical purple potion. 
 
MIX RED POTION WITH YELLOW POTION. 
Result = magical orange potion. 
 
These are all the potions you need throughout the rest of the game. If you 
want to play around with the other potions such as the magical yellow, blue, 
and red potions then go ahead. They're nothing special, nothing to see.  
Yellow tastes like furniture polish. Blue gives you hiccups. And red tastes 
warm and good (chili?). Well, since you have mixed these potions, let's go get 
the Royal Chalice. You may have seen this in forest 2. Go back to Zanthia's 
place.  From there, go to the fountain.  Go down and to the left. The grail 
should be floating in the air here. Click on the blue stone. Hmmm... you 
didn't quite get the grail did you? Let's go 1 screen to the right. Click on 
the door. Drink the purple potion. You're inside. The pipsqueak wants some-
thing good. So why not a rotten apple? Give the pipsqueak the apple. Go 
outside and get the royal chalice. Once you have the royal chalice, let's go 
to the chopper landing site. (You know, the one with the two gold unicorn 
statues) Once you are there, drink the orange potion. 
 
IMPORTANT NOTE:  Make sure you have the following before you drink the 
                 orange potion: the key, one lavender rose, the royal chalice. 
 
                               CASTLE LAND 
 
Once you reach the island, go to the right. Put the rose on the grave. Your 
mother will appear (as a ghost). She will speak to you. After a brief conver-
sation with your mother, you will receive the last stone of your amulet.  The 
red one. Go one screen to the right. Go right again to the castle. Click on 
the red stone. Use the key in the keyhole.  You're in. 
 
                              IN THE CASTLE 

Once in the castle, Malcolm will welcome you inside. Go right. Go up.Go 
left. In the foyer, go to the second door to your right. Go right. You're 
in the kitchen. Pick up the sceptre. Leave the kitchen. In the foyer again, 
go the the second door to your left. Go left into the library. 
Pull out the following books: 
"O" pal 
"P" otions 
"E" nchantment 
"N" ature 
Get the crown. Go upstairs. Go left. Go up. Here you should meet Herman. 
Click on the yellow stone on your amulet. Go left. Pick up the mallet, and 
play - DO FA MI RE (green, white, gold, blue).  Get the key from the safe. Go 
back downstairs and to the big door. Use the gold key in the door. 
Go to the library and step into the half circle. The trap door turns and 
you're into the catacombs. Find your way to the green force field. Click on 
the blue stone on your amulet. Go up. Go left and left. Click on the false 
stone on the ground. Pick up the key. Leave the catacombs and go back to the 
big door. Use the key in the door. Go in. Use the crown (middle).  Use the 
sceptre (left). Use the royal chalice (right). (remember to save) 
The door opens. Malcolm steps in to warn you. Go right. Step in front of 
the mirror.

@endnode

@node l1 "Leisure Suit Larry 1"
@next l5
@prev le                             


                           Leisure Suit Larry 1
                   

Good evening, Swinging Singles. It's 10 o'clock, and you're without a date,
as usual. But here in Lost Wages, you need not be alone...not if you've got
plenty of cash, elementary social skills, an good supply of breath spray, and  
a willingness to try anything once. As LEISURE SUIT LARRY, you've determined 
to make this the last lonely night of your life.

This walkthru offers only one particular way to play LEISURE SUIT LARRY. There  
is a great deal of flexibility in the game, however, and the game can be com-
pleted with many fewer points than you will earn using this walkthru,although 
you may miss some very funny and <ahem> unusual experiences.

A few necessary conventions. First of all, the game occasionally requires you  
to perform some basic human functions. For the purposes of this walkthru, we
'll say "USE" where another less delicate word will work just as well. Also,  
for women playing LEISURE SUIT LARRY, you're going to have to learn to think  
like a man. For the most part, that means forget the subtlety. In this game, 
outright deviousness and persistence gets the girl.

Inventory control is a cinch in LEISURE  SUIT  LARRY. You can hold everything
, and only rarely will the game let you drop or otherwise misuse something 
before you've used it for the correct purpose. The game designers have also 
apparently learned where elephants go to die...your mouth. Thus, you have a 
large (but not bottomless) supply of breath spray. You'll want to USE SPRAY 
whenever somebody begins to make snide comments regarding your oral hygiene.   Never walk out into the middle of the street, despite their
seeming desertion. And NEVER linger in a dark alley.

Before you start, you'll have to take a little exam to prove your age. No
help with this one -- you'll have to prove your age on your own. And you
won't find the answers in any encyclopedia.

You begin your evening in the Land of the Lounge Lizards in front of Lefty's,  
sleazy bar nonpareil. You'll find you've got (in addition to your breath 
spray) $94 in your wallet, as well as some notes and business cards you won't  
need, and credit cards (which won't work in this game). You've also got a 
working Bolex watch. This game spends a lot of time tipping the hat to Info-
com, so you've got the requisite lint. OPEN DOOR and go in.

What atmosphere! Notice the fine velvet art and the refined clientele. I was  
in a place like this in Upper Sandusky, Ohio once, but that was decades ago,  
and it's a long story. SIT on the empty stool at the bar. You can order all  
the beer and wine you like, but make sure you ORDER WHISKEY. You're wise 
enough not to drink it, but around here, it's not tough to find somebody who  
will. The young lady at the bar just isn't very responsive (unless you pinch  
her), and the only other person talking is the guy with the ancient punch-
lines. So head through the doorway at the top of your screen.

Somebody's left a perfectly good rose sitting on the table. Might be a per-
fect gift for a lady (if you can find one), so pedal over and take it. TALK 
TO THE DRUNK, but watch where you step: too near his groin and he gets crot-
chety. Perhaps doing a good deed might get you one in return, so GIVE THE  
WHISKEY TO THE DRUNK. In boozy, sodden gratitude, he'll give you a remote  
control. That's all you'll get out of him, so head for the bathroom to the 
right.

Now, this is quite obviously not the men's room, for a couple reasons, but
you wouldn't know it from reading the walls. EXAMINE them enough times and
you'll get a cryptic "password." Remember it. And as long as you're there,
USE THE TOILET. No doubt some of Larry's best thinking gets done that way.
When you're done, don't flush the toilet unless you've saved the game first.

EXAMINE THE SINK, too. More evidence that this is the ladies' room (or per-
haps it's co-ed). TAKE THE RING, and wash your hands if you like, for all the  
good it will do you. You'll probably need to WIPE HANDS on something since 
there's nothing here that's "sanitized for your protection." Leave the bath-
room and head for that lovely red naugahyde door in the bar. KNOCK ON THE 
DOOR and somebody peers out at you. Give him the password and go on in.

Friendly looking fellow. He's guarding the goods upstairs, but he can be dis-
tracted. Since you can't turn on the television by hand, you'll need to USE  
REMOTE CONTROL to turn it on, and if you hunt long enough for a program that  
appeals to the pimp's intellectual instincts, you'll surely find one. Once a 
program's caught his eye, you can wend your way upstairs.

Just LOOK at her. She IS a mess, isn't she? Think carefully about this! Re-
member, it's  the  Eighties, and going unprotected in this situation can (and  
is!) deadly. We don't want your first time to be your last, so let's go get  
some protection. Before leaving, you might want to grab that box that's sit-
ting on the table by the window.  It's as easy as taking candy from a bimbo.   
OPEN THE WINDOW and climb  out. You can leave the old-fashioned way, too, but 
this way's shorter and will net you an important tool.

Once you're on the  fire  escape, notice that little object in the other win-
dow. You won't be able to get it till much later,though, so don't worry about  
it. Walk to the left end of the fire escape, and you'll find the shortcut to 
the ground floor. And while you're sitting in that bin, reflect on all the 
wonderful, useful things non-playing characters tend to throw out in adven-
ture games...rotten cloves of garlic, bones, notebooks, and so on. So EXAMINE 
GARBAGE and take what you find. EXIT the bin and walk to the cab stand in 
front of the bar.

There are three marked cab stands in LEISURE SUIT LARRY, but you can call a
cab from any screen. The cabby is impatient, so try to position yourself in
the center of the screen, right by the curb, when you CALL CAB. ENTER CAB and 
you're on your way. TALK TO THE CABBY and he'll give you the rundown on Lost 
Wages hot spots. At the moment,you want to hit the Convenience Store, so tell  
the cabby. When you arrive, PAY CABBY. For a startling bit of realism, remem-
ber to TIP CABBY as well.

Go straight into the store - don't stop to talk with questionable characters.  
Besides, you don't have what he wants...yet. In the store, the first thing  
that'll probably catch your eye is the magazine rack. TAKE a magazine, and be 
sure to READ it. It's a well-disguised clue. Then wander over to the back  
aisle of the store, on the left, and LOOK AT THE SHELF. That wine is a worth-
while investment (vintage pending). At last, you may nonchalantly wander over  
to the counter and discreetly ASK CLERK ABOUT CONDOM. It's like trying to or-
der a burger in some fast food joints you've visited.

This clerk is used to shady characters like yourself, so don't try to leave
without paying. Once you're back outside, the sailor will accost you again.
When he asks you for spare change, type GIVE CHANGE TO BUM and the program
will tell you that you don't have any. Wait a second, and he'll hit you up
for wine. G'wan, be a sport. Hand over that Mad Dog 20/20, and you'll get
some advice (and a useful souvenir). Remember that advice; this guy's obvi-
ously been around.

Before you head back to Lefty's, EXAMINE THE PHONE on the sidewalk. Jot down 
that number. Maybe it'll lead to a meaningful relationship. Call now, before 
midnight tonight. DIAL PHONE and give it your best shot. Good thing you're 
used to rejection.

Just for the heck of it, walk off to the right, to the next screen. The dis-
co looks like a potential "meet market," but you'll find you're not up to
their standards. At the moment, anyway. So call a cab -- there's nowhere
else around here to go.

But after all, the night is still young. Let's drop by that Casino the driver 
mentioned before going back to Lefty's. When you get out of the cab, there  
may be a gentleman decked out in a pickle barrel. He may not show up till la-
ter, but at any rate, you're well-heeled enough to purchase one of his apples
. So do it. Then go on into the Casino.

SIT at the Blackjack table or PLAY SLOTS, whichever's your speed. Either
way, you're going to want to break the bank here. The odds are much more fa-
vorable at the BLACKJACK table, if you know how to play (This is a great time  
to learn!), but the payoffs are greater at SLOTS. You need to use the SAVE  
function often here. SAVE the game right before you make your first bet, and  
name the save after the amount of money you have. Then keep playing, and SAVE 
the game each time your total funds exceed the amount you had in the last 
saved game. For easy reference, keep changing the name of the save to reflect 
your total cash. The game will end when you hit $250.

Now head "north," to the top of your screen, into the adjoining room. You've  
got no pride, Larry, you're a desperate man. So dig around in the ashtray.   
You'll find the all-important Disco Pass. Take it and head into the Cabaret  
to the right. Sorry, Uncle Lar', no foxes cruising here.
Perhaps if you wait a bit. Take a seat at the bottom right-hand table. Sit-
ting on the comic's whoopee cushion's worth a point. The comic may be perfor-
ming, or perhaps it's the chorus line, but either way, nobody shows up, so 
don't linger. Leave the casino, call a cab, and head for the Disco.

When the bouncer gets in your way,SHOW PASS to him, and he'll let you through
. Once  upstairs, you spot her...the woman of your dreams! She's sitting all  
alone. Stop licking your chops, get over there and sit with her. LOOK at her.  
What's the gentlemanly thing to do? ASK HER TO DANCE. Hurry out onto the 
dance floor and do your stuff. John Travolta, eat your heart out (actually,  this number seems to owe a bit to the Disco scene in
AIRPLANE).

Go back to the table when the dance is over and SIT again. LOOK at her again  
and TALK. Be persistent. Keep TALKing, and eventually you'll find some common 
ground. Wish it were that easy in real life!

Fawn is a 100% Certified Golddigger, but you found all these nifty presents
at Lefty's, so it's not really costing you anything. GIVE her the rose (or
the candy, or the ring...the order doesn't matter). Oooh, I just LOVE shallow  
women! Actually, the hooker's shallow, too, but Fawn is blonde. Give FAWN 
another present. She still doesn't seem too turned on, so go for broke. Give 
her the last present.

Well, it looks like you're going have to do some serious forking over if you
want this relationship to work. And you're going to have to make a lifetime
commitment. Well, you're only playing a game; and no guts, no glory. Besides,  
you can afford it. So give Fawn what she wants. Don't worry, she's not going 
to run off: She really IS going to rent the Honeymoon Suite for the two of 
you. Leave the Disco and take a cab to the Chapel.

Once you're outside the Chapel, you may notice a quiet, unassuming gentleman
lurking by the cab stand. Just for giggles, go over to him. Hmmm. At least he 
doesn't want to sell you anything. TALK to him for a point.

Now go into the Chapel, and take that last long walk down the aisle. Look
around all you like, but they're waiting for you to MARRY FAWN. She likes
to build up the anticipation, doesn't she? Too bad you're not carrying around 
"No Tease." Leave the chapel and head left to the Casino.

Enter the Casino, go straight back to the Great Glass Elevator. PRESS FOUR.
The Honeymoon Suite is the room with the heart on. Knock on the door, and
Fawn will let you in. But first, a little mood music. Turn on the radio. Un-
fortunately, the  commercial (remember the  phone number) gives Fawn an idea,  
and you'll have to make a little trip before you consummate the relationship.

Go back down to the first floor (PRESS  ONE). There's a phone, but somebody's  
gummed up the works. At this point, check your finances; you're probably down  
to just a few bucks. You're going to need about $40 for the next bit, so stop 
at the Casino and build up your cash supply to $40 or $50, but don't bother 
with more than that yet.

There's one phone that  works, and that's the one outside the Convenience
Store. So take a cab back there. Be sure to ANSWER THE PHONE. What goes a-
round comes around, right? [Ed.'s  note: Also call Sierra On-Line for another 
five points.]

Call Ajax Liquors and order WINE. When they ask where you want to have it de-
livered to, be specific: HONEYMOON SUITE AT THE CASINO HOTEL. If you just say 
Casino Hotel, it won't get there. And whatever you do, don't even THINK about  
getting the wine yourself at the Convenience Store. Try it if you like, but  
save the game first, and get ready for a hairy ride back to the Casino.

Head back to the Casino, and go back up to the Honeymoon Suite. Fawn will
want you to pour the wine, first...and  now comes the big payoff. Get
undressed, or kiss her, or whatever you care to.

Sorry, Larry, I guess it's just not your night. The woman of your dreams
turned out to be a nightmare. Fortunately, you're not too stuck. You got some  
great advice from the bum outside the Convenience Store. So USE KNIFE and 
TAKE ROPE. Then go downstairs, and using the same technique as before, build 
your finances back up to at least $45.

Larry, maybe you're better off sticking to a sure thing. After you've got
some bucks  again, take a cab back to Lefty's. You're going to lose your Dis-
trict Three Virgin's Card if it's the last thing you do.  Again, knock on the 
naugahyde door, give the password (the pimp remains transfixed in front of  
the television...just look at those glazed eyes), and head upstairs. Go a-
round to the front of the bed and UNDRESS. Now, USE THE CONDOM. SAVE GAME
just in case. And now, Larry, you're not going to be the same "Larry" anymore
. Find a verb you're comfortable with and go to it. Pick a traditional action
, though -- a kinky one may end the game quickly.

A little anti-climactic, eh, Larry? (rim shot) One more thing, before you 
leave her with that glow of apathy, be sure to REMOVE CONDOM. Otherwise the
cops'll getcha for indecent exposure. Why don't they go bother the guy out-
side the Chapel instead?

Exit via the window, but don't go to the left yet. You're now equipped to get  
the pills in the other window, thanks to the hint in "Jugs" magazine. Go to  
the right end of the fire escape and TIE ROPE TO RAILING. Then TIE ROPE TO ME.   
GET PILLS. You'll have to open that window somehow. Check your inventory. One  
of the few unused articles is ideal for breaking and entering. BREAK WINDOW  WITH HAMMER.  Now GET PILLS.  Examine them.  That
thing after the "F" isn't a one, by the way.

To get down,you'll have to GO TO FIRE ESCAPE and UNTIE ROPE. Now you can take 
the express to the dumpster and EXIT it again. Go out front.

Where haven't we looked for female companionship? Well, the casino hotel's
got eight floors. Maybe we can scare up a date there. Take a cab to the ca-
sino, get in the elevator, and start knocking on doors.

Eventually,you'll find yourself up on the eighth floor,the penthouse. There's  
a beautiful brunette sitting by herself at the desk. (Aren't there any RED-
HEADS in this game?) Be sure to check her out carefully, so you know what you
're getting into, and turn on the charm. TALK to her (and again, you'll have  
to be persistent if you want to learn about her). At some point, she'll stop 
being communicative and the program will urge you to find a medical stimulant
.

By now, you should have figured out that the pills are Spanish Fly. Give them  
to Faith. Maybe this is what you've been waiting for, Larry. But as it turns  
out, Faith has incredible will power, so it's not to be. But now that she's 
gone, check out her desk. Once you've noticed the button, you'll want to do 
the obvious.

That means PUSH BUTTON, Larry. Geez, some people.... Go into that elevator.  
You emerge in the penthouse, tastefully decorated with  Mark Crowe's finest 
efforts. Before you go hunting for the gurgling sound, go back and to the 
right around the partition. You'll find yourself in the bedroom. Open the  
closet door and go inside. The screen won't change, but LOOK while you're in  
there, and TAKE anything that looks interesting -- that inflatable love doll, 
for example.

"I'm gonna buy a rubber doll that I can call my own...." EXAMINE it. It's
doubtful that you'll find a meaningful relationship with Olga (I'm just gues-
sing that's her name), but you'll never know unless you try. BLOW UP DOLL. 
And there she is, in all her vinyl splendor. Time once again to explore na-
ture's glorious mysteries, so USE DOLL (or whatever). The machine will balk 
at the idea, but answer YES to the question.

Well, Larry, perhaps you should have been gentler. Follow Olga out to the
terrace. And meet the REAL woman of your dreams! Look carefully, and you can  
find her name (it's on the towel, and it's a clue). TALK to her, and she'll  
invite you in for a dip. Take her up on it. UNDRESS,and you'll dive right in.

LOOK at her. She won't want to talk -- mere words cannot express what she's
got in mind for the two of you. Notice the "come hither" look, none of this
coy "wink wink nudge nudge" business. She's trying to seduce you, but you
need to give  her a particular item. Think of her name and look at your in-
ventory.

C'mon, you know what she really wants, don't you? GIVE APPLE TO EVE. Then
lie back and enjoy, Larry. You've earned it.

@endnode

@node l5 "Leisure Suit Larry 5"
@next lu
@prev l1


                           Leisure Suit Larry 5

 
                              PORN PROD CORP
 
You start off as Larry in Porn Prod Corp headquarters. When you hear a voice 
yell for coffee from behind the office door, click the HAND on the coffee pot,
and take it in. You'll be given a camera. (Note: if you skipped the opening 
animation, you will not be asked to make the coffee). Back in the office 
click the HAND on the door on the back wall and go into the file room. Take 
the resumes from the file cabinet on the right by clicking  the HAND on it. 
Once you have the resumes, click on each one of them in your inventory. Each 
contains an item you'll need later on. Take the AeroDork card laying on the 
table, and leave the room. Now, go to the video tape room. Get the three 
tapes on the table by clicking the HAND on them. Before you can use them, 
they have to be degaussed. So, one by one, click them on the degausser on the 
top wall. Click on the drawer on the top left corner and get the camera char-
ger. Select a tape from the inventory and click it into your camera. Now, go 
outside, you'll find a limo waiting for you. Get into the limo, and the dri-
ver will take you to the airport.

                                  AIRPORT

You will visit several airports during the game, and they all look alike. At 
the airport go to the AeroDork machine and insert your card. You'll be pre-
sented with a list of places to which you may fly. You may play in any order 
you wish, but we'll start with New York. When the machine asks you for the 
code, click on the buttons as indicated in your manual. Take your boarding 
pass, and go into the airport. Go to the door in the middle of the far wall, 
which is locked. Hold your AeroDork card up to the camera, the door will open, 
and in you'll go. As soon as the "Now Boarding" light comes on, click your 
boarding pass into the slot to the right of the door, the door will open, and 
you'll go in. On the plane, take the magazine from the seat pocket, and read 
it. You must be tired because you drift off to sleep and dream of Patti...

                                  FBI LAB

Well Patti, time for you to do some undercover work. Desmond will take you to 
the FBI Lab. First, explore the lab. Click the EYE on each person working 
there for a demonstration of their projects. Now, click the WALK icon and go 
to the right. Commander Twit will give you a contact number, and some codes:
write these down. Now you'll get your, uh, "Safety First Field Locator Device
." Sit back and enjoy the animation. When you get back into the Lab, take the 
Dataman and the DataPaks by clicking the HAND on them. Click the HAND on the 
Hooter Shooter to take that, then go outside. Enter the Limo. To tell Bobbi 
where to take you, insert a DataPak into the Dataman, and then show the Data-
Man to her. For now, insert the PC Hammer DataPak into the Dataman, and then 
click it on Bobbi. While you're traveling you fall asleep ...

                                 NEW YORK

Welcome to New York, Larry. Before you go see Michelle in the Hard Disk Cafe, 
there are several things to do at the airport. First, if you haven't put a 
video tape into the camera, do so. Now, go the far West side of the terminal. 
Click the charger into the electrical outlet on the wall, and then click the 
camera onto the charger. Keep clicking the EYE on the camera until it's char-
ged 100%, then click the HAND on it to retrieve it. Go back to the right. 
When you pass the Jerry's Kids collection box, click the HAND icon on it to 
get a quarter. Go to the phone on the right. On the way over read all the 
signs up top; one of the signs has a limo service phone number, write that 
number down. Go to the phone (only one works in New York or anywhere else for 
that matter) and call the limo service. Go outside to meet the limo. In the 
limo, click on the napkin in your inventory and show it to the driver, who'll 
take you to the Hard Disk Cafe. Before you leave the limo, take the Day Trot-
ter laying on the seat, and look inside it. Enter the Hard Disk Cafe and talk 
to the Maitre d'. Keep talking to him, and talking to him, and talking to him 
(you get the idea). Eventually, he'll give you a ticket, and you can enter. 
But (there's always a but!) you can't go all the way inside. Did you read the 
magazine on the plane? Good, then you'll know that you should rub your ticket 
on the music box to change the holes on it. Go back outside and click your 
ticket on the music box, go back in, and into the Herman Hollerith room. 
There she is! Click the TALK icon on Michelle several times, until she in-
vites you to her table. Talk to her some more, and then give her the Day 
Trotter. Click the HAND icon on the camera in your inventory to turn it on. 
Now, give Michelle the credit cards. Then sit back and, er, well, enjoy! Once 
Michelle finishes with you, walk to the phone in the lobby and call the limo 
company; the limo will take you back to the airport. At the airport, buy a 
ticket to Atlantic City. Enter the airport and board the plane as is des-
cribed in the AIRPORT section. On the plane you fall asleep again, and dream 
of Patti...

                                   K-RAP

Well, it looks as if you've arrived at K-RAP, Patti. Click the HAND on the 
front door to go inside. On the left is Mr. Krapper's office, click the HAND 
on it to enter. Once in the office you have to peek into the desk. There are 
two ways you get the desk open. Either get the letter opener from the disk 
and pick the lock, or take the key from the base of the tall plant and open 
it. When you have the drawer open,click the HAND icon to find what is inside.
First you'll find a blue stickum with a number, write the number down. (Note: 
each time you play you'll get a different number;remember this when restoring 
a different game).Click the HAND on the drawer again to get the folder. A-ha,
here's the evidence you need! Click the folder on the copy machine to make 
copies. Oops! Looks like the machine is history, but before Mr. Krapper gets
back, put everything back where it was. If you took the key, replace it. If 
you have the letter opener, put it back on the desk. Look at you, Patti, you'
re filthy! Click the HAND on the bathroom door, and then go into the shower 
to clean up. Oh, no! What a mess! Stark naked you descend in a see-through 
elevator. When you reach the bottom, click the HAND on the clothes to put 
them on, then go one screen to the right. You need to go into Control Room B. 
When you're asked for an access code, enter the number that was on the blue 
stickum. In the control room, click the HAND on the reel-to-reel tape on the 
back wall, then click the tape on the tape deck on the bottom left. Click the 
HAND icon six times on the control panel beneath the microphone. Now, click 
the HAND on the reel-to-reel tape recorder. Looks like you are recording the 
evidence you needed! When PC Hammer locks you in the control room, click the 
HAND on the tape three times to retrieve it. Now, click the HAND on the con-
trol panel to turn the volume up, click the TALK icon on the microphone, and 
shatter the glass! (And you thought you had a good voice!) Now to get to des 
Rever Records. Back in the limo, insert the Reverse Biaz DataPak into the 
Dataman, and then click it on Bobbi. While you're traveling, you fall asleep.

                               ATLANTIC CITY

Welcome to Atlantic City. Before you go downtown, insert a new video tape in-
to the camera. Go all the way to the west side of the terminal, click the 
charger into the electrical outlet on the wall, then click the camera onto 
the charger. Keep clicking the EYE on the camera until it is charged 100%, 
then click the HAND on it to retrieve it. Click the HAND on the slot machine 
to get a quarter for the phone, find the limo phone number by reading the 
signs at the top of the terminal, go the only working phone on the east side 
of the airport, and call a limo. Go outside, and into the limo. Look at La-
na's resume in your inventory, and get the matchbook. Click the matchbook on 
the driver, and she'll take you to Tramp Casino. At the Casino talk to the 
girl to the left of the door. She'll play a guessing game with you and give 
you 10 coins. (You wish real life was that easy!) Go into the casino, and 
play video poker. You have to win about 700 coins. The only way to do this is 
to always bet the highest amount you can, save every time you win, and re-
store every time you lose. When you have won enough money, take the cash.
Now, go to the door on the rear wall. Inside, you can watch Jennifer Jiggle 
for 25 coins. When she finishes her show, go back into the casino, and then 
go outside to the boardwalk. Go right until you find Ivana's Skates and rent 
a pair of skates from her. Click on the money and give it to her for a de-
posit. Go outside and skate. When Lana Luscious appears, TALK to her. She'll 
invite you to her mud wrestling show. After she leaves, remove the skates, 
and return them to Ivana. Go back to the Casino Ballroom. In the Ballroom pay 
your 500 coins and take a seat up front. Click the hand on the camera to turn 
it on. Lana will invite you up onto the stage. When her body parts start ap-
pearing all over the screen, click the HAND on them to grab them. Oh well, 
this one didn't work out that well, did it Larry? Go outside, talk to the va-
let standing on the right of the door, and he'll call the limo for you. Back 
at the airport, buy a ticket to Miami. See the AIRPORT section above for com-
plete instructions on buying a ticket and boarding the plane. On the plane 
you fall asleep, yet again ...

                             DES REVER RECORDS

Okay, Patti, you've arrived at des Rever Records. Go inside and walk over to 
the gold record. Click the HAND to take it and play it on the recorder. You 
have to play it forwards and backwards at 33 and 78 RPMs. A-ha!Looks like you 
have your evidence. Go into the studio by clicking the HAND on the studio 
door. Click the HAND on the synthesizer to play it. You'll have to make three 
recordings until Reverse Biaz is satisfied. Back in the control booth, click 
the ZIPPER icon in Reverse Biaz, and, well.... When you're done, the limo 
driver will take you back home.

                                   MIAMI

Welcome to Miami, Larry. Before you leave the airport you must put a fresh 
tape in the camera, and recharge the camera battery. Go the far west side of 
the terminal. Click the charger into the electrical outlet on the wall, and 
then click the camera onto the charger. Keep clicking the EYE on the camera 
until it is charged 100%; click the HAND on it to retrieve it. Click the HAND 
icon on the vending machine to get two coins for the phone. Look at the signs 
on top of the terminal, get the limo phone number, and the phone number for 
Just Green Cards. Call Just Green Cards using the only working phone, then 
call the limo company. Outside the airport, click the HAND on the garbage can 
to get the green card, then enter the limo. Look at Chi Chi's resume in your 
inventory and get the business card. Show the card to the driver; she'll take 
you to Dr. Pulliam. When you get to the doctor's office, go inside. Take the 
doily from the table on the right and click it on yourself. Go TALK to the 
receptionist. She'll send you into see Chi Chi. TALK to Chi Chi. Then, turn 
the camera on by clicking the HAND on it, and give her the Green Card. She'll 
show her appreciation by taking you downstairs to the gym. Once you have 
finished with the gym, go back into the doctor's office and use the phone to 
call the limo company. The driver will take you back to the airport. At the 
airport buy a ticket back to Los Angeles. 

                                FLIGHT HOME

When the plane starts to crash, the stewardess will ask for a volunteer to 
fly it home. Hey, you're game, Larry! You'll be led to the cockpit. Click the 
HAND all over the controls until you find the Auto Pilot. That's it! You sa-
ved innocent lives: you're a hero! (Hm, didn't you become a hero in one of 
your previous adventures?). Sit back and enjoy the animation.

                              THE WHITE HOUSE

Patti, you're about to perform at the White House, when in comes Larry! Watch 
the animation, and when Julius Bigg holds you at gun point, click on the 
Hooter Shooter in your inventory, and then click on Mr. Bigg. Now just sit
back and enjoy the ending.

@endnode

@node lu "Lure of the Temptress"
@next lur
@prev l5

			
                           Lure of the temptress


	As soon as you find yourself in THE CELL you have to...


PULL TORCH, and move closer to the door, so when the guard goes in, you 
leave immeditely.  When you leave.. CLOSE DOOR and then LOCK DOOR, so he 
won't hurt you. TALK TO PRISONER, and he'll ask you for water, go to GUARD 
ROOM, GET KNIFE, GET BOTTLE, LOOK AT BARREL, USE TAP ON BOTTLE, USE KNIFE ON 
SACK LOOK AT SACK, and then go right to TORTURE ROOM, you'll see the guy...
USE KNIFE ON LEATHER CORD, it's fixed to his feet...  From now on he'll fol-
low you wherever you go.  Go back to THE OUTER CELL, and GIVE BOTTLE TO PRI-
SONER, he'll tell you 'bout the way of escape. TELL RATPOUCH TO PUSH BRICKS, 
when he leaves go after him...


    You are now in the SEWER OUTLET..  <some village map will help ya>

Go to THE FORGE, GET TINDERBOX <on the floor>, TALK TO LUTHERN, leave and go 
to SEVERED ARMS, TALK TO EILEAIN, leave and talk to MALLIN <the guy in green 
clothes>, he'll give you METAL BAR, go with it to VILLAGE SHOP, and GIVE IT 
TO EWAN, he'll give you some money and GEM.  Go to MAGPIE TAVERN, TALK TO 
MARKUS, BRIBE MARKUS, TALK TO MARKUS once again, then TALK TO MALLIN, go to 
THE FORGE, TALK TO LUTHERN, go back to MAGPIE COURTYARD and TALK TO GRUB, the 
guy lying on the ground.  Ask him 'bout the BLACK GOAT.  Now TALK TO LUTHERN, 
<again, shhh>, go to SEVERED ARMS and TALK TO EILEAIN, she'll give you the 
DIARY, EXAMIN DIARY, go back to MAGPIE TAWERN and GIVE GEM TO NELLIE.  She'll 
give you a FLASK.  DRINK FLASK.. See blacksmith, GIVE FLASK TO LUTHERN, so 
he'll empty it for you.  Nice going. Now go to MARKET PLACE, GIVE LOCKPICK 
TO RATPOUCH...  And at this moment you should save the game, because you 
don't know what will happen next.. LOOK AT DOOR, you'll see a lock.  TELL 
RATPOUCH TO USE LOCKPICK ON LOCK.


                    Now you're in the TAIDGH'S HOUSE...

LOOK AT APARATUS, USE OIL BURNER WITH TINDERBOX, USE FLASK ON TAP <it's on
the very right side of the APARATUS>.. Go to MIDDLE STREET, and DRINK FLASK..  
<Wow, what a cute girl!> Enter THE DOOR, and TALK TO SKORLS..  You'll set the 
girl free.. Now you can go and talk to anyone you want, there are many funny 
situations, so check'em out, you should talk to Skorls, Luthern, Gwyn, Eilaine
, Ultar, Morkus, Gereint and Grub..  <BUT!!  You can't go to the CASTLE WALL, 
coz you'll lose the magic..> When you got bored, walk to CASTLE WALL, so you
'll turn to DIERMOT again. Now...  TALK TO GOEWNIE, you can find her in APO-
THECARY WORKSHOP. Go to BLACKFRIARS ROW and LOOK AT NOTE.  Find MALLIN and 
TALK TO  him. He'll give you a book, now go to MONKS LODGE and TALK TO TOBY.  
GIVE BOOK TO TOBY, he'll tell you how to fight SELENA..  Remeber the INGRE-
DIENTS he'll tell you.  Now leave and go to APTH WORKSHOP.  TALK TO GOEWIN, 
tell her it's for a dragon, but she won't have COWBANE, leave...  And now you 
have two ways to do it.  You can go and find COWBANE yourself, or TELL RAT-
POUCH TO GO TO THE FORGE, AND THEN ASK CATRIONE FOR COWBANE, AND THEN GO TO 
SMITHY STREET AND THEN GET COWBANE, FINISH.  He'll be back so ASK RATPOUCH 
FOR COWBANE, now you got it, so GIVE COWBANE TO GOEWIN.  TALK TO GOEWIN, so 
she'll give you the potion.  Now TALK TO GOEWIN again, leave and go to SE-
VERED ARMS, TALK TO ULTAR, go to WEREGATE, TALK TO GORGOYLES, go to APTH 
WORKSHOP and TALK TO GOEWIN, she'll meet you at the gate..  TALK TO GOEWIN.  
Go inside and play around with the skulls, you can TELL her to PULL or PUSH 
skulls. You'll get to the room with no skulls so save the game before you go 
ahead.. Now fight to that asshole, hope you beat him up...  The trick is to 
point your mouse on DIERMOT and then..  You'll figure it out after few times..
Well, you'll see the monster..  USE POTION ON DRAGON, and then TALK TO DRAGON
,commend him to help you, so you'll get an eye..  Now let him sleep,leave the
caves... 

TALK TO GOEWIN..  Go to THE FORGE and TALK TO LUTHERN, then TALK TO MELLIN, 
he'll tell you about the SKORL..  Go to the MARKET PLACE and when you see 
Skorl going to VILLAGE SHOP, LOOK THROUGH THE WINDOW, you'll hear the conver-
sation, Skorl leaves then, TALK TO SKORL, he'll tell you about the barrel, go 
to VILLAGE SHOP, TALK TO EWAN...

So now, Skorl will take you to THE CASTLE.. LOOK AT CASK, the one in the left 
corner, so you'll see the BUNG..  Now go to THE KITCHEN, GET TONGS, LOOK AT 
CARCASS, GET FAT, now TALK TO MINNOW, tell him you've come for Selena, TALK 
TO him once again, and ask him to tell his master that someone is in the WINE 
CELLAR.  As soon as he leaves, go to the left USE TONGS ON BUNG, and hide 
yourself in the very right corner of the room.  Skorl comes in and sees the 
wine...  Now go left to THE GATE ROOM and USE FAT ON LEVER, TELL MINNOW TO 
OPERATE LEVER, while he does it, PULL WINCH. The gate will open..  Now go 
back, and make sure to save the game <AGAIN>, because you may have some pro-
blems on the bridge..  After you pass him, head to the left so you'll see Se-
lena..

@endnode

@node lur "Lurking Horror"
@next ma
@prev lu


                                Lurking Horror             



You're a student at G.U.E. Tech. It's late on a cold, winter night, but your 
20-page report is due tomorrow. To work on your assignment, you make your way 
to the Computer Center through the worst storm of the winter. The game starts 
with you standing in the Terminal Room. There is a PC before you, so have a 
seat and log on, please. Your user ID is printed on the Student ID Card in-
cluded in the game package. Your password is written in the back of the "G.U.
E. at a Glance Guide for Freshmen" (also included in the package). Once you'
ve logged on, you'll see a menu on the PC. Use the PC's mouse by clicking on 
MENU then YAK. Read the strange document which has replaced your paper. You'
ll faint and awaken in "a place." Go down into the bowl, look at the platform
, and take the small stone. Wait a couple of turns and you'll wake up in the 
Terminal Room. Look at the PC's screen. The hacker will attempt to fix the PC
, but your paper will be lost. It was mixed up on the file server with some 
files from the Department of Alchemy. The hacker will suggest, "Maybe they 
could help you down there." Look at the hacker and notice the keyring. Ask 
the hacker about the keys and he'll show you one you haven't noticed -- a 
Master Key. Ask him about it and he'll say, "It'll open three out of five 
doors at Tech." Then he'll complain of hunger. That's your cue. Go to the 
kitchen and get the Chinese food from the refrigerator. The hacker won't like 
it cold so heat it in the microwave oven for about two minutes on "HI." In 
case you have problems controlling the microwave, set the timer to 200, press 
HI, then press START. Give the food to the hacker in exchange for his master 
key. A NOTE ABOUT GETTING TIRED. When and where you start getting tired will
vary depending upon the number of moves you've made. For that reason, I could 
not determine when or where to tell you what to do about it. Thus, this note: 
When you get tired, drink from the bottle of Coke which you will find in the 
refrigerator in the kitchen. Go south twice to the elevator. Enter the ele-
vator, open the panel, and take the flashlight.  Go down to the Basement then 
east to the Temporary Basement. Take the gloves and crowbar then go up to the 
Temporary Lab. Take the flask and return to the Basement then go west twice 
to the Aero Basement. Get on the forklift and drive east until you reach Dead 
Storage. Use the forklift to move the junk until you've cleared a path to An-
cient Storage. In Ancient Storage, open the manhole with the crowbar and go 
down to the Brick Tunnel. Go north and down to the Altar. Take the knife, o-
pen the iron plate, and look in the pit. Now you know what has been done with
the missing students! Return to the Brick Tunnel and go south. Try to open
the trap door (this will be useful later). Return to the Basement then go 
west, west, and up to the Aero Lab. Now go south to the Infinite Corridor. 
(NOTE: If the maintenance man should block your path while you are in the In-
finite Corridor, simply wait for him to move on. Waiting will work until you 
have reached the end of the Infinite Corridor.) Take the plastic container 
and go east in the corridor until you reach the stairs. Go up to the Great 
Dome, wear the gloves and climb rope. (It's not really a rope but climb it 
anyway.) On the Catwalk, open the small metal door and exit north to the Roof 
of the Great Dome. Climb up to the top of the dome, remove the plug and take 
the paper -- it's a suicide note. Go back inside the Great Dome. Take the 
ladder and put it on the Catwalk. Go down the ladder and return to the Infi-
nite Corridor. Go east to the glass fronted cabinet, break glass, and take 
the axe. Go west to the wall socket where the waxer cord is plugged in and 
cut the cord with the axe. When the maintenance man starts toward you, open 
the plastic container and pour the liquid on the floor. Go east to the end 
of the corridor then north to Fruits & Nuts. Go down to the Cluttered Passage 
and southeast to the Brown Basement. Take the rubber boots and wear them. Go 
up to the Brown Building then up to the Top Floor. Read the sign over the 
door then unlock it with the master key. Exit the door (north) to reach the 
Skyscraper Roof. Go up to the Semi-Transparent Dome, look in the tub, and 
take the hand.  I had a little trouble concerning the hand and the winged 
creature.  It appears the creature always takes the hand away if you're hol-
ding it when he enters the dome. My solution was to put the hand in the plas-
tic container before the creature entered the dome. When the winged creature 
enters the dome, he will block your exit. Throw the stone at creature, re-
trieve it and go down. The creature will be waiting for you at the bottom, so 
throw the stone at him again. Both the stone and the creature will go off the 
south end of the building. Go east, down, then south to the Courtyard and get 
the stone. Go north, down, northwest, and up to Fruits & Nuts. Then go south 
until you reach the Department of Alchemy. The door to the Department of Al-
chemy is locked and the master key will not unlock it. Knock on the door and 
wait. The professor will open the door and usher you into the room. Read the 
sign-up sheet, show the suicide note to the professor, then go south. Oops! 
You're in a pentagram. Wait until the professor has entered another pentagram 
and has begun his ritual. Cut the line with the knife and exit the pentagram. 
Move the lab bench, open the trap door, and go down. If you time your moves 
just right, the mist will grab the professor just as you go through the trap 
door. Wait a turn below the trap door then re-enter the lab through it. Put 
the dead hand in the vat and it comes to life! Take the hand. You can put the 
professor's ring on the hand if you wish; it fits nicely. Look for an urchin 
slouching somewhere. I found one in the Computer Center. Show the living hand 
to the urchin and take the bolt cutter which the urchin will drop. Return to 
the Basement, go west twice to the Stairway and down to the Sub-Basement. Now 
go northwest to the Tomb and read the graffiti. Unlock the padlock with mas-
ter key, and take the padlock. Open the hatch and go down. You hear rats! Go 
east and open the pressure release valve with the crowbar. Timing is impor-
tant here for your objective is to scald the rats. When you see them, open 
the valve. Examine the dead rat; it has a strange symbol branded on its neck.
Close the valve and go east until you reach the brick wall. Move the loose
brick with the crowbar and look in the hole. Use the crowbar to move the se-
cond brick and you will have made a hole in the brick wall through which you 
can see a reinforcing rod and a small room containing some machinery. Think 
about the levels of the building and try to place where you are now in rela-
tion to what's above you. You must be somewhere near the elevator. Go back to 
the Basement and send the elevator to the first floor. Then open the elevator 
doors in the Basement. Wedge the doors open with the crowbar and go down the 
elevator shaft to the Concrete Box. Take the chain and put the chain on the 
reinforcing rod. Put the padlock on the chain and go back up. Put the chain 
on the hook, remove the crowbar and the elevator will start moving. You'll 
hear a tearing, rending sound, then a rumbling crash. Open the elevator doors 
again, wedge them open with the crowbar, and go down to the Concrete Box. The 
brick wall will have an enormous hole ripped in it. This is the opening you 
need for those objects which will not fit through the opening to the Tomb.
You'll need the bolt cutter, the flask, the axe, the stone, the flashlight,
the master key, the boots, the gloves, and the hand for the puzzles that fol-
low. From the hole in the brick wall, go north then west until you reach the
Tunnel Entrance then go down to the Muddy Tunnel. From the Muddy Tunnel, go
down to the Large Chamber and look at the slots; a wire goes to each. Cut the 
wire with bolt cutter. Go down to the Wet Tunnel, the hand will start poin-
ting the way so go as the hand directs but watch out for the curtain of slime
. When you find it, open the flask and pour the liquid on the curtain. A woo-
den door will be revealed. Unlock the door with the master key and enter the 
Inner Lair. Reach in the pool and take the line. Cut the line with the axe 
and take the line again. Open the box, unplug the coaxial cable, and put the 
line in the socket. The huge mass will change shape. Wait until it becomes a 
winged creature with its mouth open and the stone has turned red. Throw the 
stone at the creature then take the stone again. The hacker will ask, "Can I 
have my key back?"

@endnode

@node ma "Maniac Mansion"
@next mi
@prev lur


                              Maniac Mansion

I used  characters Dave, Syd, and Razor since I found out you need someone
with musical talent. Dave did all the moves and carried all the inventory
in my game except where noted.

1)  Go to front of mansion. Pickup left bushes, door mat, and key.
2)  Unlock front door and enter. Open far right door and enter.
3)  Open far right door again and enter. (notice key in Chandelier)
4)  Turn on lamp and go far right to loose panel. Pull panel.
5)  Pickup cassette tape and exit both rooms.
6)  Push right gargoyle while another player goes to basement.
7)  Turn on light, pickup silver key and exit basement for now.
8)  Enter door by grandfather clock and pickup flashlight.
9)  Open refrigerator and pick up old batteries and can of pepsi.
10) Go thru dining room to storage room. Pickup jar & fruit drink.
11) Unlock door with silver key and enter to swimming pool area.
12) Fill jar in pool and return to main entrance.
13) Position someone by mail box to wait for package.
14) Save game under " a ".
15) Go upstairs and enter room on left. Pickup wax fruit and
    paint remover. Exit room.
16) Use key pad and enter correct codes. Enter security door.
17) Go upstairs on right and give wax fruit then fruit drink to
    green tentacle.
18) Go upstairs on left and enter the first door on the left.
19) Pickup dime and walk to ladder by bed. Climb ladder to room.
20) Pick up record and key on right wall. Exit to hallway.
21) Go to 4th room on right and use hunk-a-matic machine. Exit
22) Save game under " B " and continue.
23) When  doorbell rings, switch to mailbox and pickup stamps on package (
    Don't pickup package ).  Return to person on top floor.
24) While  Ed  is  out of his room, you must enter the room and pickup the
    hamster, the card key, open the bank and pickup at least one dime.  You 
    have to be quick or he will catch you.  Keep reloading game " B " until 
    you get it.  When you do it, save game.
25) Enter far right door and use jar on man-eater and paint remover on
    blotch on wall.
26) Return to 2nd floor and enter codes for security door.  Enter.
27) Go to door on right and enter the room where the piano is.
28) Use cassette in player, use record in Victrola.  Turn on cassette and
    Victrola.  Turn off cassette and pickup tape.  Exit
29) Go downstairs to room on right.  Open cabinet door, use cassette in
    player.  Turn  on player.  Pickup old rusty key ( This key will get you 
    out of dungeon ).  Pickup cassette tape and exit.
30) Go upstairs to piano room with someone who can play it.  Use cassette in
    record.  Turn on recorder and play piano.  Turn on TV and watch.  Pickup
    cassette and exit room.
31) Go to room where green tentacle is and give tape.  Pickup demo tape and
    exit rooms.
32) Bring another member to top floor and give them both dimes.
33) Have  them enter room with man-eater and switch to Dave.  Position Dave
    by door to right of Radio room on top floor.  Save game under " C " and
    continue.
34) Enter room of old lady and quickly go up ladder to the right.
35) Turn on light and pull picture in front of safe.
36) Switch to person in man-eater room and walk to hatch.  Use dime in coin
    slot.  Push  right  button.  Use second dime in coin slot and push right
    button again.  Use telescope and read safe combin.
37) Switch to safe room and open safe.  Pickup envelope but don't open it
    yet.  You will be caught when leaving.  Just use old rusty key to get out 
    of dungeon.
38) Exit telescope room and man-eater room.  Use hunk-a-matic if you have
    not used it yet before leaving this floor.  Return to main floor to meet
    Dave.
39) Send one strong person with yellow key to garage door behind the pool
    area.   Open door, open trunk, pickup tool box.  Go to pool.  If power 
    goes out, wait 5-6 minutes for it to come back on.
40) Switch to another strong person and go to grating outside by porch.
    Open grating and enter.  Go to water valve at right.  Turn on water.
41) Switch to pool and enter.  Pickup glowing key and radio.  Exit.
42) Switch to valve and turn off water. Exit to kitchen.
43) Switch to pool and have him return to kitchen.  Give items to Dave.
44) Fill jar with water from faucet.  Use envelope and jar in microwave.
    Turn on microwave.  Remove envelope and jar when cool.  Open envelope and
    save game under " D " and continue.
45) Take envelope to man-eater room and use with typewriter.  You will need
    tools and flashlight with good batteries with you.
46) Open room to right and enter room above.  Turn on lights and walk to open 
    wires on left.  Put good batteries from radio in flashlight and wait.
47) Switch  to  another  person  and send them to breakers in the basement.
    Open fuse box and save game under " E ".
48) Turn off breakers and switch back to person in wire room.
49) Turn on flashlight and fix wires with tools.  Turn off flashlight and
    switch back to basement.
50) Turn on breakers and return both members to main lobby.
51) Use stamps on envelope, put demo tape in envelope and put envelope in
    mail box.  Lift flag and leave some there at mail box.
52) After Dr.Fred plays video game, go to room where video games are (second  
    floor far right door ) Enter room and walk to Meteor Mess machine.
    Use quarter in coin slot.  Write down high scores.
53) Return to front door and wait for doorbell to ring.  Go to mail and open.  
    Pickup contract and return to house.  Save game F
54) Give contract to green tentacle in large speaker room.
55) Go to basement and open door with old rusty key.  Open Padlocks with
    glowing key.  Open inner door with numbers from video game machine.  Save
    game under " G ".  Last save game.
56) Enter lab and walk to right.  Open door and enter.  Walk to cabinet at
    right.  Open cabinet and pickup suit.  Use card key on door and enter.  
    Turn off switch and pickup meteor at right.  Open door and enter to ga-
    rage.
57) Use meteor in trunk.  Use yellow key in weird edsel....

@endnode

@node mi "Mindshadow"
@next pl
@prev ma

  
                                Mindshadow

 
Well, here we are again, all set for another adventure, but without any el-
fin swords or magic lamps. You awake on a deserted island suffering from am-
nesia. Your mission, if you accept, is to save yourself and to regain your 
memory. There are a few tricky puzzles to solve and saving the game at va-
rious spots is recommended. Also, as in other adventure games, it is a good 
idea to map your surroundings. The graphics are adequate and the parser, al-
though not as good as Infocom's, does work. Remember to examine and search 
everything you find in your journey. There are two unique commands built into 
this game. The most critical function is the "THINK" command. When a clue is 
found, type in the word THINK (followed by the clue that you found) and hope 
for the best. If you haven't thought enough you'll never solve the game. The 
other command is the "HELP CONDOR" function. The game has a help list built
into the program that you can call on if you need a push in the right direc-
tion. The only problem is that it can be called up only three times during 
the game. After that you are on your own. Let's get started. You awake on a 
deserted beach with a spectacular view of the ocean. In fact, look at the 
ocean but but don't go in the water. Go N, then enter the hut and take some 
straw. Examine the trash can and take the candle. Well, you don't really need 
it. Exit the hut then go E. Take a piece of steel from the dory, then go E 
again and take a vine. Go W, W, S, and drop all but the vine. Go E, and you 
should be at the edge of a cliff. Tie the vine to a rock then go Down. Enter 
the cave and examine and search all, then take a rock from the ground. Dig in 
ground. Take the map, then E, Up, W. Look at the map, then N. At this point, 
you might want to save the game. Go N, N, E, N, E, E, S, S, E. Search the 
trunk and take the bottle, but don't drink it. Go W, W, N, W, W, S, W, S, S, 
S. Drop the map, then take the piece of steel and the shell. Listen to the 
shell. Type, "BANG ROCK WITH STEEL OVER STRAW TO MAKE FIRE". Drop the rock 
and the piece of steel, then wait. When the boat comes, offer the captain the 
bottle. You should now be on the pirate ship and the captain will have left 
you alone to go exploring. Go N, W, and talk to the doctor. Go S, then fight 
with the man. Go S again and take the meat cleaver. You can also eat the fish 
if you like sashimi. Go N, N, E, S, S, S, W, then cut the chain with the meat 
cleaver. Go E, N, N, E, E. You should now be in England. Go E, E, E, S, and 
search the sleeping man. Take the hat and the money, then go N, W, W, S. Give 
the man 5 pounds and take the pole. Go N, W, and get the debris with the pole
. Drop the pole, then take the newspaper. Read it. Remember to remember. Go 
E, N, and talk to the man. Give the man 5 pounds and remember the password 
(it may vary with different disks). Go S, E, N, E. This is another good spot 
to save the game. Talk to the woman, then give her the hat. Go E. Examine
the drink, then follow the man. Go S, W, then take the hat and look inside 
the hat. Rather then leave a tip, you can kiss the woman. Go W, N, E, then 
type, "CHANDRALT" or whatever the password is in your game. Give the man 200
pounds for your ticket then go W, S, S, W, N, N, and enter the airplane. Re-
member to remember. You should now be in beautiful downtown Luxembourg. Go N,
W, then BOOTH 11. Talk to the man. If that doesn't work, search the man. Take 
the note and the ID card, then read both of them. Go E, E, N, N, W, Up, N. 
This is another spot to save the game. Go W, then DUCK. Examine the room and 
take all. Read the parchment. Go E, S, Down, E, S, and now we are going on a
little nature hike. Go E, E, E, S, and dig in the ground with the shell. Drop 
the shell, then take the leaflet and read it. It sure does look like a bank 
account number. Go N, W, W, W, W, and talk to the woman. Type in the bank
number then open the box. Take the gun, then drop the box. Go E, N, W, Up, N, 
N, N, N. This is it. Save the game again, then E. Shoot the man with the gun, 
then take themessage and read it. Now, if you have remembered all the names 
and found all the clues, you should regain your memory and solve the game by 
using the THINK COMMAND. Type "THINK ARCMAN". "THINK BOB". "THINK MASTERS".
"THINK JARED". "THINK TYCOON". "THINK LUXEMBOURG". "THINK WILLIAM". At this 
point, a new screen should appear with the entire story of your trials and 
tribulations.

@endnode

@node pl "Planetfall"
@next se
@prev mi


                                Planetfall


You start on board the Feinstein. If an alien appears and gives you a paper, 
just throw it away as its just Infocom's little trademark (tm) now, just wait 
[keep waiting until the shop blows up] Now, go "w" into the pod get in web-
bing, wait [keep 'waiting' until you land on the planet], get out, get kit, 
open door, exit pod, swim up, u,u,u. You should now be in the courtyard. You 
might want to save the game here, in case you goof hereafter. Next go: n, ne, 
e, e, e [down the long hall], s, s, s, se, turn on robot [nothing will happen 
at first, but he'll join you soon], w, w, drop brush and id card, get bar, ne
, n, n, n, n, hold bar over crevice, drop bar, s, open kit, drop kit, w, w, 
unlock padlock with key, remove padlock, drop key and padlock, open door, n, 
get ladder, s,e,e,n,n, drop ladder, open ladder, put ladder over rift, n, w, 
w, open desk, get shuttle card, e, open desk, get kitchen card and upper card
, e,s,s,s,e, push blue button, w, eat brown goo, s, s, s, sw, get flask, e, 
put flask under spout, push red button, get flask, n, n, n, n, e, n. You 
should now be in the upper elevator where you need to: 'slide upper card 
through slot', 'push up button'. Now, keep waiting (or do anything to use up 
moves. i like using 'l' continuously) until the elevator door opens up. Then: 
s,ne, pour liquid in hole, sw,n, slide upper card through slot, push down 
button, ('wait' until door opens),s,w,s,s,s,s, put flask under spout,press 
green button, get flask, n,n,n, n,e,n, slide upper card through slot, push up 
button,(wait until door opens), s,ne, pour liquid in hole, sw,n, slide upper 
card through slot, push down button,(wait until door opens), s,w,s, s,s,s, 
put flask under spout, push gray button, get flask, n,n,n,n,e,n, slide upper 
card through slot, push up button, (wait...),s,ne, pour liquid inhole, drop
flask. O.K., the comm system is repaired. You are probably very tired by now,
so let's get to bed!...Try: sw,n, slide upper card through slot, push down
button, (wait...), s,w,w,n, get in bed, sleep (you may need to wait a move
or two). now, in my early version, there's a bug that takes all of the items 
that you aren't wearing and puts them in the room outside your bed. They also
aren't visible unless you 'look' or go out of the room and re-enter. If you
find you're missing your access cards, they are right there in the room next
to the bunk. O.K., now on to the other complex!!! (you might want to save the 
game again!) Get up, (look and get your cards if you need to), s,w,s, get 
canteen, open canteen, slide kitchen card through slot, drop kitchen card, s, 
put canteen in niche, push button, get canteen, n,n,e,e,s,e, get bedistor, w,
s, s, sw, get laser and pliers, ne, n, n, n, eat red goo, e, n. Now, the next 
thing you need is the lower elevator access card. Floyd has it, but the only 
way to get it from him is to be in the upper elevator with him and keep sa-
ying 'slide upper card through slot'. Eventually, he will show you his card, 
at which point you should 'get lower card'. Then you should: s, push red but-
ton, drop upper card, (wait until the elevator opens), s, slide lower card 
through slot, push down button, drop lower card, (wait until door opens), n,
e, s, e. You should now be in the shuttle. Alfie control east, to be exact.
This little honey will take you to the Lawanda complex on the other island.
the shuttle controls are very simple. The lever continually accelerates the
shuttle when in the up position. It maintains current speed when in the mid-
dle position and decelerates the shuttle when in the down position. To acti-
vate the controls, input:slide shuttle card through slot, drop shuttle card, 
push lever up. O.K. now, keep hitting 'l' and you'll notice your speed in-
creasing each time in increments of 5. Keep hitting 'l' until your speed hits 
55 mph. (never mind the sign you see). Then, 'pull lever down'. It will now 
be in the middle position and you will be steady at 55 mph. Soon you will see 
a sign marking the halfway point. When you see it, hit 'l' one more time,
then input 'pull lever down'. The shuttle will decelerate (ignore the speed
limit signs) and should stop right when you've entered the lawanda station!
(this is another good time to save the game!) O.K., now to finish fixing the 
rest of the systems and finish the game. Note >>> sometime between now and 
the end of the game (depending upon how long it took floyd to give you the 
lower card), you will get hungry. When you do, just 'drink liquid' and dis-
card the canteen. O.K., from Alfie Control east go: w,n,u,u,ne,n, tell Floyd 
to go north, tell Floyd to get shiny board, s,e,n, open panel, remove second 
board, insert shiny board in panel, drop fried board. o.k., the planetary de-
fenses are repaired! Next: s,e,n, open lid, remove fused bedistor with pliers
, insert good bedistor in cube, drop fused bedistor and pliers. Course con-
trol is fixed! Now go: s,s,s,s. You should now be in the computer room. You 
must now wait until Floyd enters and notices that the computer is busted. 
Then: ne, open bio-lock door, se, e, look in window . Floyd should now be 
with you and the brave little soul will see the miniaturization card in the 
lab and will volunteer to get it. You next should: open door, close door, l, 
open door, close door,(dear little floyd will perish), get miniaturization 
card, w, open door, w, s, remove old battery, drop old battery, insert new 
battery in laser, n, sw, s, slide miniaturization card through slot, type 384
, set dial to 1, e, n, n, shoot boulder with laser, [> in this description u 
need to 'throw laser into void'. The beast will follow after it. next: s, w, 
(you will find yourself in an auxilary booth), n, open desk, wear mask, push 
red button, open door, w, open lab door, w, w, open door, w, sw, w, s, push 
button. All you have to do is wait for the door to open, then go north and 
the rest takes care of itself!!!!

@endnode

@node se "Seastalker"
@next sec
@prev pl

                   
                                Seastalker

get mike. turn on mike. turn on video. turn knob. tell me about problem. tell 
me about monster. goodbye. drop mike. east (twice). examine panel. pull brea-
ker. west. south (twice). west. get capsule. north. south. get magazine. in-
sert capsule in reactor. close reactor. close hatch. fill tank. open magazine
turn on reactor. turn on engine. open gate. open throttle. east. down. east
open throttle. wait 5 turns. north (twice). east (twice). north. wait 4 turns. 
east. wait 5 turns. north. wait 6 turns. east. close throttle. turn on auto-
pilot. wait. open throttle. wait 50 turns. close throttle. turn search light 
to starboard. turn search light to port. push test button. open throttle.
wait 3 turns. turn on sonarphone. goodbye. wait. open throttle. get gear. o-
pen hatch. exit. north (twice). ask bly about problem. north. examine system.
ask tip for tool. open door with tool. get relay. screw relay back in. close 
door. south. ask bly about problem. tell me about evidence. open box with 
tool. examine box. ask bly about crew. read article. yes (six times). show 
article to doc. yes. no. yes. no. south. no. ask tip about grid. yes (twice).
south. east. install gun on scimitar. east. south. get survival unit. north.
west. give survival unit to bill. tell bill to install unit on scimitar. wait.
south (three times). push test button. examine unit. get hypo. open hatch. 
exit. north (twice). give hypo to doc. yes. south. wait 2 turns. get hypo 
from doc. show hypo to bill. look (four times). turn off electricity. turn on 
electricity. west (three times). south (three times). fill tank. push test 
button. turn on engine. open gate. open throttle. south. open throttle. wait.
east. wait. yes (twice). no. yes. turn on sonarphone. north (twice). close 
throttle. wait (four times). look. aim bazooka at sea cat. fire bazooka. yes.

@endnode

@node sec "Secret of the Silver Blades"
@next sev
@prev se

   
                      The Secret of the Silver Blades


                   BUGS, HINTS, AND GENERAL INFORMATION

 THE SECRET OF THE SILVER BLADES is semi-linear. There are certain objects
that need to be found before you can proceed to the next part of the game,but
most of the missions in the game can be done in any order. There is a
preferred order though,since the battles get progressively tougher as you get
closer to the end. The walkthru will indicate the order for those missions
where the proper sequence is necessary.

 The game has a built-in hint book. If you feed 100 gems to the Well of
Knowledge,you will get a hint and outright answers in some cases. Information
that you can get from the Well is not duplicated in this walkthru except for a
few cases where the Well is vague.

 There are two basic types of mazes in this game: _huge_ and the more normal
16x16 mazes. The map coordinates are always shown in this game, but in the
huge mazes, sometimes the map coordinates are wrong. The error is usually in
the "X" coordinate. Whenever possible, both the correct and incorrect values
are given in this walkthru. Because of this bug, you may find the coordinates
in the walkthru do not match those in your game.

 Be aware that some ranged spells are Touch range spells when cast from a
scroll,but operate normally when cast from memory. The ones that are known to
be Touch range when cast from a scroll are the Slay Living, Disintegrate, and
Death spells. There are undoubtedly others.

 There are several new monsters of note. The worst is the iron golem. These
are immune to most magic. Magic missile and fireball will actually heal them.
Lightning will slow them down. The only way to fight them is to first use
lightning to slow them down, then hack them to pieces. Only magic weapons +3
or better will harm the golems.

 The Remorhaz automatically kill your characters if they succeed in an attack.
Fortunately, they have poor THAC0 values and can usually be killed before they
can strike.

Purple Worms also do something to your characters when they make a successful
hit, but all my characters have been fortunate enough to be unaffected when
hit.

 Umber Hulks have a gaze that is equivalent to a Confusion spell.Dispel Magic
will restore your characters.

                               NEW VERDIGRIS

 You start the game in the house of the Mayor of New Verdigris. Your first
mission is to free the Well of Knowledge from whatever has captured it. There
is a teleporter (3,0) in the Mayor's house that will take you directly to the
Well maze.

 The first order of business is to explore the town of New Verdigris.You need
to locate the important places, such as the armory, vault (the vault is a file
VAULT.DAT in the save directory), training hall, magic shop, bar, and temple.
Locating these places is left as a mapping exercise for the player. The exit
from town is at (15,8). It leads to the ruins of old Verdigris. In addition,
one of the private residences (3,9) has an old man who will give you a Scroll
of Protection from Dragon's Breath. You may need it for the last Well battle.

 Buy mirrors for everyone.You will need them for the basilisks and medusae in
this game. The Cute Yellow Canary does what you expect it to do in the mines,
but it is really useless. If you follow the walkthru you will not need it. If
you want to explore the mines fully, you will have to pass through the poison
air pockets and take the hits anyway.


                      THE SECRET OF THE SILVER BLADES
                                  Part 2

                                 THE WELL

 The map of the Well area on page 2 of the Journal is correct. There are two
errors in the map which may be corrected in your edition of the Journal.There
is a north/south corridor to the northwest of the Well that is shown as being
six squares long; it is actually five squares long. There is also a door that
is missing in one of the western rooms. What looks like a dead end is not.The
Well is shown as part of the Old Verdigris ruins. There is a 16x16 blank spot
in the ruins that corresponds to the Well maze, but the Well is actually a
separate maze with its own map coordinates.

 There are three battles that you have to fight to free the Well. Each battle
is triggered as you step into each ring of the Well, and each gets
progressively more difficult. Save the scroll you got from the old man until
the last Well battle, and have the character with the lowest hit points use
it.You face an increasing number of bigger dragons with each battle. The last
one is with a really -big- dragon. You can rest any place in the Well after
you have freed it.

 Once you free the Well, explore every square of it. With a few exceptions
that are noted in the walkthru, all the teleporters connect to the Well. You
have to step into the squares that are in the Well-end of each gate to
activate the other end of the gates (when you eventually find them). These
gates are very useful for getting back to town for training. They also come in
handy for resupplying when you are clearing some mazes that are far from town.

 Another reason for exploring the Well area is you will find the true nature
of the owner of the Magic Shop. You will find a battle between Bane clerics
and the Black Circle. The best action is to duck and wait out the battle. You
will have to fight the survivors, but you will also face a smaller force. Try
visiting the square at (4,14).

 Afterwards, it should be clear the Black Circle is Evil. When you return to
town, it's time to have a long talk with Marcus, the owner of the Magic Shop.
Explore the Magic Shop and expect a fight in every room.You can expect random
attacks by Fire Knives until you clear the Magic Shop. Once you get rid of
Marcus, the prices in the Magic Shop will drop drastically. The shop will
continue to operate until you have defeated the Dreadlord. Then, it closes up
tight. Towards the end when you have lots of money,stock up on wands of magic
missiles and +1 arrows, and store them in the town vault if you wish to
continue playing.

                          RUINS OF OLD VERDIGRIS

 At this point, you can start exploring and mapping the old Verdigris ruins.
The maze is about 85x60 and needs to be carefully mapped. Be aware that this
is one of the huge mazes where the map coordinates are not always correctly
shown. There are two sub-mazes in this maze: The Well is one, and the old
administration building is the other. Exiting these sub-mazes into the main
ruins maze is usually when the map coordinates become incorrect.

 The first item you need to complete the game is an Amulet of Eldamar.Journal
entry 1 is the map to the amulet. You get the Journal entry from the Well.The
Well will hint as to the location of another dragon hoard. It's not required
that you find this hoard, but if you want the experience points and loot it
offers,it's at location 11,0. Additionally,there are two other optional fixed
encounters with Bane clerics in the maze that will yield useful loot. They
appear to be triggered if you step into any one of several different
locations. The first square of the set you step into will trigger the
encounter. Each encounter appears to have a different set of trigger
locations. To trigger these encounters try leaving the Well by the northwest
door and explore north. Try stepping into locations (56,29) and (59,22).

 Other than the amulet, there is nothing vital in the maze. It's only
necessary to explore it to locate certain places you will need to go to later:
the old administration building and the mine shaft. There are two mine shafts
in the ruins. Only the one shown on the map in the Journal works;the other is
abandoned and there only to confuse you.

          OLD ADMINISTRATION BUILDING (BLACK CIRCLE HEADQUARTERS)

 The Black Circle Headquarters is in the old administration building.There is a
16x16 blank spot in the ruins that corresponds to the building, but the
building is really a separate maze.Journal entry 38 shows the location of the
building. You can get the Journal entry from the Well, or you can find it
yourself by exploring the ruins.

 Clearing the Black Circle Headquarters requires that you explore every room.
The important locations in this area are the room at 10,5 and the Inner
Sanctum at 14,14.Both places have teleporters back to the Well if you need to
get more supplies, dispose of loot, or get training.

 There is a secret doorway at 8,4 that you have to look for. You will
encounter the clerk from Phlan in the building. Be nice to her. If you played
POOL OF RADIANCE, you will appreciate finding out that her name is Sasha.
After you clear out the Black Circle Headquarters, wander over to location
(54,52) of the ruins or thereabouts. You will get the first of many
opportunities to rescue the clerk. Leaving the administration building back
into the ruins will almost certainly cause the map coordinates to be wrong;be
careful.

 At this point, you have done all that is needed in the ruins. You can finish
mapping the ruins, or you can get on with the game. The next step is to
descend into the mines.


                      THE SECRET OF THE SILVER BLADES
                                  Part 3

                                 THE MINES

 You can descend into the mines at any time, but it is better if you wait
until you have finished the ruins first. The battles become tougher in the
mines, and the experience points you get in the ruins are useful for gaining
character levels. At first,you can only go to the Temple level. The Temple of
Tyr is to the south. There is nothing else of any interest on that level. You
will have to fight to get into the temple.

 Derf Strongarm is at 14,2. There is a teleporter back to the Well at 2,15.
Explore the rooms in the west side of the Temple. There is loot and
information to be found there. Once you have learned the secret of the Silver
Blades and the Dreadlord from Derf,you can descend into the rest of the mines
to retrieve the parts of Oswulf's staff. You need the staff before you can
proceed to the next stage of the game.

 The mine mazes are large but simple. It is only necessary to note the
coordinates of the intersections, and which directions the shafts branch off
at each intersection.

 The Well will tell you in which direction to proceed at each level to find
the staff, but if you want explicit directions, read on. All coordinates are
approximate since several of the intersections are several squares in size.
All directions start off from the mine shaft at (50,50). There appears to be
no coordinate problems in the mines.

 Level 1: Go west to the intersection at (35,49).Go north to the intersection
at (38,44). Go west to the intersection at (18,41). Go north. Level 1 has
useful loot, so it is worthwhile to explore that level.

 Level 2: Go west to the intersection at (35,51).Go north to the intersection
at (29,46). Go north. There is useful loot on this level, too.

 Level 3: Go north to the intersection at (50,39).Go east to the intersection
at (69,37). Go east. This is the last level where useful loot can be found.
What you find below this level is mainly gems. Gems are useful for the Well
and for buying things from the Magic Shop, but there are no more useful
weapons and armor. Encounters with Umbers in the mines at all levels will
yield weapons, scrolls, and armor.

 Level 4: Go south to the intersection at (54,58).Go west to the intersection
at (54,66). Go east.

 Level 5: Go north to the intersection at (45,44).Go west to the intersection
at (23,38). Go north.

 Level 6: Go west and continue going west at every intersection. You will
encounter giant snakes on this level; have Neutralize Poison spells ready,and
make sure the cleric who has that spell is in the rear. (NOTE: It's a good
idea to have a Neutralize Poison spell ready at all times in this game!)

 You will find Vala on this level. She is a worthwhile addition to your party.
There are several situations where you will find monsters immune to magic. In
those cases, what you need is lots of fighters: Vala is a good fighter.

 Level 7: Go south and continue going south until you reach the intersection
at (56,71). The staff is to the west. There is loot to the east,and you might
want to pick it up on the way back since it's fairly close.

 Level 8: Go south to the intersection at (50,62). Go west then, go south,and
keep doing so. The malfunctioning teleporter on this level is initially the
only way to the 9th level. To get to it, go north to the intersection at
(52,45). Go west to the intersection at (43,43). Go west.

 Level 9: The teleporter on level 8 should place you in a room at (58,30). (It
did the two times I played the game, but the Well hints the teleporter is
random.) If you are teleported to another room, you're on your own. If you do
wind up at (58,30), it's a straight shot to the mine shaft at (50,50).

 You will find guards just before the mine shaft. Kill them and you destroy
the barrier. This enables you to use the mine shaft all the way down to Level
10, or "B" (for basement?) as it is given in the menu. There are guard
stations in all directions from the mine shaft if you want to take them out.
All but the ones in the south are close to the mine shaft, and it's real easy
to run into them. The southern guards are found by going south, west, then
south again until you find them.

 Level 10: This is the entrance to the castle dungeons. Go east and continue
going east until you reach the intersection at (80,50). Then go south.


                      THE SECRET OF THE SILVER BLADES
                                  Part 4

                              CASTLE DUNGEONS

 There are three mazes in the castle dungeons. There is also a Black Circle
compound attached to the dungeon. Each dungeon maze has several levels.To get
to the next level you will have to either answer a riddle, or fight the
guards. You get experience points in either case, and answering the riddle is
much easier than fighting. If you fail to answer the riddle, you are
automatically teleported to the Well, who will give you the answer for 100
gems. Once you get the answer, you automatically answer the riddle the second
time you approach the stairs.

Any sphinxes found in the dungeon will give useful information if you talk to
them or rescue them.

                              DUNGEON MAZE 1

 The important locations are: (3,6) a gate back to the Well; (8,11) another
gate back to the Well; (11,0) stairs; (12,0) stairs (this one leads to the
next dungeon maze); (15,7) if you go east from the stairwell, you will enter
the Black Circle compound; (12,15) brass key (needed to complete the game).

                           BLACK CIRCLE COMPOUND

 This mission is totally optional. You will meet Sir Deric as you enter the
compound. He has just escaped from the Black Circle and is looking for his
companions. Your mission (if you should accept it) is to help him rescue his
companions. Sir Deric has only a mundane sword and is badly wounded. You will
need a spare set of weapons and armor for him. Basically,almost every room in
this maze contains battles. You do not have to fight them all if you do not
wish to.

 Important locations are: (11,8) and (11,9) you can rest here; (14,14) the
first of Sir Deric's companions is found here(he will give you an amulet that
will enable you to find the other companion); (7,8) once you have the amulet,
go back to this location (the amulet will show you the locations of various
secret doors; the rooms in the section behind the secret doors have lots of
good loot; there also several places to rest;the game will tell where you can
rest); (2,8) the entrance to where Sir Deric's other companion is being held
(Sir Deric leaves your party once this companion is rescued); (1,4) another
secret room to loot (there is a subtle game hint that this room exists when
Sir Deric leaves your party).

 DUNGEON MAZE 2

 The important locations are: (3,9) stairs; (8,15) stairs; (7,10) stairs;
(13,9) stairs to next dungeon maze; (6,3) gate back to Well (if you cleared
the compound, you will probably want to return to town at this point to
dispose of all your loot); (1,8) silver key (needed to complete the game).

 DUNGEON MAZE 3

 The important locations are: (10,6) a prisoner you can rescue (he will give
the location of his treasure cache);(12,6) the prisoner's cache (the password
is NACACIA); (12,7) a teleporter to (1,3) (there's lots of loot and a big
fight at (1,3); there is also a teleporter back to the Well at (1,3));(12,13)
blocked stairs to the castle proper (this stair will open once you reach the
castle;you will have to use the roundabout way through the crevasses first to
get into the castle); (2,15) exit to the crevasses;(9,13) gold key (needed to
complete the game).

 CREVASSES

 The ice crevasses are huge but simple. This is also another maze where the
map coordinates can be wrong if you leave the maze and come back. The required
mission is to find the Frost Giants' village. The optional mission is to
rescue the Phlan clerk one last time.

 From the dungeon's exit, go east to the intersection at (44,82). Going north
gets you loot, but it is a side trip. Continue east. At intersection (51,82)
continue east. If you go east at (61,62), you encounter the Phlan clerk. If
you go south, you will find the Frost Giants' village.

 If you rescue the clerk, she will suggest you join her to find some treasure.
Agree to this and follow her directions.This will eventually take you back to
the Well. Afterward, you can backtrack to (61,62). On the way back, the only
intersection of any interest is (14,48). Going east will yield loot.

 Assuming you do not want to rescue the clerk, go south. At (99,79) go east.
There is a two-part battle to be fought there before you can proceed.You will
eventually find the entrance to the Frost Giants' village. There is a gate
back to the Well at the entrance.

 FROST GIANTS' VILLAGE

 The village uses the same map coordinates as the crevasses but is really a
separate 16x16 maze. Your one and only mission is to locate the Frost Giant
King and talk with him. Wandering around will only result in lots and lots of
tough fights and very little loot.The big loot comes only from talking to the
king.

 Go due east from the entrance until you reach (58,87). Go south to (58,95).
Go west. Talk to the king.There will be a test of your truthfulness by way of
a two-part battle with the Black Circle and fire giants. The result is a lot
of loot from the king as a reward.

 Once you win the king's trust, you must leave the village. You can leave the
village at the crevasse or castle exit. The crevasse exit might be a good
choice as you have a lot of loot that has to be disposed of. You can return
later and will be automatically passed through the village.

 From the castle exit of the village, go east to the intersection at (26,86).
This may also be shown as (58,85).Go south. From here on, always go east. You
will eventually reach the castle gates. If you chose to go east from (26,86),
you will eventually reach a gate back to the Well.


                      THE SECRET OF THE SILVER BLADES
                                  Part 5

                           CASTLE: FINAL BATTLE

 The are three mazes which correspond to the three levels of the castle.

                              CASTLE LEVEL 1

 The rooms generally contain nothing but big battles. There is a gate back to
the Well at (6,9). There is a teleporter at (9,15) that takes you to stairs
leading to the second level. All rooms are entered by waiting in the alcoves.
There is a secret rotating door in each alcove. Once on the other side of the
alcove, you cannot exit until you find the lever that reverses the rotating
door.

                              CASTLE LEVEL 2

 For the most part, this level contains nothing but battles as well. You can
rest in the secret room at (5,2). The storm giants at (6,1) will parlay and
leave peacefully if you buy their map. The room at (2,2) contains loot, but
you need the amulet in the room at (14,8) to get in.Around (9,4) you will run
into a patrol. The loot from this battle includes the current password
(STEELEYE). Also, no matter what you read, the password is always STEELEYE. If
you explore the southeast section of this level, you will meet Sargatha again.
If you wait, you will be attacked. If you chase her, you will be captured and
will have to fight your way out of the dungeons again. Chasing is not advised.

 The entrance to a maze that leads to the stairs to the third level is at
(4,4). The stairs are at (0,15) and behind a hidden entrance. The corridor
that starts at (9,15) does -not- lead to the hidden entrance.

                              CASTLE LEVEL 3

 This is the level where the three keys you found in the dungeon are used.The
Well will tell you in which order the keys have to be used. Interesting
locations are:

 (12,11) Gate back to the Well.
 (14,12) Gate to (12,15). Lots of loot and a big fight.
 (13,9) Bash your way through this door.
 (14,7) Go on in; it's not that hard a fight.
 (11,2) You do not want to go in this door.
 (8,9) The password is OSWULF.
 (7,1) Golden boy has a girdle of giant strength, plate mail +5, shield +5,
and long sword +5. They should be the last items in the loot list, but double-
check by readying the items to see what they do to your characters'statistics.
 (3,4) Entrance to the Dreadlord's room.
 (1,3) Secret entrance to the Dreadlord's hiding place. This is the last
battle. Have lots of lightning spells or wands of lightning ready for this
battle. The room is filled with golems. There is also a gate back to the Well
here. You might want to teleport to the Temple of Tyr and discover Derf
Strongarm's fate before returning to town. There is a bug in the program that
reincarnates Derf after your visit.

@endnode

@node sev "Severed Heads"
@next sh
@prev sec


                               Severed Heads               


OFFICE: Take needle.Take scalpel. Turn on light. Look desk. Take papers. Read 
papers. Take bottle from cabinet. E. N. Ask Susan about murder. Ask Susan a-
bout Sweezey. Take records. OPERATION: S. E. Look plaque. E. Insert left hand 
in panel. Push 2. W. N. Ask Billows about murder. Ask Billows about Susan. 
Ask Billows about back room. Ask Billows about Sweezey. S. W. W. N. S. Wash 
hands. Look at screen. W. E. N. Ask Billows about Sweezey. VERONICA LAKE: S. 
E. Insert left hand. Push 4. W. W. Take food. Examine Veronica. Give food to 
Veronica. Take jacket. Search jacket. Take card. CAT: E. Insert left Hand. 
Push 3. W. S. Take sheet. Cut sheet with scalpel. Tie sheet. Open freezer. 
Take frozen cat. N. W. W. Put cat on platform. Turn on device. Take drug with 
needle. Inject cat. SECRET ROOM AND PUMP: E. E. E. Insert left hand. Push 2. 
W. N. Put card into slot. N. Open bag. Examine body. Cut body with scalpel. 
Take pump. Examine pump. S. Take card. S. E. Insert left hand. Push 3. W. W. 
N. Ask Susan about pump. S. W. Connect tubules to pump. Connect tubules to 
machine. CHASE TO VERONICA'S: E. S. D. S. E. E. Say Veronica Lake into booth. 
N. N. Examine body. Examine head. Cut Veronicas hand with scalpel. Take se-
vered hand. JACK RICHARDS: S. S. E. S. W. Put severed hand in panel. Push 6. 
E. Examine desk. Take loose papers. Read loose papers. E. D. Search debris. 
Take bracelet. S. S. Tie rope to hatch. D. Examine bodies. Examine hooks. 
Take hook. Swing hook at man.

@endnode

@node sh "Shadowgate"
@next s1
@prev sev


                                Shadowgate


Before opening the door take the key from behind the skull. Now that you're 
inside, take and light one of the unlit torches you see on the wall. Take the 
other one. (As your torches burn out, they warn you by flickering. Light a-
nother one immediately and discard the old one when it burns out.) You will 
see two doors. One to the right (in the pillar) and one up center (a double-
door). Unlock, open, and go through the center door. Discard the key; you won
't need it again. You will see a hallway and an alcove with a book and two 
candles. Open the book. Another key is hidden inside. Take it, and go back 
and use this key to unlock the pillar door. Open the pillar door and go in. 
It's a closet. Take the sword and sling. Discard the key. (You ARE saving 
the game regularly, aren't you, in case you make a mistake or these instruc-
tions are confusing?) Go back to the room with the candles and book. Do NOT 
move the book or the candles. A trapdoor will open under you and send you to 
your death! Take the two torches (ESPECIALLY the one that looks like a flash-
light!) And examine the masonry in this hall. At the back you'll find a loose 
stone. Operate it and it moves away revealing a hole in the wall! Go through 
the hole and you'll be in a room with a ledge. There's a doorway on top of 
the ledge. Ignore it. It's a red herring and can't be entered! A silver arrow 
points to the right. Operate the left torch (click Operate then click the 
torch twice) and a door opens! You can't take these torches. They're secured, 
but take the arrow. Go through the secret door. You see two bridges. Take 
everything from your inventory except your torch. You'll then be able to walk 
across the rope bridge without it collapsing. You'll see a statue of a snake. 
Leave it alone, but remember this room and how you got there. Go back and 
cross the other bridge, but first light the special torch (the one that looks 
like a flashlight). It burns with a green flame! Now, when you meet the Waif 
you can operate the green flame torch on the Waif and give it a banishing 
hotfoot! (If you don't do it quickly enough the Waif will curse you! And I 
don't mean with bad language either!) Take the two torches, the cloak, and 
go through the doorway you see. You'll be in a room with barred windows. 
There is something inside one of the windows, but you'll never find out what. 
There is a rope on the ground, and a sign: EPOR. Click on SPEAK. Click on the 
rope. Type in the word EPOR. (Yes, it IS rope spelled backwards!) The rope 
should rise and provide you egress through the ceiling, but don't go there 
yet. First take the scroll from the shelf. Leave the bottles. If you examine 
the room, you'll find another loose rock towards the back. Operate it, and 
another hole appears. We'll come back and go through it later. We need to 
gather a few things from some other rooms first. You can either go back the 
way you came or go up the rope. Let's go up the rope. Click on the top exit. 
You'll be in a mirrored room with an exit down the rope and another exit. 
Take the other exit. You'll be in a hall of coffins. Might as well open the 
bottom right sarcophagus -- the one that's covered with fish scales. There's 
a mummy inside. Use your torch to set fire to the mummy, and take the scepter.
The other coffins contain a Banshee which won't kill you, but will deafen you 
for awhile;some green goo that dissolves your little body if you walk through 
it; and a bag of (unneeded) gold coins. (One of the bottles you left down in 
the rope room is a goo dissolver, if you're curious.) Exit this room towards 
the bottom, and you'll find yourself in a hallway with three doors. The one 
to the right is where you want to go. You will see a shark swimming in a lake 
and a skeleton in the lake. And of course the skeleton holds in his outstret-
ched bony hands...? Yes, that's right, a skeleton key! We'll be back for it. 
How? Easy, we'll walk on water. But,first go through the door you see up left. 
You'll see a waterfall and an entrance blocked by a rock slide and some 
stones. You need ONE of the stones for your sling. Ignore the blocked exit 
(another red herring). Examine the waterfall. Aren't there always caves be-
hind waterfalls? Yes, go into this little cave. Operate the obvious stone 
protruding, and a little sack of gems pops out, remove the gems from the 
pouch and put them in your inventory. (There should be three!) Now go back to 
the hallway where we saw the three doors and go left this time. (Center is 
back to the mirrored room) You should be in a room with a trapdoor and a pe-
destal. Ignore the trapdoor. Another death exit. But there is a little gem-
shaped notch beside the door you see. Try out yourgems on this notch. One of 
them should fit and you'll hear a mysterious sound and see an orb form on the 
pedestal! Take the orb and go back to the lake. Operate the orb on the lake. 
It will freeze. Now you can walk on water! (Don't forget to take your orb 
back. You'll find it by operating your torch on the lake. A little spot will 
melt and the orb will pop out!) Now you can take the skeleton key! Now go 
back to the pedestal room. Take out some heavy items from your inventory. You 
can pick them up later. (Like the sword and cloak.) Open the door you see in 
the pedestal room and go through it. Lurking in a cave in the background are 
two eyes belonging to a dragon. Take the shield first. It will protect you 
while you take the other objects you need. Take the war hammer and the spear, 
then get out of there! In the pedestal room, you can discard the shield. You 
won't need it again. Make sure you have your cloak. Go back to the mirrored 
room. (Go out into the hallway and take the center door, remember? Then go 
through the upper left coffin!) Operate the war hammer on the center mirror. 
You will see a door. Unlock it with the skeleton key. Discard the hammer and 
the skeleton key. Put on the cloak. (Operate the cloak on yourself.) Go 
through the door, and you'll be engulfed in flames. Operate the orb on the 
flames. (Remember its chilling powers?) The flames will be gone and so will 
the orb. Discard the cloak. Go back to the pedestal room and pick up anything 
you left, then come back to the mirrored room. (What are the other two mir-
rors for? One will just crack. The other will break open and you'll be sucked 
out into space! A horrible way to die!) Take the torches and the broom from 
the mirrored room, and go out the center mirror. So, you're back in the room 
with a bridge across a pool of hot oil! Go through the exit at the top. You'll 
be on a bridge. Try to go through the door up center and a Troll appears as-
king for a toll. Don't pay him. Throw your spear at him. He'll go way tempo-
rarily. Go through the door and you'll be in a courtyard with a well and a 
Cyclops who wants to kill you! Put the stone in your sling and operate the 
sling on the Cyclops. And then operate your sword on him. Just like David, eh? 
Yes,the Cyclops is now dead. Operate the crank on the well and a bucket comes 
up. Open the bucket, takethe glove within, and put it on. (Discard the sword 
and the sling. You don't need them anymore!) You're ready to go in the Castle!

                             LIBRARY TO WYVERN

When you enter the castle you see a hallway. Take the torch. On your imme-
diate right is the Library, on your left is the Trogg room (a red herring; 
don't go there), straight ahead is the Banquet room, and the second door on 
your left is to the Lab which leads to the Garden. Go to the Library first. 
You can read all the books! There are about fifteen titles each of which has 
a paragraph which you will find entertaining. One of the books provides a 
clue: Books can be used to cast spells as well as scrolls. There is a book on 
the desk. Take it. Open the desk and take the key and scrolls. Take the spec-
tacles. Operate them on yourself. Now you can read the book and cast spells! 
(You have taken the torches in the hall, haven't you?) Take the skull on the 
bookshelf and the map on the wall. Notice the gem-shaped shape in the wall? 
Yes,use another of your gems. The bookshelves slide opening revealing another 
room. Go in and open your scrolls. Find the one that has the word "Terra" in 
it. Operate it on the globe you find in this room. It opens up and you find 
another key. Leave the bottle. It's only useful for curing the curse of the 
Wraith and you haven't been cursed, have you? Take the bellows by the fire-
place. Leave the other objects. Leave the library and go to the Banquet room. 
(The up center door in the main hall.) Operate your torch on the rug (notice 
that lump in the rug). The rug burns away and you find another key. Now that 
you have three keys, unlock and open the three doors you find in this room. 
(Two upstairs, one downstairs.) Discard the keys here. Also drop the broom, 
bellows, map and skull. Go back to the main hallway. It's time to go through 
the lab to the garden. On the way through the lab, operate the ring in front 
of the little cage door. Don't open the cage, just operate the ring. A rock 
rises up and you find a bottle of Holy Water. Take it. Take the horseshoe 
over the fireplace. Go to the Garden and take the flute. (You did put on the 
glove didn't you?) You can now discard the glove. If you didn't have the 
glove, you couldn't get the flute. The fountain is acidic. Operate the flute. 
A little tune should be heard and the tree should open. There will be a gem-
ring. Take it and discard the flute. Go back to the banquet hall. Discard the 
horseshoe. Go up the stairs to your right. Enter and find a sphinx and some 
weird drawings on the stair. Get a pencil and mark down the drawings. They 
are clues to the positions of levers you will operate later. (The bottom step 
shows the first position of the levers. Going up the stairs shows the subse-
quent positions the levers should be in.) The Sphinx will not let you pass 
unless you answer his riddle. There are six possible riddles. The object the 
Sphinx wants you to bring is either the horseshoe, the skull, the broom, the 
bellows, the mirror, or the map. Go out to the banquet room and get whatever 
object you think the Sphinx is asking for. Go back and Operate the object on 
the Sphinx. You can now go up the stairs. You'll be in an observatory. Take 
the shooting star. Operate the picture it was in. A secret panel will reveal
an iron rod. Take the rod. Go up the ladder. Operate the silver arrow on the 
pretty girl. She turns into a dead werewolf. Take the Thorn and leave the ar-
row. Go back downstairs to the banquet hall. Go in the door up the stairs to 
your left. Open the bottle of holy water. Try to take the platinum horn. A 
demon dog will appear. Banish him to hell with the holy water. Go up the lad-
der. You will see a Wyvern. Operate the shooting star on the Wyvern. When the 
sparks clear, take the Bladed Sun. Go down, back to the banquet room.

                              WAND TO ENDGAME

In the Banquet room, go through the bottom door. You'll see a door to your
right and a door to your left. Take the left door, go down the stairs. Leave 
the pot of gold alone. Open the bag. Take the large coin, and one of the 
small coins (with a skull on it). On the stairs, notice the flagpole hole? 
Operate the steel rod on it. It's a lightning rod! A flash of lightning and 
a hand comes out of the floor and offers a wand. Take it. Examine it and dis-
cover the sign of the serpent. Now where have you seen a serpent? Yes, the 
rope bridge! Go back to the rope bridge. Remove everything from your inven-
tory, except for the wand and a torch. Cross the bridge, operate the wand on 
the snake. Take the staff. Cross back over the bridge and pick up your inven-
tory. Now go back to the rope room (cross the other bridge). Go through the 
hole in the back. Place your remaining gem in the hole on the slab in the 
center. The Mage will give you a scroll called Wind Shadow. Go back to the 
Troll bridge. The troll reappears. But you don't have a spear! Operate the 
Wind Shadow scroll on yourself. You'll be invisible. You can cross safely and 
go back to the banquet room, and through the bottom door, but this time turn 
right! You'll see a skeleton sitting on a Throne. But he's missing his scep-
ter. You have it, so operate it on the skeleton. He grasps it tightly. Ope-
rate the panel to the right of the throne. It slides up revealing another gem
-shaped hole. Put the gem-ring in it, and the Throne rises revealing a secret 
passageway. Go down. Take the torches. Do NOT go left! (A slab will fall and 
kill you.) Take the other exit. You'll see some gargoyles. Leave them alone 
for now. Take the exit farthest to the right. You'll see a statue in the cen-
ter of a pool of lava, and an exit on the other side of the lava. You need a 
bridge! Open the book you got from the library. (You HAVE put your spectacles 
back on, haven't you?) Operate the opened book on the statue. A bridge will 
form. Cross the bridge. You'll be in a room with some levers. Remember, you 
wrote down the positions you had to change them too. Use those drawings now. 
Operate the levers one at a time, so they are step by step in those positions
. (Operate the third one, then the second one, then the third one again) Ma-
chinery will operate and you will get a silver orb. Operate the Thorn on the 
staff. Operate the staff on the silver orb. You now have the Staff of Life! 
Go back to the gargoyles and blind them with the Illumunaris spell. Go 
through their door, and you'll be in the well room. Operate the crank. The 
well will open. Operate the LARGE coin on the well. A wind will come up. Go 
down the well. The wind will allow you to descend gracefully. You will be on 
a riverside. Operate the drumstick on the gong. The Ferryman comes asking for 
his fare. Operate the small coin on him. He says come aboard. Click Go, and 
click on the RAFT! Not on the Ferryman! He will ferry you to a room with a 
skull door. There will be three odd shaped holes in a panel. Just the same 
shape as the Bladed Sun! Put the Sun in the first panel on your left. Operate 
the Platinum Horn. The horn blows and the skull door opens. Go in and you'll 
see the Wizard with a Giant Behemoth. Operate the Staff of Life on The Wizard
? No, the Behemoth! Angered and banished below, he takes the Wizard with him.

@endnode

@node s1 "Space Quest 1"
@next s2
@prev sh

             
                               Space Quest 1


First of all we begin in the hallway of your ship. You realize that the ship  
is on 'self destruct' and you only have minutes to get off.
Move your man to the left. You will enter a room with two chairs and a com-
puter screen. Look at screen it will ask you what cartridge you would like to 
retrieve. The correct answer is ASTRAL BODY (the dying scientist will tell 
you this). Now take the cartridge. Do not try to play it, you will be killed......
You may see some old man enter the room he will die telling you to save your-
self. You must now leave the room and continue to the left. You will find a 
body. Search the body and you will find a keycard. Take the KEYCARD. Next you 
must go to the elevator and it will take you down 1 level.. Once on the new 
floor find another elevator that you only see doors. That will take you to 
the engine room. In the center of the room there are docking bay doors. Look
at panel and push the 'open bay door' button. Then go to the right and you 
will see an elevator. To the left of the elevator there is a panel. Insert 
keycard, take the keycard back and enter elevator. Go to the center of the 
room and push the button on the right, take the space suit. Then push the 
button on the left, take the gadget. Now you must walk around the railing, go 
to the panel and open the door. Exit the door and you will see a pod and a 
panel. Read the panel (look at it) and press the button. You will now see an 
escape pod, enter the pod. Close the door to the pod. Fasten seatbelt, look 
at panel. Push power on, press the 'autonav' button and then pull throttle.
Ok you are on your way.......Enjoy the trip and view. You will now crash land  
on a planet. When you do, a survival kit will drop. Take the kit. Exit the 
ship and take the reflective glass laying on the ground. You must now go to 
the right.... After you walk to the right you will notice a path leading up, 
take the path. After a short walk you will see a spider droid drop, don't 
worry about it yet, (You may at this point carefully drop the stone found on 
the arched bridge on the spider droid, this will take care of him right there 
and then! AhAh don't do it, you will need this droid later on!) then continue
until you see two arches walk under (between) them and you will be in a ele-
vator going down.... When you get to the bottom exit the elevator and take 
the rock lying on the ground. Follow the passage and you will be in a room 
with a grate on the floor and a geyser on the other side. Walk all the way to 
the back of the grate and and slide by the back wall. When you get across 
drop the rock on the geyser. Now a door will open, exit the room. You will 
see what look like  beams. If you walk into them you're dead. So walk real  
close and put glass or mirror in beams (remember the "glass" from the crashed 
pod?). They will short out, now continue up the path. You will be in a room 
that has what appears to be water dropping from the ceiling. It's not water,  
it's acid..... so time yourself and don't let the drops hit you. At this 
point you need to turn the knob or wheel on the gadget (really a translator).  
Enter the next room and you will see an image. It will talk to you and send 
you on a Quest (if you forgot to turn on the gadget then you couldn't under-
stand the image). Well, now again you're back on the outside, go down the 
path, you may find the spider waiting for you but it's slow (unless you 
"stoned" it) so go to the right you will notice an indent or should I say 
cave. Enter the cave and make sure the spider follows. Once in the cave move 
to the far right bottom as fast as possible. The spider will enter and kill 
the monster. Now you must pick up his guts as proof that the monster has been 
destroyed. Take the guts back to the image in the room and give it to him. 
You will now be able to go to a room that has a computer directly in front of 
you. Move to the dark screen and insert the cartridge. You will now see why 
you have taken on this mission. At this point take the cartridge back and the  
aliens will have given you a skimmer. Enter the skimmer and turn the key.
This part is hard so save each move. You must get across the land to the next 
city. You can only take 5 hits from rocks and then da da da ... Once you get 
across exit skimmer and take key. A man will ask if you want to sell it say 
"no" and walk into bar. Then exit bar and the man will offer 30 in money and 
a jetpack. Do it. Now go to the bar and play the slot and play till you have  
won 230, beware, save a lot, for if you get three skulls you're dead.
Now go to bar and drink, buy and drink, until you overhear where to take your 
ship.. "Sector HH" !!!!! Now go buy a ship. It will cost you 219 don't buy 
any others.... After you have a ship go to the right of the screen and enter 
the Droids-R-Us shop. Buy the droid at the top of the steps to the right. Now  
go back to ship and enter ship, load droid, he will ask what sector tell him 
"Sector HH". You will now be at the Sarien ship. Wear your jetpack and exit 
ship. Now you will see a door on the space ship. Open door and enter the ship
. You will now be in an air lock. Exit air lock when the droid comes in and 
you will be in a room. Move the trunk farthest from you. You will now be un-
der a vent, open trunk, put jetpack in, open grate and enter vent. Climb un-
til you see a passage to the right, enter the passage. You must now kick the 
vent several times until it opens. Now enter the room and you will be in a 
laundry room. Enter the washing machine. You will now have on a Sarien uni-
form, exit the room and go all the  way to the right. You will now be in the 
Armory. Give the droid your pass out of your uniform. When it leaves the room 
move to the right and take the bomb off table. The droid will bring you a gun
. Now exit room and you will see a man and a reactor. Drop the bomb and leave 
the room, he will die. Walk to the elevator and go down then go to the room 
where you dropped the bomb and search man press the button off. Walk to panel 
and look at it and press button. You must now enter the destruct code. Which 
is "6858". Now you have only a five minutes to get the Hell out... Go to the  
elevator and up so you're outside the laundry. The elevator to the right 
which has the sign out of order. You must open this  door.. Blast it if it 
doesn't open then enter and you will be in a room with an escape ship, enter
ship and turn key. You have now finished the game.

@endnode

@node s2 "Space Quest 2"
@next s3
@prev s1


                              Space Quest 2 


As our story opens, you, Roger Wilco, sanitary engineer extraordinaire, are
doing what you do best -- swabbing an outer deck of Xenon Orbital Station 4.
A beep from your wrist watch interrupts your reverie. A look at the watch re-
veals buttons labeled H, T, and C. Press C. A message from your boss tells 
you to get back in the station on the double and clean up a mess made by a 
space-sick passenger in the shuttle. (You get all the most desirable jobs!) 
Walk up the wall and across the ceiling (Isn't zero-gravity fun?) to the air-
lock entrance. Stand on the entrance, and in a few seconds you will be trans-
ported inside the station. Once inside the station, walk over to the space-
suits on the back wall and take a uniform. Take a moment to check your inven-
tory. You have a filled-out order form for a Labion Terror Beast Mating 
Whistle, which is ready to be mailed, and a dialect translator. Now walk over 
to the lockers and open a locker. Take the jockstrap and the Cubix Rube puz-
zle that you find inside. Exit the airlock through the door on the west side 
of the room. As you enter the control room, your boss tells you to get over 
to the shuttle on the double. The other crew persons in the control room aren
't inclined to waste time with you either, so you have no choice but to go 
and stand on the transport lift on the west side of the room. Once you've 
been lifted to the transport level, walk over to the transport tube entrance 
and get in. In a few seconds you find yourself in the shuttle bay. Walk down
the stairs and enter the shuttle from the rear. HEY! What's going on here?! 
You don't have much time to think about it before one of the thugs gives you 
a love tap on the noggin and turns out your lights. When you come to,you find 
yourself helplessly pinned down inside an asteroid fortress orbiting a forest 
planet. You are in the presence of a hideous alien who is obviously keeping 
himself alive by artificial means. The alien patiently explains to you that 
he is Sludge Vohaul, the evil intellect behind the plot to steal the star ge-
nerator that you foiled in SPACE QUEST I. Now Vohaul has decided to take his 
revenge on you and your home world of Xenon. He shows you his fiendish plot 
to loose thousands of genetically engineered insurance salesmen who won't 
take no for an answer on Xenon. You quickly realize that humanity hasn't been 
in so much danger since "Super Car" was canceled, but just right now there's 
nothing you can do about it. Vohaul's goons hustle you back aboard the shut-
tle and transport you down to the forest planet to begin serving a life sen-
tence as a slave in Vohaul's mines. But before you reach the mines, the lit-
tle hovercraft carrying you and two guards runs out of fuel and crashes to 
the forest floor! When you come to, you find yourself in the middle of a 
strange forest with one of the guards (who evidently broke your fall) lying 
quite dead beside you. Search his body and take the keycard from his uniform. 
The other guard is lying dead in the remains of the hovercraft. A steady beep 
is coming from the wreck and you realize that it could attract searching
guards. Walk over to the wreck, look inside, and push the button. The homing 
device is now turned off. Exit the screen to the north. Now these woods are 
strange indeed! (Don't try climbing the trees unless you save your game first
!) At some point in your journey through this forest you will hear the sound 
of another hovercraft searching for you. You can always avoid this hovercraft 
by quickly exiting the screen that you are on; however, you won't get any 
points for it, and the hovercraft will return. The better way is to find a 
place in the dense foliage where your body is completely hidden. Wait motion-
less for the hovercraft to appear and then leave. This will earn you 5 points 
and the thugs will not return. Also at some point on this screen, you will 
hear the sound of a rope snapping and a high-pitched shriek. When this hap-
pens, exit the screen near the southeast corner. You will come upon a strange 
little creature hanging upside down in a hunter's snare. Walk over to the 
little pink fellow and free him from the rope. Exit the screen to the west 
and then go up the hill and west. You are now on a plateau with a mailbox at 
the end of it. Put your Labion Terror Beast Mating Whistle order form in the 
mailbox's slot. Instantly a genuine Labion Terror Beast Mating Whistle ap-
pears on the tray! (Just like the U.S. Mail, right?) Take the whistle and 
exit the plateau back around to the east and back south down the hill. Now 
exit the screen to the west. Did the spores knock you out? Well, no matter. 
Take one of the spores anyway. (They're those pretty little flowers on the 
ground.) You'll need it. Exit the screen to the northwest. What on Earth (or 
wherever you are) is this thing? Well, it's alive and it's very hungry as you 
will learn to your sorrow if you touch any part of it. But this vine creature 
is also a maze. If you look carefully, you can see that there is clear path-
way through the creature leading to the bushes at the north of the screen. 
You may have also seen the little pink fellow that you freed from the rope 
gathering some of the berries from those bushes. Maybe those berries are im-
portant. Carefully work your way along the path through the vine creature. 
(HINT: Save your game as you complete each little section of the creature/
maze). Now take some of the berries from the bushes. Don't bother trying to 
eat them, the smell will deter you anyway. Work your way back through the 
vine creature/maze the way you came, again saving as you go. Exit the screen 
to the south. Go east and then go north up the hill and east. You now find 
yourself at the edge of a dismal swamp. And that little pink creature is here 
again. As you watch, he smears the berries over his body and disappears into 
the swamp. Take your cue from the little fellow and smear the berries over 
your uniform, too. Once that is done, enter the swamp and exit the screen to 
the east. Wow! It's a good thing those smelly berries made you unappetizing 
or you would have been lunch for that swamp creature. Now that you're safely 
in the swamp, take some time to explore before leaving. If you walk around 
the north end of the screen, a little bit east of center, you'll come to deep 
water where you have to swim instead of walk. When you reach that point, take 
a deep breath (Important!) and dive under the surface. Under the surface, you
'll see an underwater cave leaving the screen to the west. Follow the cave, 
and you'll find yourself surfacing in a strangely glowing cavern. A quick in-
spection reveals that the glow is coming from a rock sitting on an altar-like 
boulder in the cavern. Take the glowing rock. Re-enter the water, take a deep 
breath again, and dive below the surface. Swim back to the surface of the 
swamp the way you came in.Then exit the swamp to the east. You're back in the 
clear again, but there's a deep chasm blocking your progress to the east, and 
there's no where else to go. Better climb that dead tree at the edge of the 
chasm to get a better view. WHOA! CRAAACK! That tree wasn't too steady, was 
it? But now its trunk is wedged tightly across the top of the chasm, forming 
a natural bridge. Crawl across the log and exit the screen to the east. Pro-
ceed through the forest to the east and...oops! Trapped again! This time you'
re hanging upside down, the blood is rushing to your head, and soon you black 
out. When you come to, you find yourself securely locked in a wooden cage. A
big, ugly brute of a hunter is getting a fire ready for his dinner, and you
can just guess what he plans on having for his main course! Better think of
a way out of here. Wait a minute! Remember that knock-out spore you picked 
up? Here's the perfect place to use it, but you're going to have to get the
hunter closer to the cage, so that you can reach the key when he falls. The
best way to get that oaf's attention is to yell at him. If he doesn't respond 
the first time you call, yell again. OK, that got his attention and here he 
comes. Wait until he's right next to the cage and throw the spore. Got him! 
Now get the key and unlock the cage. Open the door, leave the cage, and pick 
up the rope that's lying on the rock. Then exit the screen to the north. You 
find yourself at the edge of a plateau. You can see the shuttle platform, 
where you first came to this planet, off in the distance. But don't try wal-
king that way yet! Moving any distance at all toward the north of the screen 
will take you right into the guns of Vohaul's thugs. Instead, immediately 
exit the screen to the west. Walk west through the forest until you again ar-
rive at the chasm. Now the only way to go is down. Fortunately, you have the 
rope. You can tie the rope to either the stump or the log. Save the game, and 
try tying the rope to the stump. You'll get 2 points for it. Now climb down 
the rope and...well, I guess tying it the stump didn't work too well. Tie the 
rope to the log. Again, you'll get 2 points, but this time things are much 
more secure. Climb down the rope. Nice situation huh? You find yourself 
hanging over a bottomless chasm. On the ledge to the east is very large, very 
hungry looking monster. On the ledge to the west is a cave leading into the 
cliff. On the whole, the ledge to the west looks more desirable. But how to 
get there? Climb down to the end of the rope (but not too far), and swing on 
the rope. Gradually the arc of your swing will get larger and larger. To time 
when the swing is large enough, wait until the monster starts trying to grab 
you. Then, when the rope is at the far western edge of its arc, let go. Nice-
ly done! You're safely on the western ledge. Enter the cave. The cave leads 
off into darkness, but there's no where else to go. So as you enter the dark-
ness, hold the glowing rock. Ah, just enough light to see the passage leading 
to the west. Follow the passage and...oops! Here we go again -- tumbling down 
into the darkness! When you reach the bottom, you find yourself back out in 
the daylight and on the floor of a rock-strewn canyon. And here are a couple 
of those little pink guys again, telling you to follow them! Before you do, 
however, take a moment to pick up the glowing rock, which you dropped during 
your fall. Then exit the screen to the south. You've entered a cul-de-sac on 
the canyon floor, and as you're wondering where the exit is, the chief of the
little pink creatures appears. He thanks you for the rescue of their friend. 
In return, he tells you to "just say the word" and his people will show you 
the way out. So type SAY THE WORD. When you do, two of the little creatures 
push aside a boulder, revealing an entrance to an underground passage. Climb 
down. Now you're completely in the dark! How are you going to see where you
're going if you have to use your hands to grip the ladder? What's more, you
can also hear the bone-chilling cries of a terrible cave monster! Well, what 
are mouths for? To hold rocks, of course. So hold the glowing rock in your 
mouth. Well, that's a little better, at least you can see where you're going.
A little exploration would reveal that this underground complex is really a
maze of vertical ladders intersected by horizontal tunnels. But who wants to 
explore when there's a hungry monster after you? So here's the quickest way 
out: Climb down to the next intersection. Crawl east to the next intersection.
Climb down to the bottom of this ladder. Crawl east to the next intersection. 
Climb down to the next intersection. Crawl west to the next intersection. 
Climb down to the bottom of this ladder. Crawl west two intersections. Climb 
down two intersections. Finally, crawl east all the way out of the tunnel.
You're now in a cavern through which a beautiful, sparkling stream flows. En-
ter the water and follow the stream off the screen to the east. Keep follo-
wing the stream as it winds around, until you have to choose between branches 
that flow to the left and the right. Choose the branch to the right (the left 
one leads to certain death). You will find yourself being sucked into a 
whirlpool, and you emerge from the whirlpool considerably rung out but none 
the worse for wear. At last you're back in the great outdoors. Go east and 
leave the pond. You can now see the bottom of the shuttle platform very close 
by, but impenetrable stone walls prevent you from getting to it. This is a
situation that calls for some outside help. Remember your Labion Terror Beast 
Mating Whistle? Now's the time to blow it. Sure enough, here comes a Labion 
Terror Beast blasting a hole right through the wall! At this point, if you 
don't have the Cubix Rube puzzle, get back in the water and move off the 
screen before the Beast reaches you and tears you apart. If you do have the 
puzzle, throw it to the Beast. This will earn you 10 big points. While the 
Beast is "puzzling" over the puzzle (or after you return from the water) head 
for the opening that has been blasted in the rock wall. Before exiting the 
screen, pause to take one of the small rocks in the pile of rubble at the 
opening made by the Beast. Finally exit the screen to the north. Now the 
shuttle platform, with its promise of escape, looms before you. But spoiling 
the scene is one of Vohaul's guards patrolling the lower level of the plat-
form. Using the bushes as a screen, wait until the guard is out of view, and 
move to a hiding place behind the forward set of bushes. At this point,if you 
do not have the jockstrap, time the guard's movements so that you can move 
under the platform to the door on the right platform leg without the guard 
seeing you. You won't get any points for this, but it works. If you do have 
the jockstrap you can use it to throw the stone so as to distract the guard 
and then move to the door. This will net you 10 points. Better yet, you can 
remove the menace of the guard permanently by using the jockstrap to throw 
the stone AT the guard, hitting him in the head and killing him. In order to 
make sure of your shot, wait until the guard pauses at the center of his cat-
walk, then throw the stone at him with the jockstrap. This will net you 20 
points. Once you have reached the platform door, insert your keycard and en-
ter the elevator. When you arrive at the top of the platform, much to your 
surprise (and relief), you find an empty shuttle waiting for you. Walk around 
to the rear of the craft and enter the shuttle. Once seated in the cockpit, 
look around. You see an instrument panel before you and a throttle control
between your legs. Look at the instrument panel. You see a power button, an 
attitude control dial, and an ascent thruster button. Press the power button 
and you see all the monitor screens light up.Turn the attitude dial. The game 
will inform you that the controls are now set at VAC (Vertical Attitude Con-
trol). Press the thruster button, then look at the monitor. It will inform 
you that thrusters are ready. If you have a joystick, pull back on it (or 
press the "down arrow" cursor key), and the ship will lift off. Hold the joy-
stick back, until the game informs you that you are off the planet. When a 
computerized voice tells you that minimum altitude has been achieved, turn 
the attitude dial again. It will now be set at HAC (Horizontal Attitude Con-
trol). Push the joystick forward (or press the "up" cursor key), and the 
shuttle will begin moving forward. This won't last long, however, because 
suddenly all the monitor screens are filled with the image you least wanted 
to see -- the ugly face of Sludge Vohaul! He gleefully informs you that he 
has taken control of the shuttle and that you are now on an automatic journey 
to his asteroid fortress. Nothing for it now, but to hang on and enjoy (?) 
the ride! Enter choice !3 When you step out of the shuttle inside Vohaul's 
asteroid complex, you're surprised to find that there are no guards there to 
greet you. In fact, the complex seems completely deserted. But you know that 
Vohaul must be watching. Anyway, you still need to work your way out of this 
mess. Taking a look around, you see that the shuttle platform seems to be 
suspended in space, with catwalks leading away from it to the east and to 
the west. A stairway leads down to the south. Above you, another catwalk, 
which seems inaccessible, crosses the shuttle bay from west to east. Take the 
east catwalk, and exit the screen in that direction. You find yourself at an 
elevator. Enter the elevator. Look at the elevator. You see a read-out, cur-
rently reading Level One, and a panel. Look at the panel. The panel contains 
a row of buttons. Look at the buttons. The buttons read "one," "three," "four
," and "five." Press "three." In a minute, you find yourself at the end of 
long corridor stretching away to the west. A note of caution about these cor-
ridors. Periodically, you'll see an odd contraption moving along the corridor 
toward you. These are automatic floor waxers, and if they catch up with you, 
they'll ground you into a thin sheet and turn you into part of the floor. If 
you see one approaching, move immediately into a doorway or elevator opening 
and wait for it to turn around and go back in the opposite direction. Walk 
down the corridor. After crossing a couple of screens, you arrive at a door 
in the corridor wall, with a button beside it. Hey! You, of all people, would 
recognize a janitorial closet anywhere! Press the button and enter the closet. 
Looking around in the closet, you find a plunger. Take the plunger, exit the 
closet, then walk all the way to the far eastern end of the corridor. Enter 
the elevator you find there and press "four." When you arrive at level four, 
you find another corridor stretching away to the west. Walk down the corridor. 
Sure enough, you come to another janitorial closet. Enter the closet and take 
the glass cutter that you find in there. Continue west down the corridor. You 
soon arrive at restroom entrances, labeled with male and female signs. Take 
either entrance -- they both lead into the same restroom! In the restroom, 
amid the rather alien plumbing, you see an empty stall at the back of the 
room. Enter the stall and close the door. What you do in the stall is your 
own business, but be sure to take the toilet paper with you when you're done. 
Exit the restroom and walk to the far western end of the corridor. Enter the 
elevator and press "five." Exit the elevator on level five and walk east. 
Once again you come to a janitorial closet. Enter the closet and take the 
wastebasket that you find there. Pick up the pair of overalls that is hanging 
in the closet and an object falls from the pocket. A quick inspection reveals 
that the object is a lighter. Take the lighter and exit the closet. At this 
point, the safe play is to walk immediately west from the janitorial closet 
back to elevator you came from. If you wish to see what lies to the east, you 
won't get any points for it, but it is amusing. Be sure to save your game 
first. Those huge arms sticking out of that cage will bash you if you get too 
close, so be sure to stick to the south side of the corridor. Proceed east 
and...what's this? One of the cages is opening! And emerging from it is a 
nightmare creature that looks like it escaped from the movie, "Alien"! At 
this point, you have no choice but to hurry back to the west as fast as you 
can. Don't let the alien monster catch you and kiss you! If you do, later in 
the game you'll wind up just like John Hurt in "Alien" (talk about a stomach 
ache!). Head straight for the elevator and press "one." Back on level one, 
return to the shuttle platform, and proceed down the stairs to the south. As 
you pass through the doorway at the bottom of the stairs, the door seals shut 
behind you! Move to the west and a barrier pops up barring your way! Try mo-
ving east and another barrier pops up trapping you! As if that weren't bad 
enough, now the floor is moving out from under you, threatening to dump you 
in a pool of corrosive acid! Don't panic! Wait until the floor is almost out 
from under you, then stick the plunger to the barrier. That's the way to hang 
in there! Wait until the floor slides back into place, then let go of the 
plunger. The barriers slide back into the floor leaving you free to move. But 
before you can very far in either direction, you run up against a very formi-
dable obstacle: Walbots! These electronic monsters are instant death if you 
let them touch you, but there is a way to defeat them. First, when one of the 
walbots starts to come after you, retreat to the center of the corridor and 
exit the screen up the stairs. When you go back down the stairs, the Walbot 
will have returned to its resting place. Now examine the ceiling of the cor-
ridor. The only thing of note up there are fire sprinklers. But water and e-
lectronics don't mix! And you have the means in hand to get those sprinklers 
sprinkling. Put the toilet paper in the wastebasket, and then drop the waste-
basket. Light the toilet paper with the lighter, and in a few seconds the 
sprinklers will start flowing. Snap! Crackle! Pop! You've shorted out the 
Walbots! Now proceed down the corridor and exit the screen all the way to the 
east. Suddenly, here you are in Vohaul's command post! The evil one himself 
is sitting on his raised platform in the center of the room sneering at you.
Surrounding the room are the tubes containing the dreaded insurance salesmen, 
but right now all your attention is on Vohaul and getting your hands around 
his fat neck. You start up the stairs to his platform, but just before you 
can reach him, you're zapped by a strange energy beam. (Don't panic, this is 
not the end of the game!) When you rematerialize, you find that you've been 
reduced to the size of a mouse and that you're trapped in a glass jar on Vo-
haul's control console! Vohaul gloats over your predicament, then proceeds to 
ignore you as he launches the insurance salesmen! Now's your chance. While 
Vohaul is ignoring you, cut the glass with the glass cutter. Walk over to the 
vents in the console immediately to the west of the jar and climb in the vent. 
Bingo! You've found Vohaul's life support equipment! If you look carefully 
behind that large pump, you'll see a large, red button. Press that button. 
You did it! You've shut off Vohaul's life support! He's a goner! Now climb 
out the vent. In his death throes, Vohaul utters a final curse at you and 
flips a switch. That action started the asteroid's self-destruct sequence, so 
now time is of the essence. Exit the screen along the narrow path in the 
southwest corner. You find yourself at a control console with a switch on the 
back and keyboard. Walk over to the switch and pull it to the on position. 
The read-out is now asking you "Enlarge or Reduce?" Of course, you want to 
get larger, so type "enlarge." Now return to the glass jar immediately. In a
few seconds, you're back to normal size, standing beside the dead carcass of
Vohaul, which is sprawled across the floor. A flashing monitor draws your at-
tention. A look at the monitor reveals that the clone launch can be aborted 
if you enter the abort code. But what is the code? Search Vohaul's body. Aha! 
There it is: "SHSR." Return to the monitor and enter the code. That takes 
care of the insurance salesmen, but you still have to get out of here alive.
Exit the screen up the stairs to the east. Now you're in a long tube on the
exterior of the asteroid. Near the entrance to the tube is a panel. A look at 
the panel shows that it contains an oxygen mask. Take the mask (you will au-
tomatically be wearing it). Follow the tube where it leads you, around to the 
east and then to the south. Good thing you were wearing that oxygen mask when 
the tube cracked! Exit the tube to the south. Drat! Here you are in another 
of those featureless corridors, and you've got to get off this asteroid be-
fore it burns up. The way out is to the west. Walk west about three screens 
and there it is: The escape pod bay! Unfortunately, blocking the way is the 
nattiest looking robot you've ever seen, and it has the name "Marrow-matic" 
written on it. You can just guess what that means! And now the "MM" has sen-
sed the presence of your marrow and is coming to get it! Not to worry, you 
can work your away around this refugee from "RoboCop." When the MM starts to 
come after you, exit the screen to the east. Make sure the MM follows you on-
to the next screen, then hoof it all the way to the eastern end of the corri-
dor. Make sure that the MM follows you all the way (just don't let it catch 
you). Keep going through the glowing portal at the end of the corridor. The 
MM won't follow you through that. Keep going all the way across the catwalk 
that stretches across the shuttle bay and continue through the glowing portal 
at the other end. Continue down the corridor in an easterly direction and you
'll finally reach the escape pod bay from the other side. And thanks to your 
artful dodging the MM is nowhere in sight. Proceed to the first pod on the 
left, and press the button next to the hatch. When the hatch opens, enter the 
pod. Take a quick look around. You see a control panel. A quick look at the 
control panel, reveals a launch button. Press the launch button. Congratula-
tions! You've saved your planet and escaped the asteroid! Just as you're con-
templating how sweet it is to be a hero again, a rude beeping from the con-
trol panel informs you that the pod is running out of oxygen! You try the 
oxygen mask, but it's empty. Hastily looking around the pod, you see a sleep 
chamber against the right-hand wall. Oh well, the deep freeze is better than 
asphyxiation! Walk over to the sleep chamber and open it. Enter the sleep 
chamber and settle down to a nice, long nap until....

@endnode

@node s3 "Space Quest 3"
@next su
@prev s2


                               Space Quest 3


Notes: Where appropriate, the commands that you should type in will be 
shown in capitals. Also, from time to time I will mention the need to 
save a game in progress before proceeding. Occasionally I will point 
out some of the ways your character, Roger Wilco, can be killed. Some 
of these are worth exploring. After all, part of what you paid for is 
getting bumped off in style. In almost every case, there are a number 
of like intentioned commands which will work equally well in a given 
situation. In this walkthrough, I have generally gone for the tersest 
commands I know to be valid, simply because I hate typing. In most 
cases I will skip the step where you LOOK at something before you 
GET/TAKE or USE it. If you want to play the game to its fullest, you 
may feel free to look first and take or use later. Finally, the game 
concludes with an arcade shoot'em up sequence which is much easier to 
win if you have a joystick or mouse available as a control input. If 
you have either of these, I recommend that you install the game 
accordingly. Keep in mind that the keyboard is the preferred input 
until this final sequence.

                                 *****

This adventure begins as the space pod in which you escaped Sludge 
Vohaul (Space Quest II) docks inside a large salvage freighter. You 
walk out of the escape pod in a daze and the pod's door slams shut 
behind you. You're on your own now, Roger. 

Look at the smallish, round, striped object on the floor - you do this 
by walking up to it and typing: EXAMINE OBJECT. It's a warp motivator. 
That's space-speak for something you will need later. Exit toward the 
bottom of the screen then proceed right past the saucerlike craft. 
Continue right and you will see a conveyor assembly that is lifting 
buckets of space slop upwards to points unseen. Stand in the 
conveyor's path and you will be lifted by the next bucket that comes 
along. When you reach the top of the conveyor, the bucket turns over 
and you will be dumped onto a moving belt. You must act very quickly! 
STAND then JUMP. Just before you get dumped into the metal shredder, 
you will escape to a rail that is suspended over the belt. The rail 
should be navigated using the left or right arrow keys only! If you 
try to move using a mouse or a joystick, the imprecision of your 
movement command will probably cause Roger to fall and die. If you try 
to command any motion other than left or right, adios Roger! Enough 
said! 

Walk left on the rail until you pass through an arch. You will be in a 
control room where a droid is monitoring some gauges. Don't linger too 
long here or the droid will notice you. If he does, you die. There is 
a cart, actually a grabber, suspended from the rail. When you are in a 
position to climb down into this cart, ENTER GRABBER. The grabber is 
operated with the left (backward) and right (forward) arrow keys. Use 
the backward key until the grabber has exited through the rearmost 
exit on the screen. Continue until the grabber is near the right of 
the next screen and PRESS CLAW. If you have done this in the correct 
location, the claw will descend from the grabber and it will pick up 
the warp motivator. If you miss, it will be easy to discern the 
correction. Continue backwards until you have rounded the bend at the 
right end of the salvage complex. Just after you are again headed to 
your left, stop the grabber and PRESS CLAW again. If you guessed the 
right spot, the claw will deposit the warp motivator in the rear 
compartment of an abandoned space ship. You may be wondering how you 
knew that there was an abandoned spaceship in this area. Well, if you 
had wandered about on foot at the beginning, you would eventually have 
discovered the ship, but this walkthrough skips the superfluous.

Back the grabber up past the conveyor belt and through the exit that 
leads to the control room. There are three connected platforms in the 
foreground right near where the grabber was parked when you found it. 
Stop the grabber by the center platform and EXIT GRABBER. Remember, if 
you dally, the droid will blow you away. Walk toward the bottom of the 
screen and you will fall down a chute.

You are now in some sort of garbage pit. When you have climbed out of 
the mound of trash that cushioned your fall, follow the overhead wire 
to your left. LOOK AROUND and EXAMINE HOLE. You have discovered the 
portable reactor that powers this part of the salvage complex. GET 
REACTOR and walk to the ladder at the right rear of the screen. CLIMB 
and be sure to note the exact point behind the bowtie fighter - yep 
you heard right, a bowtie fighter - where you emerge on the original 
level. You will be climbing down this same ladder shortly. 

Walk to the rear of the screen and you will be back where you started.
Continue to the right and walk into the skeleton of the tubelike 
structure at the right. Continue to the right and stop near the left 
edge of the second screen. You are inside the remains of a tanker 
ship. Where you see wires hanging from the missing paneling, stop by 
the leftmost wire and TAKE WIRE. Do not let Roger reach the middle of 
this screen before getting the wire or you will have some extra (and 
boring) work on your hands. Assuming that you do have the wire, go 
right, and when you reach the middle of the screen, a giant rat will 
jump out of the ceiling panel and mug you. When you recover enough to 
check your possessions, you'll find that the rat has taken the reactor 
and wire. Now you'll have to figure out what the rat did with them.

If you were paying attention when you landed in the trash heap, you 
undoubtedly noticed the rats looking down at you. Maybe that's where 
they bring their trophies. Go back to the exact spot behind the bowtie 
fighter where you emerged when you climbed the ladder and CLIMB DOWN. 
You are now back in the garbage room. Go back to the spot on the left 
where you got the reactor and SEARCH HOLE. So that's where the rats 
hid your stuff. GET REACTOR and GET WIRE. Go back to the ladder and 
CLIMB. When you have done this, TAKE LADDER. I'll bet you didn't know 
you could fit a ladder in your pocket.

Go back to the tanker and walk through it to your right. This time the 
rats will leave you alone. You will find yourself by the head of a 
giant robot whose right eye is missing. Be very careful not to fall 
off the bottom of the screen! Walk to the area near the missing eye, 
then CLIMB. Aha, you have found the spacecraft in which you earlier 
deposited the warp motivator.

Walk to the middle of the spacecraft on the side nearest the bottom of 
the screen and USE LADDER. If you have picked the right spot, the 
ladder will move from your pocket to an upright position beside the 
ship. Then CLIMB. You will be warned that the top of the spacecraft 
affords treacherous footing. Do not take this warning lightly. Walk 
next to the round hatch on the top of the ship and ENTER HATCH. You 
are now inside the ship.

There is a computer screen on your right which is used to diagnose the 
ship's systems. You could try this now. but there wouldn't be much 
point since you still have the power source in your pocket. I'll bet 
the reactor would fit in that open panel at the lower left. There are 
a number of eloquent ways to proceed here, but the simplest is to USE 
REACTOR followed by USE WIRE. Then, USE COMPUTER to diagnose the on 
board systems. Way to go, Roger, you have repaired the ship. Those two 
empty seats on the left look interesting, but you don't need to pay 
them any heed - yet.

Now you're ready to blow this joint, so ENTER COCKPIT. If you check 
out the panel, you'll discover that all the ship's controls are 
accessed via a computer screen, so USE SCREEN. The screen has several 
numbered options that are accessed by the corresponding number keys.
Fire up the ENGINES, engage the RADAR and TAKE OFF. After a few meters 
of flight, you will bump into the inside wall of the salvage ship. You 
need an exit hole, so you'd better blast one now. Use the computer to 
engage the WEAPONS SYSTEM. Choose SHIELDS (either front or rear) and 
press the space bar to FIRE. You are now in outer space. USE SCREEN 
again and select NAVIGATION SYSTEM. Use the 1 key to scan until the 
planet Phleebut is selected then use the 2 key to compute the course.
You will need to use the computer again to select LIGHT SPEED for 
efficient travel. Oh, oh, that terminator is coming to get you and 
he's one mean dude. You'd better be careful. When the computer alerts 
you that its time to land, LAND.

When your ship plops down on Phleebut, EXIT COCKPIT and PRESS BUTTON 
to exit the ship. Do not walk toward the bottom of the screen unless 
you have just saved the game. If you venture out to the left, don't 
walk under the overhang where the pods live. You want to get to the 
World of Wonders tourist attraction which is two screens to the rear 
and two screens to the right of the spot where you landed. Meanwhile, 
the terminator has landed elsewhere on the planet. Look closely to see 
if you can figure out what part of his equipment makes him invisible.
It would be wise to save the game at this point. As you proceed from 
the landing site to the World of Wonders, you should walk near the 
edge of the screen. If the deadly scorpazoid should appear, you may be 
able to escape to an adjacent screen. Note the thunderstorm raging in 
the background. If you go too far toward the rear (past World of 
Wonders) lightning will zap you. Depending on the route you select, 
you may see a menacing looking giant beast in the background. Don't 
worry, it is only Mog, the mechanical monster, and the World of 
Wonders is a souvenir shop situated between his feet. 

Outside the entrance to World of Wonders look inside the glass case, 
but don't open it! Enter the store and SHOW GEM to Fester. Accept the 
third offer he makes. Then BUY HAT, BUY ORAT and BUY UNDERWEAR. READ 
POSTCARD - and repeat - until you have read them all. Pay particular 
attention to the one that describes how travelers adapt to the 
volcanic climate of Ortega. EXIT STORE and the terminator will grab 
you.

After the terminator has threatened you, he will give you a ten second 
head start - he will suggest that you use this head start to try to 
return to your ship. Don't bother, you'll never make it. Instead, exit 
to the left and enter the door in Mog's foot. Get in the elevator and 
PRESS UP. exit the elevator and climb the stairs. Position yourself 
right next to either of the hanging pulleys. This is a primo time to 
save the game. The terminator will come at you and when he is nearby, 
SWING PULLEY. If you did this right, the terminator will be digested 
by the spinning gears. Climb down the stairs, walk over toward the 
terminator's remains and GET BELT. You now have the means of becoming 
invisible. You will be using the belt later in the game and you must 
WEAR BELT before that becomes a viable move. Enter the elevator and 
ride down with Fester. Return directly to your ship and remember to 
watch out for the scorpazoid.

Getting the ship airborne is essentially a repeat performance of what 
you did earlier, except that this time you won't need to explicitly 
turn on the radar - it remains active from the last flight. When you 
select the NAVIGATION SYSTEM, search for Monolith Burger and set your 
course for that quadrant. 

Your ship will dock at Monolith Burger and you will enter without your 
having to type anything. Go to the left one screen and stand by the 
counter. When the clerk talks to you, ORDER FOOD. It wouldn't hurt to 
order one of everything. When you are done ordering, PAY CLERK, then 
walk over to one of the empty tables and EAT. 

Note: Once when I played this game, a message informed me that I had 
found a decoder ring in my empty food bag. Another time I had to LOOK 
IN BAG. In either case, don't proceed until you have the ring. If you 
want to die in style, enter the airlock on the left twice. Make sure 
your game is saved first.

Go up to the video game and PLAY GAME. When you have digested the 
instructions, INSERT COIN and play. You can get quite crazy trying to 
master this sucker. You will run up points each time you can get Astro 
Chicken to land on the pad, but the real trick is to get two or more 
successful landings during a single play. Quit the game (with whatever 
key is appropriate for your particular computer) and hope that the 
coded message appears. Sometimes it helps to wait a bit before you
quit. When the coded message is displayed, USE RING (to decode it). 
There is no way the program can tell if you have actually bothered to 
do this, so, if you're feeling lazy, you can skip this step. The gist 
of the message is that the Two Guys From Andromeda are being held 
captive in the headquarters of the Scumsoft Corporation on Pestulon, a 
moon of the planet Ortega, and that it will be especially difficult to 
rescue them because Pestulon is guarded by a force field generator, 
which makes it impossible to land there. 

You have now done all you can at Monolith Burger, so walk back into 
your ship. In all probability, you will have to make a detour to lose 
your lunch right next to where people are ordering their meals. Yuk!
I couldn't help but wonder if the guys who designed Monolith Burger 
had a real junk food chain in mind, and if so, which one. Gee, that 
big 'M' looked almost like the Golden Arches.

Fire up the ship - by now hopefully a familiar procedure - and head to 
the planet Ortega. Before you PRESS BUTTON (to exit the ship), be sure 
that you have remembered to WEAR UNDERWEAR. After exiting the ship, go 
left and then down towards the wobbly looking little land isthmus near 
the lower left of the screen. I'll bet that baby can't be walked over 
twice. In fact, if you aren't careful, it can't even be walked over 
once, so save the game. Continue towards the bottom of the screen and 
you will see two guys working with some seismic devices. Hide behind 
the rock until they leave. If they see you, you're Jello (literally). 
Go up to the telescope and USE TELESCOPE. Congrats, Roger, you have 
discovered the force field generator. Go to the anemometer - it's the 
wind measuring device on a pole - and GET POLE. Then go to the small 
crate and GET DETONATOR. Walk carefully to your right, remaining aware 
that there are places where a misstep will cause you to plunge to your 
death. You will be returning via the same route and this mistake is 
especially easy to make on the way back. Continue going right until 
you get to a path that goes up. Follow that path until you reach the 
bottom of the force field generator. When you get far enough back, 
toward the right edge of the rock in the center of the screen, you 
will automatically get to the stairs. 

Before you climb down the stairs, look for the long skinny ladder on 
the right side of the rear wall. That is where you are headed. The 
path to the ladder is fairly obvious once you have descended the 
stairs. When you get to the ladder, CLIMB. 

You are now at the rim of the force field generator. Save the game 
here and walk very carefully to the edge. When you are in a good 
position, DROP DETONATOR. Kaboom! You have disabled the generator and 
you may now travel to Pestulon. But first, you must return to your 
ship.

Walk carefully to the ladder and CLIMB down. Retrace your route 
carefully. What's this? the wobbly isthmus has collapsed and you 
appear to be stranded. Don't worry, you took that pole earlier. So, 
stand near where the isthmus was, and VAULT CHASM. Then walk back to 
your ship and get in. Depending on the angle at which you approach the 
ship's ramp, this may not be that easy to do. If you get stuck on the 
ramp, just walk away and try again. This might be a bug in the version 
I played, or it might be one of Sierra's little pseudo-problems. I'm 
not sure. Once in the ship, follow the familiar steps to set your 
course for Pestulon.

You are now on Pestulon. EXIT COCKPIT and if you haven't already done 
so, WEAR BELT, then PUSH BUTTON to exit the ship. Go one screen in any 
direction and you will be hiding in foliage near the heavily guarded 
entrance to Scumsoft's headquarters. When you see some guards leaving 
(to search for you), USE BELT and ENTER SCUMSOFT. You remain invisible 
for just long enough to make a quick and deliberate entrance. If you 
delay or walk erratically, the guards will notice you and you will be 
shot. Go down the stairs and look for a button by the left side of the 
door. Position yourself nearby and PRESS BUTTON. Good show, Roger, you 
have penetrated Scumsoft. 

You find yourself in a circular hallway that is navigated with the up 
and down arrow keys. When you get to a door that you want to enter, 
you do so with the left or right arrow keys. One of the two doors on 
your right has controlled access. We'll worry about that door later. 
Walk toward the bottom of the screen with the down arrow key until you 
come to a door at the inside of the hallway (screen left). Enter that 
door. If you didn't screw up it will be the familiar janitor's closet. 
If you did screw up it will be the door you first entered and you will 
have to try again. SEARCH CLOSET and WEAR COVERALLS. Check your 
inventory and see if you have a trash vaporizer. If not, SEARCH CLOSET 
again and then SEARCH COVERALLS. Eventually you will have this all 
important vaporizer. Exit the closet and continue around the hall, 
looking for a door on the outside of the hallway (screen right). If 
the door you find has a card reader near the right door frame, you 
can't get in, so continue to the other door and enter it by pressing 
the right arrow key. 

You are now in Scumsoft's accounting office which looks like a maze 
because it is one. Save your game here! Now try to walk to the rear of 
the maze. Oops! Now how did they know you were a bogus janitor? You 
got caught because you walked by a trash basket without vaporizing the 
trash. The way to solve the maze is to head for each basket of trash, 
stand directly in front of it (this is important) and ZAP TRASH. By 
the way, there are a couple of wastebaskets that are less obvious than 
the others. If you walk by one inadvertently, you die. There are 
several ways the maze can lead you, but you'll know you're heading the 
right way if your general progress is toward the rear of the office 
complex. Eventually you will reach Elmo Pugg's office in back. Just as 
I thought that the burger joint was modeled on something out of real 
life, I couldn't help but think of the young and very successful boss 
of a major real-life software company when I first ran across Elmo 
Pugg. At any rate, enter Elmo's office, zap his trash and leave his 
office. Go out the hallway in back and LOOK. It appears the Scumsoft 
lackeys have discovered your ship. When you come back inside, you will 
notice Elmo's office is vacant. Go into his office and TAKE KEYCARD 
from his desk. It is that little white flyspeck on the top right of 
the desk. You know, before I even opened the box this game came in, I 
knew that sooner or later I'd find a keycard. 

As you exit the accounting office maze, your objective is the copying 
machine at the lower left of the complex. Just before you reach the 
machine, you will see a picture of Elmo on the wall. TAKE PICTURE and 
go to the machine where you COPY PICTURE. On your way back, REPLACE 
ORIGINAL (the picture). Head out to your right and one partition to 
the rear and you will be able get to the door where you first came in. 
You now have what you need to enter the controlled access door!

Go around the circular hallway until you are abeam the door with the 
card reader. Stand by the door and USE KEYCARD. This will enable a 
verification by facial scan. Unfortunately, your face is not in 
Scumsoft's Approved Access data base. No problem! Immediately after 
the keycard has been read, you must USE PICTURE. When the scanner 
reads Elmo's picture, you're in! Well, Rog, you've found the Two Guys, 
but they're on the other side of a long drop and they're encased in 
Jello. When you PRESS BUTTON, a bridge will come out of the wall and 
you will be able to reach the Two Guys. Get real close to them and 
VAPORIZE JELLO. When you do, the score bar on the top of the screen 
will indicate that you have attained 737 out of a possible 738 points, 
a pretty decent showing. Alas, the euphoria is short lived. After a 
few moments, all sorts of viewing panels open up and you realize that 
virtually the entire Scumsoft staff has been watching your failed 
triumph with great amusement. Your score drops precipitously and you 
are led away.

Now comes the first of two really hard parts. Elmo has decided to 
dispatch you personally in the Nuke'em Duke'em robot boxing game. As 
he tells you the (non)rules, you get the idea that this is something 
he's very, very good at. It's just the sort of thing at which someone 
as gifted and bratty as Elmo would excel! I highly recommend that you 
save the game in progress before the first punch has landed. Just for 
fun, try duking it out with Elmo. You're guaranteed to be slaughtered 
every single time! There's got to be another way.

Once you discover that your offense is no match for Elmo's, it should 
occur to you that maybe defense is the answer. It is! The key to 
winning this game can be found in the energy reserve indicator bars at 
the top of the screen. Your winning strategy is to anticipate Elmo's 
punches and retreat from them so that he only connects with air. When 
this happens, his wasted energy from the missed punch will more than 
compensate for the energy you have wasted by retreating. Whenever you 
gain an energy advantage, save the game. When this advantage improves, 
save again. Having told you this, I must also tell you that evading 
his blows will not be easy, and that each little energy advantage is a 
hard won battle within a most difficult war. The keys to winning are 
backpedaling judiciously, never throwing a punch, blocking a punch 
only when there's no more room to backpedal and, most importantly, 
saving the game every single time the energy differential improves, no 
matter how slightly. With patience and practice, you will win, but it 
will be a bitch! 

When you finally manage to dispose of Elmo's punching robot, you and 
the Two Guys escape in your spaceship. This happens automatically. 
When you get sick of listening to the Two Guys bitch about the lack of 
food on board, USE SCREEN. You will find out that Light Speed and the 
Navigation System have been rendered non-functional. You will still be 
referencing the cockpit computer screen when you are informed that the 
Scumsoft Skull Fighters are attacking. You may remember that I said 
that the robot boxing match was the first of two difficult challenges 
that you still had to face. This is the second of those challenges, 
the one I mentioned at the outset which is best played with a mouse or 
joystick. While you still have time, select ATTACK SPEED and engage 
the WEAPONS SYSTEM. 

The first attack wave will be from the rear, so make sure that your 
rear shields are deployed. The next attack will be from the front and 
your shields must be repositioned before the attack gets underway. 
From this point on, the attack waves will alternate from one end of 
your ship to the other. The important thing for you to do is to have 
the shields in the correct position before any attack phase begins. 
Any errors here will doom you for certain. 

You will discover that when you blasted your way out of the salvage 
freighter at the beginning of the game, you destroyed half of your 
weaponry. Depending on how your shields were positioned back then, you 
will be without either your front or rear firing cannon. It doesn't 
really matter because you can complete the job with the one that still 
works. As the skull fighters attack, the Weapons System will inform 
you about which cannon is still operational. Save the game before you 
fire the first shot! 

When a Skull Fighter attacks the end of your ship where only the 
shields are working, all you can do is watch. When the other end of 
your ship is attacked, you can fire back. You destroy a Skull Fighter 
by positioning the targeting cross hairs over the ship and pressing 
the space bar to fire. You must splash the first five Skull Fighters 
that you are given the opportunity to shoot at. If you miss even one 
(by letting it get out of range), your shields will expire and you 
will be destroyed. So, whenever you destroy a Skull Fighter, save the 
game immediately, and whenever you miss one, restore the game that you 
had saved previously. When you've waxed five in a row, that's the 
shooting match. The remaining enemy will turn tail and your ship will 
escape to - Nah, I won't tell you.

@endnode

@node su "Suspended"
@next t1
@prev s3


                                 Suspended

                 
You have six different robots at your command. These robots all enjoy diffe-
rent skills and abilities. Each one represents a different sense.

IRIS : The sense of sight
WALDO: The sense of touch and dexterity
SENSA: Perceives things magnetic and electronic
POET : Perceives things electronic, can diagnose electrical flaws
WHIZ : Commands the computer and can do errands
AUDA : The sense of hearing

The trick to winning suspended is assigning the right task to the right robot. 
Also the right robot has to be at the right place at the right time. This is 
called critical path planning, and this is the secret of SUSPENDED. In the 
standard game there are a few real time events to be aware of:

1) AT THE 15TH CYCLE THERE IS ANOTHER EARTHQUAKE WHICH CAUSES AN ACID
   SPILL THAT KILLS IN SHORT ORDER ANY ROBOT THAT PASSES THROUGH THE
   CAVERNOUS ROOM THEREAFTER...UNTIL THE ACID IS SHUT OFF.

2) AT THE 75TH CYCLE THERE IS ANOTHER QUAKE WHICH WRECKS THE HYDROPONICS
   AND TRANSIT EQUIPMENT ON THE SURFACE ABOVE. THESE HAVE TO BE FIXED
   QUICKLY OR THE GAME ENDS SWIFTLY DUE TO THE STARVING POPULOUS ABOVE.

3) AT THE 100TH CYCLE HUMANS ENTER THE COMPLEX WITH THE INTENT OF TURNING
   YOU OFF BECAUSE BY THIS TIME YOUR CLEARLY SCREWING UP THE ASSIGNMENT.
   THESE HUMANS CAN BE THE DEATH OF YOU OR THEY CAN HELP YOU
   BY........WELL I WON'T TELL YOU YET.

The following commands get you through the game in less than 70 moves. As a
result they give little aid in the event that you finish the game in more
than that time. The game changes considerably after the 75th move. There are 
many problems tha surface after that time...which these clues do nothing to 
aid.

Lets get started..

#01 poet,go to weather control
#02 sensa,go to sub supply room
#03 whiz,go to secondary channel
#04 sensa,take ramp
#05 sensa,go west
#06 sensa,take container and grasper
#07 sensa,go to hallway junction
#08 waldo,go to hallway junction
#09 auda,go to gamma repair

The above moves set the game up. Poet is needed to turn the weather control 
off..this minimizes deaths at the surface...Your primary goal. Sensa gets the 
ramp that is needed to allow the robots to go from one level to another. Auda 
is sent to the gamma repair area because she will be needed later...and with-
out the humans coming for a while there is nothing that can be done with her 
anyway. Waldo, is sent to the hallway junction to meet Sensa and take the 
container and grasper on his way to fixing Iris who is reported to be out of 
order.

#10 poet,turn second dial to 100
#11 poet,go to hallway end
#12 iris,go to main supply room
#13 sensa,put ramp at dropoff
#14 auda, listen
#15 waldo,take container and grasper
#16 waldo,go to main supply
#17 waldo,install grasper
#18 waldo,take red ic and yellow ic
#19 sensa,go north
#20 sensa,take ramp

Once Poet got to the weather control, he had to reset the faulty control to 
100. This is only a temporary fix because if you let the game go on too long, 
all hell will break loose with various disasters and accidents occuring which 
you will not be able to control. Poet is then sent to the hallway end where 
he will be used to get the tv camera needed later. Iris is sent to the main 
supply room where she can be fixed when Waldo arrives. She will also help 
Waldo repair the machine there. Sensa...upon arriving puts the ramp in place 
so that Auda can get to gamma repair and so that she and poet can get to the
other level. Waldo is handed the grasper and container which he installs. 
This is done now to save moves later.

#21 sensa,go to small supply
#22 waldo,open panel
#23 waldo,replace rough device with rough object
#24 waldo,close panel
#25 poet,get in car
#26 poet,get out of car
#27 poet,go to biology lab
#28 waldo,take burned and fried chip
#29 poet,take camera
#30 sensa,put ramp at holder

This stage sets the robots to their major gathering tasks. Waldo has fixed
Iris, and is now set on fixing the machine and salvaging its parts. Poet has 
arrived at the hallway end , gone in the car, exited the car and is now get-
ting the camera. And Sensa has arrived at the small supply room to get the 
cutter.

#31 sensa,get on ramp
#32 sensa,take cutter
#33 sensa,get off ramp
#34 sensa,take ramp
#35 sensa,go to sloping corridor
#36 poet,go to vehicle debarkation
#37 waldo,put red ic in red socket
#38 waldo,put yellow ic in yellow socket
#39 poet,get in car
#40 poet,get out of car

Sensa has completed her task of getting the metal tool that she will need
shortly. Poet has gotten the camera and is now coming back and Waldo is in
the midst of fixing and salvaging the machine with Iris in the main supply
room.

#41 poet,go to primary channel
#42 sensa,put ramp at dropoff
#43 go to gamma repair
#44 waldo,push button
#45 iris,take fuse
#46 waldo,take cable
#47 waldo,go to the secondary channel
#48 iris,go to middle supply
#49 iris,take cable
#50 iris,go to main supply

Poet has been sent to use the camera in the primary channel (this is a kami-
kaze mission because he has to pass through the cavernous room to get there). 
Sensa has gotten to the sloping corridor and reinstalled the ramp so that she 
and Poet can get to the lower level. and Waldo and Iris have gotten the ma-
chine fixed and salvage one of the two needed cables to set the fcs balance.
Waldo is now set on a kamikaze mission where Whiz will be waiting to install
the cable needed in the secondary channel.

#51 sensa,examine object
#52 sensa,turn flowswitch
#53 both sensa and auda,move fred
#54 sensa, cut cable with cutter
#55 poet,plug tv1 in
#56 poet,aim tv1 at sign

(this is the important reset code..write it down..it's different every game)

#57 sensa,take cable
#58 sensa,go to primary channel
#59 iris, put cable in machine
#60 iris, put fuse in machine

Sensa and Auda salvaged the remaining needed cable to fix the cable in the
primary channel. Sensa is now on her way. Poet valiently died trying to work 
the camera in the primary channel after having corrosive acid spilled on him. 
And Iris has fixed the reset machine now only awaiting the installation of 
the cables in the fcs to reset the systems to set the surface world above 
right.

#61 whiz,go to waldo
#62 whiz,take fourteen-inch cable
#63 whiz,replace the nine-inch cable with the fourteen-inch cable
#64 whiz,drag waldo to the east end
#65 auda,go to sleep chamber
#66 sensa,replace four-inch cable with twelve-inch cable
#67 iris,press ----- circle
#68 iris,press ----- circle

At this point the game is over and only 8000 are dead and you have succeeded
in your mission. It should be said that this does not answer all the ques-
tions and puzzles that are presented in the game, it just tells you how to 
finish the game in the shortest order.

@endnode

@node t1 "The Secret of Monkey Island"
@next t2
@prev su


                        The Secret of Monkey Island


The 1st thing you do is go into the SCUMM bar, talk to all the pirates.  
Then go into next room and talk to the 3 important Pirates. After that wait 
for the cook to exit the kitchen, and enter that, take the slab of meat, and
dip it in the boiling Stuff. Go outside step on far right corner and knock 
the bird in the air, take the Fish. Go back inside, dip the fish in the boi-
ling stuff Pick up the pot under the counter and exit. Next go visit the Voo-
doo guy and he says some crap, but take the single rubber chicken. Next go 
outside to the pirates and talk them into giving you a map and some money. 
Next go into the jail talk to the guy and he will want breath mints go to the 
store buy them, and give it to the guy, he will ask you for a trade....  You 
can also go into the cliffs by going directly left up from the 1st screen you 
start on, if you are in the path you can take a yellow petal from a flower 
bush... I have found an Island house with no way across other to use the 
chicken pulley.. An other thing, i have found the Troll, he wants something, 
you give him the stewed fish, and he lets you pass..  You then can go to a 
house and you will find the guy who will train you. Ok now go to the circus, 
and use the pot as a helmet. They will give e you money, you then go to the 
store and buy a shovel, and a sword. Leave town, and go to the trainer's 
house, he'll teach you about sword play, then leave. Go out and see all the 
walking pirates, and learn their insults.  go into the fork again, and wan-
der around, when you see a small sign, push it with your shovel. Then walk 
along the wood bridge, and find the sword master. Challenge and beat her.. 
Great You have completed 1/3 of being a pirate..  Now continue to walk around 
and find an 'X' dig there and get the second treasure... Ok now make your way 
to the governors mansion, and put the yellow petal in the meat and give to 
piranhas dogs. They will go to sleep. Go into he house, take the vase open 
the door, and enter.. Just watch it is kind of cool..  Then when you exit, 
go back to the jail, give the prisoner the gopher repellant. He will give you 
a cake, Open the cake and look at the file.. Go back to Governors house, go 
through hole in wall, watch some more. Congrats you have just gotten the 3rd 
part of being a pirate.. Now go back to the Chicken Pulley Island, swing 
across, tell the chrome dome that the governor was captured, let him think,
and when you play with the animal, stroke it! Now go to the Master Swordsmen, 
tell her about the governor, get her to join you. Now go to Scumm bar, pick 
up another slab of meat, and all the mugs you can find..  Fill 1 cup with 
grog, and exit, make your way to the jail. When you are about to lose the mug 
o'grog, select the use mug (with the liquid) and replace with new mug..  then 
do it again when it is near death..  Then when you get to the jail, use the 
grog on the jail cell. You have freed him, now ask him to join you.. Ok now 
go to Stan's (Boat Place) and ask to buy a boat, he will tell you you need
credit so go to the store in town ( he will also give you a business card, 
and a compass).. Ask the guy  for a note, and watch how he opens the safe, 
when he puts note back ask him to go speak to sword master. Then go up to 
safe use the push/pull thing on the handle to open safe, get note close safe, 
and go back to Stan.  When you go to Stan ask him for the boat in the far 
back.  You say $5000, he will say no, so u leave, he calls you back, you then 
buy the boat for $5000! Now go to where you 1st start game, and you will meet 
Stan, he will want to buy boat back, and it is kinda funny! This is the end 
of part 1!

    Oh BTW There is a part when the sheriff throws you in the
    water, you get the idol, and climb out, you automatically    
    get the sword. 

Ok, first thing you have to do is open the desk drawer and look inside of it.  
You'll notice a book which you take. This is just a diary of the previous 
owner of the ship which you can read it if you want to but it's not necessary
.  Then grab the feathered pen and then the ink off the desk.  Go out onto 
the deck and you can talk to the mutinous pirates if you want to but they 
aren't going to help you any. Go climb up the rope ladder and grab the Jolly
Roger.  Then go back to the deck and down the hatch behind your mutinous crew
. Go to the door and down into the kitchen.  Next, open the cupboard and grab 
a box of cereal.  Open it up and you will find a toy surprise which turns out 
to be a small key when you look at it.  Get the pot on the table and go back 
up the ladder. Now go down the second hatch from the crew's living quarters.  
Grab the rope and open the kegs on the left and look in them to get some gun-
powder.  Open the bottom right chest and look in it to get the fine wine you 
will need later.  Ok, now go back up to your room and use the small key you 
found in the cereal on the cabinet.  Get the small chest and open it then 
look in it.  You will find a recipe and some cinnamon sticks.  You can look 
at the recipe but you don't need it since I will include the correct ingre-
dients here.  Go back out to the deck and use the rope on the cannon. Then 
put the gunpowder you have in the cannon nozzle.  Go back down to the leaking 
storeroom and get some more gunpowder then go back to the kitchen.  You might 
want to save your game here...Just a suggestion...Hahaha...Ok, now here is 
the list of objects you need to use in the pot:

               - CINNAMON STICKS
               - RUBBER CHICKEN
               - BREATH MINTS
               - JOLLY ROGER
               - GUNPOWDER
               - FINE WINE
               - CEREAL
               - INK

Pretty weird, eh?  Oh well...Now you'll pass out and when you awake, go out 
to the deck and you'll see you're are Monkey Island. Go down into the kitchen 
and use the business cards you got from Stan in the red hot fire.  Run back 
up to the deck and use the flaming mass on the fuse and use the pot then you
'll get blown onto the island.  You might want to save your game before you 
do that because it's frustrating when the fuse burns out before you get the
pot on and into the cannon.

You've just been shot from the cannon and ended up on the beach.  Pick up the
banana. You can read the sign posted on the tree if you like, it has some hints.
Now head into the jungle, go northwest, the screens will scroll as you make your
way around the island.  Go to the beach to the leftmost part of the screen and
read the note. Head back into the jungle. Go to the fort. Take the rope, the
spyglass, push the cannon, take the cannon ball and some gunpowder. Head back
into the jungle.

Go to the right a few screens, find the dry river bed, there is a strung up
person with some rope. You can't get the rope yet. Read the note. Head back
into the jungle. Go to the northeast to the river fork. Take the rock that's
holding a note down. Read the note, next look at the rock, it's a flint. Now
go up the footladder, you'll come to a rock on a see-saw (catapult). Use the
spyglass till it tells you your looking at the bananas, then push-pull the
"primitive art" till its directly in-line with it. Now go up the ladder, use
the spyglass again and look around for fun. Now push the big rock that's near
the edge. If you aligned the catapult correctly, it will hit the tree and
knock the bananas off. If not, go down and realign it and then get another
rock from the pile and push it off. Try not to sink the ship. For a laugh,
while ontop of the stone lookout, walk to the right as far as you can and
see what happens. This is Lucasfilms dig at Sierra.

Climb down from the rocks, read any notes. Once down, go to the damn, stand in
front of it. Use the gunpowder on the damn, use the flint with the cannon ball.
Boom! Ride the water. The go to the pond where the hung person was and get the
rope from him. Throughout the who game, Herman Toothrot will come up to you,
talk to him if you like to learn some hints. Head back into the jungle.

Go right one screen, go to the beach, find the bottle, read the note. Then
gp south two screens to the "crack" and find the strong branch. Tie a rope
to it, lower yourself, tie a rope to the stump and lower yourself again.
Get the oars. Head back into the jungle.

Go back to the beach. If you see the monkey you can feed him all the bananas
you have. Once on the beach, pick up the bananas that fell off the tree when
you hit it with the rock. Use the oars with the rowboat. Go north three times,
go to the beach, the head back into the jungle.

Go to the village. It appears empty, go east twice to the big monkey head.
Get the bananas in the bowl. Go east twice. The cannibals will stop you.
Talk to them, they'll throw you in jail. In jail, get the cute skull, move
the board and escape. Now go back to the beach, use the rowboat and go
to beach where you found the bananas. Head back into the jungle.

Find the monkey. Keep feeding him all the bananas you have till he looks
happy. (Click on LOOK AT MONKEY) He will then follow you around. Now
head in the jungle, go north twice, then east to the clearing, this is the
sacred monkey grounds. Go to the totem pole. Find the nose, pull it, it
opens a gate to the monkey head. It will close as soon as you release it.
The monkey will climb up and hold it down. Go in and get the whimpy idol.
Bring this back to the cannibals and offer it to them so they don't eat you.
They will be very grateful. Go into the hut and get the banana picker, then
give it to Herman Toothrot, he will give you a key. (its a giant Q-Tip)
Walk around, if the cannibals don't reappear, leave the village then come
right back. Talk to them and get the navigator's head from them. You'll
have to trade your leaflet or brochure for it. Head back into the jungle.

Go back to the sacred monkey grounds, go to the money's head. (if you can't
get back in type USE NAVIGATORS HEAD and the gate will open) Then position
yourself in the giant monkey's ear and use the monkey key and the mouth will
open. Go into the catacombs, use the navigators head and follow the direction
the eyes point. After awhile it will lead you to the ghost ship. Once there
TALK to the NAVIGATORS HEAD and tell him you want the necklace. Wear the
necklace, it makes you invisible, go onto the ship.

Go below using the hatch. look around. Go through the passage, then pick up
the chicken. (See the glowing crate!! Also, notice the locked hatch?) Now go
back to the sleeping ghost, tickle his feet with the feather a few times till
he drops the grog. Get the jug. Now go up on deck, go left to the door, open
it. Here is LeChuck. You want the key hanging on the wall, but can't get near
it. Use the magnetic compass to get the key (this is where I was stuck !@#$)
Go back below and now open the hatch, walk down it. To get by the rat, pour
grog into the dish. Go to the pot, get some grease. Go above deck.

Try opening the door to the right(Tool shop and Brig)It squeaks and the ghost
keeps shutting it. Put some grease on the hinge. Open the door, get the tools
and go below deck and open the glowing crate and get the root. Go to the
cannibals and they will make a special potion for you. Go back to the ship.
You'll meet up with the ghost, talk to him. Your crew will also show up.
You can kill the ghost if you want.

Now you're back on MeLee Island, you want to stop the marriage. Use the
seltzer to kill the two ghost you meet. Go to the church. Once inside, click on
STOP THE WEDDING!! Save the game here. You need to be fast at one point here,
but if you blow it, you can still win.After a confrontation with the governor
and LeChuck, the monkeys run off with the governors ghost killer potion. Now
LeChuck will attempt to beat you up. If you are fast enough, spray him will
seltzer. If you don't, you'll be knocked into orbit. (I suggest letting it
happen to see this happen, its quite funny) You'll land on Stan's Used Boat
lot, right on a soda machine. Quickly pick up the ROOT BEER bottle and use it
on LeChuck. If you blow it, don't worry, you'll be knocked in space again,
you'll land at the sword instructors house. Use the root beer as soon as you
can. Once you do, LeChuck will vanish for good, the governor will be your
girlfriend, fireworks will go off and you can now go to bed!

@endnode

@node t2 "The Secret of Monkey Island 2"
@next the
@prev t1

                      
                       The Secret of Monkey Island 2


You start on the bridge.  Go left or right, either way, Largo will shake you
down and mug you and steal your fundage.  After he leaves, bail to the right
side of the bridge.  Stop at the sign.  PICK UP SIGN.  You will take the
shovel.  Exit right.  You will then be at an overhead view of the map of the
island.  Go to the Swamp area.  USE COFFIN.  Row to the shack, you get taken
up into the voodoo mojo chick's pad.  LOOK AT TABLE in the first room, you'll
see a thread of string on the table. PICK UP STRING.  Now look at the jars on
the shelves next to the table.  Keep looking at things until you see the jar
of ASHES-TO-LIFE.  Now walk to the right side of the room and you will enter
the next room.  Talk to Mrs. Mojo Voodoo priestess chick about the ashes-to-
life.  You will need to know about this for later.  Now talk to her about
Largo and making a voodoo doll.  She will give you a list of ingredients you
need to make the doll... (hair, thread, body fluid, part of a dead relative.)
Leave and row back to shore, exit left back to map.

Now go to the cemetery... at the top of the hill you see some graves and
tombstones.  Go up there and you will get a closeup of the area.  The first
grave on the left is Largo's grandfather's grave.  USE SHOVEL ON GRAVE.
You will dig up the grave and get a bone from the deceased old feller.
Exit left back to the map.

Go to the beach area.  You'll find a stick on the ground.  PICK UP STICK.
Now leave back to the map.

Go back to woodtick town.  Go to Wally the cartographer's pad (second door
from right).  Talk to Wally about things.  Take a blank sheet of paper from
pile at bottom right hand side of screen.  Watch Wally closely.  He will
place his monocle on the table and rub his eyes from time to time.  When he
does this, quickly PICK UP MONOCLE.  Exit back out the door to the left.

Look near bottom of screen, you will see a hatch leading down to the Bloody
Lip bar and you will see some windows on the side of the ship.  The window on
the far left is accessible.  WALK TO WINDOW and you jump into the window and
find yourself in the kitchen.  There's a knife on the table... PICK UP KNIFE.
Leave from the window you came in at.

Walk down path towards far left, you reach the farthest ship on the left.
Enter the door.  See the little alligator tied to the post?  USE KNIFE ON
ROPE.  You will cut the alligator (Pegbiter) loose and the little bastard
runs away.  The Innkeeper freaks out and goes after Pegbiter.  PICK UP BOWL
in order to get the cheese squigglies inside Pegbiter's bowl.  Now exit
through the door on the far left.  This is Largo's room.  Quickly, before he
catches you in there, grab his toupee off the styrofoam head on top of the
desk on the far left of the room.  Now bail out the door, or wait till he
comes in and throws you out.

Go to the right and up to the screen where the pirates and the laundry dude
is.  PICK UP BUCKET (the bucket underneath the pirates).  Pirate on left will
say don't take it.  Choose dialoge option number one for best results.  You
ask if it's his bucket, he says no... you ask if minds if you take it, he
says go for it dude.  You can get the bucket with the other dialogue but the
conversation takes forever (but it's funny).  Ok, now you see a box on the
floor where the rat is scurrying around.  OPEN BOX... USE STICK WITH BOX...
USE STRING WITH STICK.... USE CHEESE SQUIGGLIES WITH BOX.  What this does is
set a trap to catch the little rodent.  Exit this screen for a moment, then
come back.  The Rat will be eating the squigglies under the box.  Pick Up
and Pull the string.  You will catch the rat in the box.  OPEN BOX.  TAKE
RAT. Exit this screen.

Now enter the hatch near the bottom of the screen to get into the Bloody Lip
Bar.  Talk to the Barkeeper.  Keep asking him for a drink over and over and
give him a bunch of excuses.  Pretty soon Largo comes in and orders a drink.
Largo spits on the wall before he leaves.  After this, USE BLANK SHEET OF
PAPER WITH DRIPPING SPIT.  Now you take his spit off the wall (body fluid).
Go up the stairs to leave this screen.

Now go back to the kitchen via the window. USE RAT IN VISCIOSUES (Soup).  You
drop the rat in there.  Now bail again via the window.  Now go back down the
hatch to the Bloody Lip.  Talk to the barkeep... a dialogue option about
ordering soup now appears... Select this option.  Barkeep goes into kitchen
to check the soup out... finds rodent in soup.. fires cook... comes out and
tries to serve you soup.  Tell him you don't want the soup, he asks if you
want a job.  Take the job, get your weeks wages in advance.  Now go into the
kitchen.  Fuck this job, its boring, you can't cook, and you already got paid,
so fuck it and bail out the window.

Exit right from the town, to the map.  Go to the swamp area.  USE BUCKET ON
SWAMP.  You fill bucket with mud.  Exit back to map, head back into town.
Go to Largo's room, CLOSE DOOR, USE BUCKET WITH DOOR, now hide behind the
clothes changing curtain.  Largo comes in, get's bucket of mud on head,
clothes are dirty.  Largo goes to cleaners, follow him there.  Watch the
conversation.  Largo leaves.  Now go back to his room, CLOSE DOOR.  You will
see a laundry ticket tacked to the back of the door.  PICK UP TICKET.  Go
back to the laundry dude, give him the ticket, he gives you Largo's clothes.

Now exit the town to the map, head to the swamp and back to the Mojo bitch.
Give all your voodoo doll ingredients (toupee, bone, bra and spit) to her.
She will make a voodoo doll and give it to you with some pins.

Now get back to the town, head to Largo's room.  When you go in there he
will start yelling and start to throw you out.  While he's doing this,
quickly USE PINS ON VOODOO DOLL.  Now watch the animation sequence as you
banish Largo from town.

Head out of town to map.  Go down to peninsula.  You meat captain dreadlocks
rastafarian joint toker.  Talk to him.  Now select ROLL JOINT, now SMOKE
JOINT WITH RASTA MAN.  The two of you start toking and get high.... ok just
kidding.  You talk to him and he tells you he needs his necklace to sail.
Give him Wally's monocle and it will suffice.  Now he'll give you a map and
you tell him where you want to go.  Select PHATT ISLAND from the map. While
on Dread's boat remember to pick up the bag of Parrot Chow when you see it.


                                 Part two

                
When you arrive on PHATT you get arrested by the guard no matter what you
say to him.  After the conversation with the Phatt pig you find yourself
behind bars.  PICK UP MATTRESS... there's a stick underneath.  USE STICK ON
BONE (the bone is the leg bone of the skeleton in the cell on the left.)
You flip the bone into your cell with the stick.  PICK UP BONE... GIVE BONE
TO DOG.  Dog walks to you, drops key, takes bone.  PICK UP KEY, USE KEY ON
CELL DOOR... you are now free.  Before leaving be sure to grab the two
envelopes on the shelf near the door.  One is the MANILLA envelope and one
is the GORILLA envelope.  In the manilla is all your inventory, and in the
gorilla is a banana and an organ.  OPEN ENVELOPES to obtain the items. Now
leave the jail.

From the jail, head right.  You will see a long path going off into the
distance.  Along this path you will see a few alleys and a library on the
left, and a pier on the right.  Head to the pier.  Talk to the old man
who is fishing.  Brag to him about what a great fisher you are.  He will
challenge you to a contest from which you can get his fishing pole if you
win.  The contest is who catches the biggest fish.  After you talk to him
leave the screen to the left.  Head to the Library.

Inside the library, to the left is a model lighthouse.  OPEN LIGHTHOUSE.
You find a lighthouse lens... pick it up and keep it.  Now go talk to the
librarian.  Apply for a library card.  Now you have a temporary card.  Go
over to the card catalogue.  Select a book that you WON'T NEED later.  My
favorite book to use for this is the Pirate's Primer found under P in the
catalog.  It's a book about software piracy... haha... You need to get
two other books at this point that you will need later.  One is under D
for Disasters and pertains to the sunken ship Mad Monkey.  The other book
pertains to the Ashes to Life spell and is found under A for Ashes.  Or V
for Voodoo... can't remember... When you find the three books and select
Hmmm I better remember this book for each one, go over to the librarian
and ask for each book by name.  She will give you the books you request.
Now leave the library and head back to the left towards the jail.... keep
going left past the jail and you'll see a long path to the left heading off
into the distance.  Take this path to the map screen.  Now head to PHATT
Mansion.

Enter the mansion through the front door.  Try to walk up the stairs.  The
guard stops you.  Tell him he's confused you with your cousin Guybrush.  Then
tell him you think there is a fire in the kitchen.  He leaves, you can now
proceed up the stairs.  When you get into the Phattboy's bedroom he's asleep.
Notice there is a book on top of his fat belly.  Move the cursor over the
book and you see the title is famous pirate quotations.  You will now need
to use your book to offset the weight of his book so you can take it.  Select
USE PIRATE PRIMER WITH FAMOUS PIRATE QUOTES. After a short animation which is
reminiscent of Indy Jones and the Temple of Doom, you end up with the Quote
book.  Leave this place now and go back to the wharf.

Head over to the path where the library is.  You will see two alleys.  Head
into the first alley.  There's a guy betting with a guy who's running a
roulette wheel.  He wins the bet and leaves... quickly follow this guy out
of the alley.  He heads into the second alley, follow him there and hide
behind the crates and watch what he does.  He then leaves.  Now go up to the
door, select OPEN PEEPHOLE,Guybrush knocks on the door.  When the dude answers
the door select the first dialogue option (Give me the next roulette number).
He will ask for the password.  What he will do is hold up some fingers and
say one thing, then hold up different fingers and say another thing.  For
instance he'll hold up four fingers and say "If this is two", then he'll hold
up one finger and say "Then what is this".  You will then have to select a
number.  In this example the answer would be FOUR.  Why?  Well, here's the
secret - When he first holds his hand up, count how many fingers he has up.
This will be the magic number.  Everything else he says is just designed to
throw you off.  He'll make you repeat the deal successfully three times in
a row.  Just keep telling him the number of fingers he holds up first and
you'll get it right each time.  After three times he tells you the number
you need to win roulette.  After you get the number, go back to the roulette
wheel and place a bet.  Win the ticket to the party, go back to the gamblers
club, get the next number, go back to roulette, place bet, win, take the
money, go back to the gamblers club, get the next number, go back to the
roulette dude, place bet, win, take the circus tickets.... Now leave and go
back to Dread's ship on the far right.  Ask Homeboy to take you to BOOTY
ISLAND.

When you arrive on Booty go into the first shop you see on the left, the
antique shop and buy everything you can get.  This includes the following
items: SHIPS HORN, SIGN ABOUT PARROT, FEATHER PEN, HUB CAPS, PIRATE HATS,
ELVIS PLATE, SHINY SAW, PARROT'S MIRROR, maybe some other shit too...
Don't worry about money, you will have plenty to get all you need. In order
to buy things select PICK UP (ITEM) and Guybrush will say he wants to buy
it.  The Antique Dealer will then either tell Guybrush the price and offer
to sell the item, or decline to sell the item entirely.  The few things
you might have trouble buying are the Sign about Parrot and the Parrot's
Mirror.  To buy the sign about the parrot, the antique dealer will decline
to sell it first, then agree to sell it.  With the parrot's mirror, the
dealer will decline to sell it unless you do something first.  Here's what
you do... First make sure you bought the sign about the parrot.  Once you
do this there will be an empty hook left in the place where the sign was.
Take your bag of parrot chow that you got from Dread's ship.  Select USE
EMPTY BAG OF PARROT CHOW ON HOOK.  You will hang the parrot chow bag on
the hook.  The picture of the parrot on the parrot chow bag will attract
the parrot.  The parrot will walk from the left end of the perch to the
right end of it in order to look at the bag of parrot chow.  Now that the
parrot is not looking at the mirror anymore, the dealer will let you buy
the parrots mirror.  Select PICK UP MIRROR to get the dealer to sell it.
After you buy everything, talk to the dealer about the piece of the map
on his counter.  He wants millions for this map piece, but he'll also trade
something for it.  He tells you about the figurehead of a sunken ship called
the Mad Monkey.  Find the figurehead and he'll trade it for the map.  We'll
find the figurehead later.... for now, leave the antique shop and head on
across the street over to the costume shop.

Inside the costume shop the costume dude will not give you a costume unless
you have one reserved.  If you show him your ticket to Governor Marley's
party he will give you your reserved costume.  Select GIVE MARDIS GRAS PARTY
TICKET TO COSTUME DUDE.  He will give you the costume that had been reserved
for the previous owner of the ticket.  Unfortunately the costume is not quite
your style, but you are stuck with it and it will get you where you need
to go, so take it and leave.

Now walk to the right from the costume shop and meet up with Kate who is
standing near Stan's Used Coffin Store waving flyers and yelling.  Talk to
her and take a flyer from her.  Now say goodbye and proceed on your way,
moving right.

Walk past Stan's shop (you'll deal with him later), you will see the spitting
contest, just keep walking past it towards the right of the screen (you'll
enter it later), and then you'll get to the far right of the screen, exit it
and arrive at the map of the island.  Select Gov. Marley's Mansion from the
map.

On your way to the mansion you meet a chick guard dressed as LeChuck.  Have a
conversation with her, put your costume on, then proceed to the mansion.
When you get to the mansion, before you enter, notice there is a path running
to the back of the mansion.  There are actually two paths, one heading left,
and one right. Take either path and you arrive in back.  There is a back door
which leads to the kitchen and there are some garbage cans.  Select PUSH
GARBAGE CANS.  You make a loud noise with the cans and the cook get's way
pissed and comes out yelling at you.  Run away from the cook and he will
chase after you.  Run to the path and follow it to the front of the mansion.
Keep running past the front of the mansion to the opposite path and follow it
around the other side of the mansion towards the rear again. You will have
made a complete circle around the mansion, the cook has been chasing you all
the way.  Quickly enter the kitchen door before the cook catches you.  Inside
the kitchen you see a pot of fish. Take one of the fish and leave the kitchen.
Let the cook yell some more and ignore him and he will go back in the kitchen.
Now take one of the paths back to the front of the mansion and enter the
mansion via the front door.  All of the guests will ignore you so don't waste
time talking to them.  Look to the far left side of the room, there is a
painting there.  You see a piece of the map you need stuck on the corner of
the painting.  PICK UP PIECE OF MAP.  Now leave the mansion.  You will get
stopped by the gardener and the dog and taken back into the mansion and taken
upstairs to see Gov. Marley.  Marley will be pissed and the two of you will
have a conversation.  Select all of the polite, grovelling dialogue selections
and you will be ok.  Don't piss her off more.  She will end up taking the map
and tossing it out the window. Leave the room, head on downstairs and out the
front door.  Try to pick up the map piece and it will float away and then
get carried by the wind and finally land on the side of the cliff.  Go back
inside the mansion.  Go upstairs and into Gov. Marley's room.  She's gone now.
Notice the oar mounted above her bed.  PICK UP OAR. Now leave, go downstairs
and out the door.  The dog will bark and you tell him to shut the hell up.
When the dog shuts up, select PICK UP DOG, and you will take the dog Guybrush
and stuff him in your pocket.  Now leave to the right, heading down the path
away from the mansion and you will arrive back at the overhead view of the
map.  Select Dread's ship from here and when you get to the ship have him
take you back to PHATT Island.

Back on Phatt Island take the path over to the pier with the old fishing man.
Select GIVE FISH TO MAN.  You will have a conversation and he will admit you
caught the biggest fish and you win.  Your prize is his fishing pole so he
gives you his pole and leaves.  Go back to Dread's Ship and have him take
your ass back to BOOTY Island.

Back on Booty Island go down the path to the left past the antique shop,
behind the old man with the cannon and you'll enter the overhead view map.
Select the cliff at the bottom of the map.  When you arrive there, select
WALK TO SIDE OF CLIFF.  You will get a view of the map on the side of the
cliff.  Select USE FISHING POLE WITH PIECE OF MAP.  You will cast your
line, hook the map and start reeling it up.  When you almost have the map,
a bird flys by and takes the map from you and flys to the BIG TREE.  Leave
the cliff area and you'll be back on the overhead view of the map of the
island.  From here, select the big tree and walk to it.

When you arrive at the big tree, you will see a bunch of holes in the tree.
The first hole has a plank stuck into it that will act like a step.  Take
the oar from your inventory and stick it into the second hole.  ie.  USE
OAR WITH HOLE.  Now step up on the big tree root from the left.  Now walk
to the plank, now walk to the oar.  When you step on the oar it will break
and you will fall and hit your head and become unconscious.  You will have
a dream then you will wake up again.  Pick up the broken oar and leave this
scene, back to the overhead map.  From here select Dread's ship.  When you
get to the ship, have him take you back to SCAB Island.

Head on over to the left and enter the first door you see, which will be the
Woodsmith's workshop.  Select GIVE BROKEN OAR TO WOODSMITH.  The Woodsmith
will fix your oar, reinforce it, and give it back to you.  Leave the workshop.
Walk left and head on over to Wally the Cartographer's pad.

At Wally's all you need to do is replace his monocle with something he can
see with.  Give him the lighthouse lens you got from the model lighthouse
at the library.  Select GIVE LIGHTHOUSE LENS TO WALLY.  Now leave Wally's
abode and head on across the way to the Bloody Lip Bar.

When you get down the hatch to the Bloody Lip Bar, order some drinks.  The
barkeep dude will have a variety of specialty drinks that have colorful names.
Order one of each drink. The Barkeeper will give you a free crazy straw.  You
will USE CRAZY STRAW WITH DRINKS later in the game in order to drink them.Now
ask the barkeep for some near-grog.  He'll tell you that Kate bought all the
near grog.  You'll need to know about this later.  Now look over at Jojo the
monkey.  See his metronome?  (That ticking thing on top of the piano).  Place
the banana on the metronome ie. USE BANANA ON METRONOME.  Jojo becomes dazed
while looking at the banana.  Select PICK UP JOJO... you pick the monkey up
and stuff him in your pocket.  Now leave this scene, head back up the stairs
to the surface.

Now proceed left and up to where the laundry dude and the pirates are.  The
pirates are all kicking back and sleeping.  You need to get a few things from
the Woodsmith's workshop, so the goal here is to somehow get the Woodsmith
to leave his shop... Perhaps if you created an incident where an emergency
Woodsmith housecall would be necessary you could accomplish your task.  Any
ideas?  Take a look at 'ole pegleg the pirate... see his peg leg?  Select
USE SAW ON PEGLEG.  You saw his peg leg off! haha.  Now leave this area.
The pegleg dude wakes up, notices his peg leg is gone and starts screaming.
From here go to the Woodsmiths Workshop.

When you get to the workshop, notice that the Woodsmith is gone.  He went out
to go fix the peg leg you sawed off.  Now that he's gone you can take a few
things that you will need later.  Take the Woodsmith's hammer from the wall,
then take some nails.  That's all you'll need from here so leave this area
and go back down the path to the right till you get to the overhead map.
Now select Dread's ship and have him take you back to BOOTY Island.

Back on Booty Island head on over to Stan's and go inside.  Stan is a high
pressure salesman and one of the most hilarious characters I've seen in an
adventure game in a very long time.  Some of the things he will say to sell
you his things are incredibly funny.  So ask Stan to see a coffin and enjoy
some of the things he says during the conversation.  At one point he hops
inside the coffin to show you how roomy it is.  At this point select CLOSE
COFFIN, and you will close the coffin door on top of him.  Stan should give
you a complimentary Stan's Used Coffin's promotional hanky sometime at this
point of the game.  Now, quickly select USE NAILS ON COFFIN.  If you do this
quickly enough you will hammer the coffin lid down with the nails and seal
it shut.  If you aren't quick enough Stan jumps out before you get the
chance, but you can get him to go back in just by talking to him and asking
him to show you the coffin again.  After Stan is nailed shut into the coffin
he really starts saying some damn funny things.  For a really good laugh
ring the bell on the counter while stan is sealed in the coffin... OK now
do what you came to do, take the CRYPT KEY.  It's on the back wall behind
the counter.  You can break the cash register open with the hammer if you
want, but it's empty so don't bother.  Leave Stan's store (poor Stan).

Now head on over to the right and you arrive at the spitting contest.  Stand
over near the flag markers in the ground and select USE SHIP HORN (the horn
that you got from the antique shop).  When you blow the horn the spitmaster
will leave momentarily.  Now's your chance so act quickly.  Select PICK UP
FLAG.  You will move the flag markers around in a way such that the distance
is less to win first place in the spit contest.  The Spitmaster will now
come back.  Look at the colorful drinks from the bar in your inventory.  You
will need to mix the blue and the yellow drink to form a green drink that
will make your spit thick.  Select USE YELLOW DRINK WITH BLUE DRINK.  The
drinks will mix into a green one.  Now select USE CRAZY STRAW WITH GREEN
DRINK.  You will drink some of the green drink and it will make your spit
nice and thick.  Now select TALK TO SPITMASTER... Tell him you want to enter
the contest... Select a name for yourself, I chose the best one, Captain
Loogie. haha.  Ok now you don't need to hawk or swish or anything to win the
contest, the trick is all in the wind at this point.  See the line of spit
contest spectators?  Look at the last spectator on the right.  She is wearing
this sash around her waist that will blow in the wind from time to time. Keep
a close eye on this sash.  Point the icon to PTOOIE and poise your finger
over your mouse, ready to click.  When the wind blows the sash up you know
the wind will be right to help your spit fly high and far.  With a little
timing you can click on PTOOIE just as the sash is blowing and your spit will
fly well and you will win first prize.  (A plaque with a loogie on it).  If
you fuck up, you can try and try again so keep trying until you win and get
your Loogie Plaque.  When you do get your first prize, head back over towards
the left and go back to the antique shop.

At the shop select GIVE PLAQUE TO SHOPKEEPER.  He won't seem to interested in
buying the plaque at first, but in your conversation if you keep selecting
dialogue selections that hype up the plaque and make it sound like a valuable
item you can get the dude to offer you 6000 pieces of eight for the plaque.
Say yes and sell him the plaque for the 6k,then leave the shop.  Now you have
enough money to charter a glass bottom boat from Kate and search for the
Figurehead of the sunken ship, Mad Monkey.  Ahh, but first you must know the
coordinates of where the sunken ship is located.  Select LOOK AT MAD MONKEY
BOOK, and it will tell you the coordinates.  Write these coordinates down
and walk over to the right and talk to the flyer lady, Kate.

Talk to Kate and ask her to charter her ship.  She'll ask you to show her where
you want to go on the map.  When you move the icon around, coordinates will
appear.  Move the icon around until you are pointing to the same coordinates
shown in the book that you wrote down.  Select that point and you'll be out
on Kates boat in the ocean.  Select "Dive down into the sea".  You will swim
down to the bottom of the ocean and see a sunken ship.  The Figurehead is
at the front of the ship to the right.  Swim over to it and pick it up.  It
is too heavy to swim back up to the surface with, so swim back over to the
left and you'll see the anchor.  Swim to the anchor and select PULL ROPE (the
rope that is attached to the anchor)... Once you do this Kate will haul you
and the anchor back aboard the boat.  You will soon arrive back on BOOTY
Island.  Talk to kate again.  Ask her if she is the same Kate who bought
all the near-grog.  She is, so ask her for some of the near-grog.  She'll
be a stingy bitch and refuse to give you any.  You'll get some revenge on the
cunt for that a little later.  For now, head on over to the Antique Shop.

At the antique shop select GIVE FIGUREHEAD TO ANTIQUE SHOPKEEPER DUDE.  He
will trade you his piece of the map.  You now have your first of four map
pieces that you need.  Let's go get the second piece from the Big Tree....
Exit the shop, head off to the left to get to the overhead map view.  From
here select BIG TREE and go there.

Once you arrive at the big tree select USE REINFORCED OAR WITH HOLE to place
your repaired oar back into that second hole.  Now walk to the big tree root,
walk to the plank, walk to the oar.  Now you will be standing atop the oar,
and you will need to select PICK UP PLANK.  Pick up the plank from behind you.
Now Select USE PLANK WITH HOLE to put the plank in the third hole up which
is to the right of the oar you're standing on. Pretty soon he'll get the idea
and climb up the rest of the tree by himself.  When you get there and you see
the three treehouses, look way up at the top treehouse on the left.  Select
it to walk up there.  You will find a telescope up there... PICK UP TELESCOPE.
Now head back down to the first treehouse and enter the doorway.  The bird
that stole your map piece is in there sitting on top of a large pile of other
maps that you will never need.  How will you ever find your map now?  Well
remember the doggie at Marley's pad?  He seemed to have a nose that could
sniff out objects that belonged to Gov. Marley.  Maybe he could sniff out
the map for you... Select USE DOGGIE ON PILE OF MAPS.  The dog will jump
into the pile and come out with your map.  Congratulations - you now have two
of four map pieces.  Leave the treehouse and climb back down the tree.  Go
to the overhead map view and select Dread's ship.  Have him take your ass
back to SCAB Island.

Once you arrive on SCAB Island, head back to the right to get to the overhead
map view.  From here select the CEMETERY.  At the CEMETERY on the right hand
side there are several tombs and one crypt.  Go to the crypt and select USE
CRYPT KEY (from Stan's) ON CRYPT.  You will open the door and go inside.
Walk to the last coffin on the very bottom right-hand side of the room.  Now
you need to refer to your book of pirate quotes that you got from King Phatt
boy.  Select LOOK AT BOOK OF PIRATE QUOTATIONS.  Read a few of the quotes.
Now select LOOK AT COFFIN,to examine the coffin on the bottom right hand side
of the room.  You will notice some familiar quotes.  Now select OPEN COFFIN.
You will remove the lid and see some ashes inside.  Now select PICK UP ASHES
and you will get some ashes.  Now leave the crypt, exit the CEMETERY to the
left and you'll be back on the overhead map.  From here go to the swamp area.

At the swamp area take the coffin boat back to the voodoo mojo bitch and tell
her you got some ashes so she can make an ashes-to-life potion for you.  Give
her the ashes and she'll say she forgot the recipe for the potion.  Give her
the book about ashes to life that you got from the library. The book contains
the recipe and will allow her to make the potion for you.  Get the potion and
leave the place, row back to the shore and exit left back to the map.  From
here head back on over to the CEMETERY.

Back at the CEMETERY enter the crypt again and LOOK AT OPEN COFFIN.Now select
USE ASHES-TO-LIFE POTION ON ASHES.  The dead dude will come back to life.He's
the guy who owns that wiener hut on the beach.  He didn't know he was dead.
Talk to him and tell him he's dead.  He has this nagging feeling he left his
stove burners on back at the wiener shack.  Offer to turn the stove off for
him and he'll give you the key to the place.  Leave the crypt and exit the
CEMETERY back to the map.  Select the beach area at the top of the map and
go there.

At the beach walk over to the shack and select USE KEY ON DOOR, the door will
open.  Walk inside and you'll see that the burners are indeed on.  Select USE
KNOBS and you will turn the burners off.  Now exit the shack, then exit the
beach left and get back to the map.  From here select the CEMETERY again.

Back at the CEMETERY, enter the open crypt again.  Look at the open coffin.
Select USE ASHES-TO-LIFE POTION ON ASHES and he comes back to life again...
Tell him you turned his burners off... he can rest in peace now and will give
you his piece of the map.  Congratulations you now have THREE OF FOUR Map
Pieces!  Exit the crypt, exit the CEMETERY and you'll be back on the map.
Select Dread's ship and have him take you over to PHATT ISLAND.

Now that you're back on PHATT Island you're gonna get some payback on that
Kate bitch who wouldn't give you any near-grog.  Still have Kate's flyer
in your inventory?  Good... See your face on that wanted poster pasted to
the wall?  Select USE KATE'S PICTURE ON WANTED POSTER and you will paste
Kate's face over yours on the wanted poster!  Now leave this scene by going
into the library or something.  Kate will walk up to the poster and see it.
The guard will come over and, thinking she is you, take Kate and throw
the bitch in jail.  Now head back over to the jail and go inside.  Kate's
envelope containing her personal possessions is lying on one of the shelves
near the door.  Take the envelope and open it and you will have yourself a
bottle of near-grog.  You'll need this later.  Leave the jail and walk
back over towards the right.  Take the path where the library is way down to
the end so you can get to the overhead map view of the island.  From here
select the waterfall area and go there.

Once you arrive at the waterfall walk up along side of it to the top of the
hill.  When you get here the view will change to a small clearing above the
waterfall and you will see a pump here.  The pump controls the waterfall
flow and to get past the waterfall you're gonna need to turn the water off via
this pump.  But how do you manipulate the pump?  You need a tool of some sort,
like a wrench, perhaps... or maybe a monkey wrench?  Or maybe even a monkey!
Yep that's right, select USE JOJO (The monkey from the bar) WITH PUMP.  Jojo
will act as a monkey wrench on the pump and the waterfall will be turned off.
Go back down the side of the waterfall from whence you came.  The waterfall
is off now and you can see a "newly discovered gaping hole" which lies at
the base of the fall.  Walk into this hole and you will be headed down a
tunnel.  The tunnel you are walking through is taking you underneath the
sea that separates the small island with the cottage on it from the larger
island of PHATT.  Proceed on through this tunnel until you come out on the
other side.  You are now on the small island!

On the small island you can see a cottage high above you, a path leading up
to the cottage on the left, the tunnel back to PHATT to the right of the
path, and to the right of the tunnel,under the cottage there is a hole. Don't
bother with the hole just yet, select the cottage with your icon.  Guybrush
will walk up the path to the cottage and soon arrive there.  Open the cottage
front door and walk inside.

Inside you meet up with a man.  Have a conversation with him and pretty soon
he will challenge you to a drinking contest.  He will move off-screen to the
left to prepare a mug of grog for you, then he'll come back and set it on the
table.  He will then go back off-screen to the left to prepare a mug of grog
for himself.  When he leaves at this point, you must act quickly.  What you
want to do is empty the grog from your cup and refill it with near-grog so
you can win the drinking contest.  Select PICK UP MUG OF GROG.  Walk over to
the tree in the barrel located on the far upper left hand corner of this
screen.  Select USE MUG OF GROG ON TREE and you will empty the mug of grog
onto the tree.  Now select USE NEAR-GROG ON MUG to fill the mug with near
grog.  Now select USE MUG OF NEAR-GROG ON TABLE to put the mug back down.  If
you worked quickly, by this time the man should be just arriving back into
the room with his mug of grog and you both sit down. He makes you drink first.
You drink your near-grog and you are fine... He then drinks his mug of grog
and passes out cold on the floor... You win the contest!  Walk over to the
top of the room and find the mirror frame hanging on the wall.  Hmm I think
a mirror needs to go here.  Take the mirror you got from the antique shop
and place it into the frame... Select USE MIRROR WITH MIRROR FRAME.  When
that is done, walk on over to the bottom right hand side of the room.  The
front door is on this side and there is a window to the right of this door
in the bottom right corner of the room.  You will need to open this window
before you go on.  Select OPEN WINDOW.  Once the window is open, go outside
through the front door.  See that ugly statue out there on the lawn?  Walk
over to it.  There is an inscribed plaque at the base of the front of the
statue.  Read this plaque and you'll get a hint about what to do next.
Can you figure it out?  No?  ok well here's what you do... Take your
telescope that you got from the top of the Big Tree.  Put your telescope in
the statue's hand.  To do this select USE TELESCOPE WITH UGLY STATUE.  You
will see a beam of sunlight shine through the telescope, through the open
window into the cottage, bounce off the mirror you put in the mirror frame,
and finally it will shine upon a single brick in the wall on the far left
side of the room.  Remember this brick.  The light will stop shining and
the telescope will drop to the ground and you will pick it up automatically.
Now walk back into the cottage and walk over to the left side of the room
where that brick wall is.  What you want to do here is pull the brick that
the spotlight showed you.  Below the trap door you are standing on is a
basement that contains the fourth and last piece to the map.  The basement
also contains a hole with a chute that spills out onto the beach below
the cottage.  Above this chute is a butt slide that your butt slides down
when you fall through the trap door.  If you pull the wrong brick, this
butt slide will spill you out onto the beach below and you'll have to
hike back up the hill to the cottage again.  If you pull the right brick,
(the one the spotlight pointed out), the butt slide will spill you out
right into the basement.  So pull this brick; select PULL BRICK and click
on the spotlighted brick.  You will fall down the trap door and find
yourself in the basement.  If you pulled the wrong brick or forgot the
right brick you'll find yourself on the beach.  You can hike back up
the hill and use the telescope on the statue again to find out the right
brick.  If you did it right and you are now in the basement, pick up the
map that the skeleton is holding.  Now bail through the hole in the floor.
From the beach, climb back up the path to get to the overhead map view.
From here select captain Dread's ship.  Have Dread take you over to SCAB
Island.

At Scab Island you'll want to head on over to Wally the Cartographer's pad
and have him put this map together for you.  When you get to Wally's, select
GIVE MAP PIECE TO WALLY.  You can give him any one of the map pieces and
he'll get the other three from you automatically.  It seems that Wally had
ordered a love potion from The House Of Mojo and asks you to go pick it up
for him while he puts your map back together.  So leave Wally's and head on
over to the swamp area and visit the House Of Mojo.  Talk to the Mojo bitch
and select the dialogue about Wally's Love Potion.  She'll give you his
love potion (Inside the Juju bag), but first she has a vision.  She senses
Wally being kidnapped by LeChuck.  She tells you to go save his ass.  Leave
and row back to shore.  Open the juju bag or look at it and a love bomb
and some matches will pop out.  Now head over to Woodtick and visit Wally's
pad again.  Look at his table and see the message he scratched into it.  Now
go back to the House of Mojo in the swamp.  Walk over to where the swamp
meets the shoreline.  See that crate sitting up there on the shore?  Walk
over to it.  LOOK AT CRATE.  See who it's addressed to?  Get an idea
of what to do now?  Select OPEN CRATE... now select USE CRATE.  Guybrush
will hop into the crate and shut the lid.  Some UPS type dudes will pick
the crate up with you in it and ship it over to Lechuck's Fortress.


                                Part three

             
You start out here standing in the fortress next to the shipping crate that
you arrived in.  Walk to the right and go up the stairs and enter the door
at the top.  Walk straight across the room to the far right and enter the
doorway.  Walk past bones to the door across the room to the right and enter
that door.  Now walk down the stairs over to the cell and you'll find Wally
strung up by his wrists in the cell.  Talk to Wally, he'll tell you to go
get the key to the cell.  Leave Wally, head back on up the stairs and out
the door.  Head left over to the three "Ugly Bone Things".  Remember the
paper you got Largo's spit on?  Look at this spit encrusted paper now.
See the song?  Read the first verse of the song.  Note how the bones are
connected in this song.  Now go back to the view of the room.  Find the
skeleton whose bone configuration corresponds to that of the first verse
of the song.  Push that skeleton.  Walk through it.  When you arrive in the
next room look at the paper again.  Read the second verse of the song.  Push
the skeleton whose bone configuration corresponds to the second verse of
the song.  Keep doing this for all four verses and you will finally arrive
in a room with a huge door and many locks on it.  Simply select OPEN DOOR
and walk inside.  See the key hanging on the wall to the right of LeChucks
throne?  Walk over and pick the key up.  Surprise, Lechuck captures you.
There's no way to avoid this so don't worry about it.

In the next scene you and Wally are strung up over this pit of acid.  Lechuck
explains what will happen to you when the candle burns down.  Ask Lechuck
some stupid questions and he will finally leave.  Now, for a good laugh,
talk to Wally and ask him some questions.  Ok, now get down to business.
Go to your inventory and select USE CRAZY STRAW WITH GREEN DRINK.  Now you
can spit at things.  See that shield to your immediate right side?  You need
to spit at the EXTREME bottom left-hand corner of this shield to put the
candle out.  Position your icon properly and spit.  If you miss, keep trying
and remember... EXTREME bottom left hand corner of the shield.  Sooner or
later you'll put the candle out and the screen will go completely dark.
Light a match to see what's going on... Select USE MATCHES.... Oooops...
Surprise... Kaboom!


                                 Part four


You arrive on Dinky Island.  Walk over to the far right and talk to Herman
Toothrot.  When he asks you what color the tree is, if you cycle through all
50 or so colors in the dialogue box you will finally get to select "ALL
COLORS" and he will say that is the correct answer and leave you alone.  You
don't really have to talk to this chump but hey, I had to suffer through his
bullshit so you should too!  Now walk over to the left and look at the base
of the still on the ground.  You should see a martini glass there, and a
black crowbar lying on the ground to the right of the glass.  Pick em both
up.  Now look on the left bottom corner of the screen.  See that bottle
lying there half in the water and half on shore?  Go pick it up.  Now, see
that rock there to the left of the still?  Select USE BOTTLE ON ROCK to
bust the bottle open.  Now walk over to the barrel underneath the parrot.
Select OPEN BARREL and you'll get yourself a cracker.  Select GIVE CRACKER
TO PARROT.  The parrot will give you a clue (Head due East from Pond to
Dinosaur).  Now select USE MARTINI GLASS ON OCEAN to fill it with sea water.
Now select USE MARTINI GLASS WITH STILL to distill the sea water and make
clean distilled salt-free water.  Now walk along the beach to the left and
about half way down the beach you will see a hole leading into the jungle;
enter this hole.

In the jungle you see a path heading up and one heading left.  Take the path
on the left first.  Follow the path on the next screen all the way up to
the top.  When you arrive on the next screen after this you will see a bag
tied up to a tree and hanging there.  Select USE BROKEN BOTTLE ON BAG and
you will cut the bag open to reveal a box of cracker mix which falls to the
ground.  Pick up the box of cracker mix and follow the path all the way
back to where you started at the opening to the jungle.  Now take the path
leading up to the top of the screen.  You will find a box with a rope tied
around it sitting on the ground next to a pond on the next screen.  Select
PICK UP ROPE to get it.  Now select USE CROWBAR ON BOX to open it.  Now
take the dynamite from the box and head east (right) two screens until you
arrive at the dinosaur.  When you do, the parrot will fly into the scene
and land on the dinosaur.  Select USE MARTINI GLASS WITH WATER ON CRACKER
MIX.  You will get two crackers.  Give one cracker to the bird for another
hint (Head North from dinosaur to pile of rocks).  Follow this hint.  When
you arrive at the rock pile the bird will fly over again.  Give him the
last cracker for the final hint (Head due east to Big 'X').  Follow this
hint by walking off the right side of the screen and you'll see the Big
X... (ya can't miss it... haha).  Herman will walk over and tell you he
knew a shortcut all along.. what a dick.  Herman takes you back to camp
so when you get there take his shortcut (move right) to get back to the
Big X.  Select USE SHOVEL ON BIG X to dig a hole.  Now select USE MATCHES
ON DYNAMITE to lite your dynamite.  Now select USE LIT DYNAMITE ON HOLE.
Kaboom...

Watch cut-away screen with Elaine... You are now inside deep hole facing
treasure.  Select USE ROPE WITH CROWBAR, then select USE ROPE & CROWBAR
WITH TWISTED RODS (located at the top where the hole is).  You will end
up swinging over to the treasure but left hanging there.  This is where
you came in at!  Elaine will talk to you for a minute, then the rope
breaks and you fall down into pitch dark.  Move the icon around to feel
around for a light switch.  When you find it, select USE LIGHT SWITCH.
Boo!

Have a conversation with LeChuck and find out his startling revelation
about the two of you... Sorta like Star Wars, huh?  Lechuck will zap
you with his voodoo doll a few times.  Walk back to the treasure room
when the coast is clear (first room on the far left hand end of the
tunnel).  Pick up the ticket from the smashed up treasure chest.  Walk
right all the way through the tunnel to the very far right hand end
of the tunnel.  Enter the door to the first aid room from here.

Inside the First Aid room take a look at the skeletons.  Now PICK UP
DADS SKULL.  Walk across the room over to the trash can located
underneath the First Aid sign.  Open the trash can and take the surgical
gloves out of it.  Now open the medical drawer to your immediate left.
Take the hypodermic syringe from the medical drawer.  Now leave this room
and head back on down the tunnel to the left.  In the next room you'll
see another door to the left of the first aid sign.  Enter this door and
you'll be in a storage room.  Open all the boxes on the floor.  You'll
find a balloon in one box, rootbeer in another box, and a voodoo doll
in the last box.  Take each of these items, doll, balloon and root beer
and exit the room.  Head back on down the tunnel to the left.  On the
next screen you'll find another door on the back wall to the right of
the elevator sign.  Enter this door and you'll be in a room with a
broken grog machine.  Use the gloves and the balloon with the helium
container.  Walk over to the grog machine and look it over.  See the
coin return at the top?  Select USE COIN RETURN and a coin will pop
out and roll on the floor.  At this point LeChuck should come in and
pick up the coin.  If he doesn't right away then just wait awhile or
do the coin trick again.  When LeChuck does finally arrive and bends
over to pick the coin up, his big ass and underwear will be hanging
out.  Select PULL UNDERWEAR to yank his shorts out.  LeChuck will voodoo
zap you into another room.  Go back to the grog room and mess with the
coin return again to cause another coin to drop.  Wait for LeChuck to
come back again.  This time when he bends over to pick up the coin
select USE HANKIE (from Stan's) WITH LECHUCK.  LeChuck will take the
hankie from you, blow his nose and give it back, then zap you into
another room.  Walk to the elevator room, push the elevator button and
walk inside.  Stand near the lever and when LeChuck arrives select USE
LEVER as fast as you can.  If your timing is right the doors will close
in LeChuck's face and cut part of his beard off.  Pick the beard up.
The elevator takes you up to the top floor.  Open the door and exit.

Remember this scene from Monkey Island I?  Yeah, me too... Ok you'll
have some peace and quiet up here to make your voodoo doll of LeChuck.
What you want to do is put the doll, the beard, the skull, the hankie,
and the underwear into the JUJU bag that the love bomb came in.  Select
USE <ITEM> ON JUJU BAG with each item to place it in the bag.  On the
last item Guybrush will shake the bag up and produce a custom LeChuck
voodoo doll.  Now enter the elevator through the door again and go back
downstairs to find LeChuck.  When you meet up with him, quickly select
USE HYPODERMIC SYRINGE ON VOODOO DOLL.  You'll stick LeChuck and he'll
say a few things then walk out of the room.  Follow him out of the room
and in the next room you'll speak with him again.  Select the dialoge
option regarding pulling his leg off the voodoo doll.  After this you
talk some more and he ends up asking you to take his mask off.  Go
ahead and do it, don't be afraid.  When you do this you pretty much
have ended the game.  The ending moves on from this point pretty much
automatically.  The ending is quite a shocker, and a bit of a let down
if you ask me... But hey the game was fun as hell.  Hope you enjoyed
it as much as me!

@endnode

@node the "The Witness"
@next we
@prev t2


                                The Witness

                              
                            1 Before the Murder
                            2 The Investigation
                            3 Proving Your Case


                           THE WITNESS - PART 1

This part really doesn't require much action by you. Most of your time will
be spent waiting until something happens, but there are a few things you need 
to do and some questions that you need to ask. Everything in your inventory 
that is pertinent to solving the mystery is in your game package. Walk up to 
the front door and ring the bell. Then, just keep entering the command "WAIT" 
until you get to the office with Mr. Linder. Sit in the wooden chair, read 
the note Mr. Linder gives you, and ask him about the following: Stiles, Vir-
ginia, Monica, Phong. Show him the matchbook and note his reaction. Then wait 
until something happens. The something that happens is Mr. Linder's murder.


                           THE WITNESS - PART 2

There are lots of areas to explore in this section of the game, so I will
only tell you the things you must do to solve the case and get a conviction.
The first thing to do is stand up. When Phong appears, ask him about Monica
and show him the matchbook. Look under the desk. Press the button. Look under 
the clock. Examine the window carefully. Analyze the putty. (The wires and 
putty are a big clue.) Next, unlock and open the outside door. Go east and 
examine the footprints. Go south. You'll find a handgun. Wait for Duffy to 
get back, then analyze the handgun. Return to the office and proceed to the 
living room to question Stiles. Ask Stiles about Mr. Linder and the call. 
Show him the matchbook, the note, and the muddy handgun (you should have it 
back by now -- if not, wait for Duffy).


                           THE WITNESS - PART 3

Return to the office. Hide behind the lounge and wait for Monica. She will
come in once and run out. Stay hidden and wait for her again. When she re-
turns, she will do something strange. Stand up immediately and handcuff her 
immediately. Search her. You will find a key. Phong will enter soon after. 
Ask him about the clock. Unlock the clock, open it, and examine it carefully. 
Ask Monica about the clock. Show Monica the handgun and then ask her about 
Stiles. When Duffy returns, have him analyze the powder found on the clock.
Search Monica for a gun. Examine the hidden handgun carefully. Show it to Mo-
nica. Wait for Duffy and then analyze the hidden handgun. Accuse Monica of 
murder. This will prompt something of a confession. Get the report from her 
bedroom. Read it and then return to the office. Show the report to Phong and 
then to Monica. When Duffy returns, have the report analyzed. When Duffy 
shows up with the analysis, arrest Monica for murder!

@endnode

@node we "Ween: The Prophecy"
@next wi
@prev the

                             
                             Ween - The Prophecy               
                             The 72-steps guide.
                             

1) Pick up the tongs by the fireplace and the copperball.
2) Open the cupboard and pick up the knife and the lard. Exit to the left of
   the screen to go outside.
3) Use the tongs on the guard rail and pick up the wood and the straw.
4) Use the knife with the reed and pick it up. Then go back into the house 
   and go into the backroom. 
5) Pick up the key on the table and use it with the skull, drop the key and 
   pick up the ring hidden inside the skull.
6) Pick up the portrait and hang it up on the hook,this reveals a hideaway.
7) Pick up the sleeping potion (digitalis) on the table and pick up the  
   bag of seeds. Use the sleeping potion on the seeds.
8) Use the seeds (drug) on the hideaway to put to rat to sleep.Then,pick up
   the mould.
9) Before you go back into the kitchen have a look at the book on the table
   next to the skull.
10) Once you're in the kitchen use the straw and the wood in the fireplace.
11) Use the ring with the copperball to change it into a cauldron.
    The copper ball can be changed into 3 different and very useful objects
    using different sacred jewels.

		    Ring       +  Copperball    =   Cauldron
		    Tiara      +  Copperball    =   Pipe
		    Necklace   +  Copperball    =   Sword

    Dont worry that you haven't got the tiara or the necklace, you'll pick
    them up later in the game.
12) Use the knife with the reed to make a flute. Use the flute on Ween to
    summon Urm the Vampire.
13) Give strawberries to Urm and then pick up the gold and the jam. Use the
    flute again  and this time give him the jam. Use Urm on the fireplace
    to start a fire.
14) Use gold with cauldron and then place the cauldron on the fire.The gold
    will begin to melt,use the cauldron with the mould to make a golden key.
15) Go back into the backroom and use the golden key with the padlock.
16) Pick up the half-statue and then open the trap(down you go!)
17) Pick up the torch and the tibia bone.
18) Use the torch on the hearth to start a fire.   
19) Use lard with cauldron and place it on the fire.The lard will melt into
    oil.
20) Pick up the planks to the left of the screen to uncover another exit.
21) Exit to the left and pick up the rope. Use the Cauldron to pour the oil
    into the bowl.
22) Take a close look at the skull on the wall. Use the ring with the 
    cauldron to change it back into the copperball and place it into the
    orbit.
23) Pick up the stone and  then place the tibia bone in the opening to act 
    as a funnel. Use the bowl of oil with the tibia bone and then use the
    lever.
24) Go back into the cave to the right and use the rope with the planks.
25) Use the bound planks with the stone to cross the gap and enter the 
    Stele.
26) Alright,ask Petroy to translate what is on the stone and the tomb. Touch
    the skull to reveal a sun stone. 
27) Use the torch with the holder by the stele, this will allow you to see
    whats going on.
28) Pick up the spear,sunstone and the tibia. Use the spear with the tibia.
29) Use the tibia spear with the curtain to reveal some juicy blackberries.
    Use the tibia spear again to reach the blackberries.
30) Use the flute on Ween to summon Urm. Once  he arrives give him the 
    blackberries. Use him on the hole above the door, he'll fetch you  the
    key from the other side of the door.
31) Pick up the key and use it on the lock to open the door and walk through 
    it.
32) A closer look at the sword reveals a catch, use the catch and then  you
    can pick up the sword.Use it on the statue to lever it out of the way. 
33) Open the trap and then use the cauldron (change the copper ball) on
    the acid, you'll need to use it twice with the acid (see #34)empty the
    trap. A mechanism will now be visible in the side of the trap, all  you
    have to do is push the keystones in combination. A secret hide will
    open in the back wall,you'll find either elixir or an effigy. If you
    find the elixir just push the keystones again and  this time an effigy
    will appear. If you get the effigy first then don't bother about the
    elixir,you won't need it.  
34) Now go back and take a closer look at the stele. Use the acid with the
    stele and read the runes, these will tell you what to  do with the sun
    and moon stone. Put the sunstone in the square-shaped niche first and
    then the moonstone on top of that. All you have to do now is put the
    effigy in the other niche and hey presto! you've opened the Stele.
35) O.k try and cross the bridge a monster will appear blocking your path.
    Pick up the feather and then open the chest,put the feather in the chest
    and you'll then be able to see the objects in it which are magically
    hidden. Read the parchment and then pick up the venom and the pollen.
36) Use the venom and the pollen in the cauldron to mix up a potion,use it
    on the leaves on the right of the screen.
37) Take a closer look at the bush and pick up the strawberries. Use the 
    flute to summon Urm and give him the strawberries, he'll then give you
    a bar of gold. Use the gold with the half-statue and then use the fish
    statuette with the water, you'll then  be able to swim across. If you
    have the elixir  then you can use that on the monster instead and then
    cross the bridge.
38) Try and pick up the massive strawberries-Urm will beat you to it and eat
    them all! but he'll leave you a huge pile of gold. Pick up the sword and
    use it with the rock this will block one of the holes. Use the cauldron
    with the hole just in front of the pile of gold,then just point at the
    hole on the bottom right hand edge of the platform to chase the orvivor   
    Grab the flying beastie and use it on the pile of gold,clearing the path 
    allowing you to continue.
39) Pick up the torch.Use the venom with the snake to change it back into
    quartz. Pick up the tiara and use it with the copper ball to change it
    into a pipe. Use the pipe to reach the wasp trap. Use the torch on the
    brambles to burn them down. Then use the trap on to wasps to capture
    them allowing you to get past.
40) Pick up the cherries at the bottom of the tree. Then use the parchments
    to change the shape of you and the dragon, keep using them until you
    change the dragon into a  wasp. Use the trap on the wasp and then use
    the flute to summon Urm again. Give the cherries to Urm and then use
    him on  the wasp trap,he'll move it out the way. Exit to the right of
    of the screen.
41) This bit is a bit difficult to explain as the puzzle is different each
    time you'll load it in. Use  Petroy on the mechanism and he'll give you
    a clue on how to solve the puzzle. Basically, the puzzle consists of  4
    stones and you'll have to press them in a certain order to open the
    door. Pick up the phial below the mechanism before you leave the the
    room.  
42) Pick up the ecu, hammer, woodpile, rag and the leaves. Use the hammer
    on the statues arm. Use the pile of wood on the hearth and then pick up
    the amphora and place it on the hearth as well. Look at the statues 
    head and use the rag to polish the eyes. Use the pollen on one of the
    quartz eyes and the venom on the other. Pick up the quartz flower and 
    use it on the hearth. Use the tiara to change the copper ball into a
    pipe and then use it on the snake,the snake will change it into a coil.
    Pick the gargoyle and use it with  the cyma, then use the coil with the
    gargoyles. Take a closer look at the  fountain and pickup the lichen,
    place it on the hearth. Push the numbered teeth in the right order to
    start the water flowing,the combination is: -12,4,6,3.Use the phial on
    the enclave and use the rag with the water. Place the wet rag on the
    coil and then push the stone. Pick up the magnifying glass and use with
    the beam of light to start the fire. All you have to do now is to use
    the leaf to plug the gap,simple isnt it?
43) Pick up the philtre and give it to the old guardian.pickup the rag and
    the coil (it will automatically change  back into a pipe). Change  the
    pipe back into the copper ball with the tiara and the use it with the
    little statue. Touch the statue and a passage way will be revealed! 
44) Click on the tabernacle and you'll discover that Kraal has stolen the
    Revuss.Pick up the necklace and the chalice, use the chalice to tip the
    scales. Click on the statues nose to turn the  head. Pick up the  glove
    and  take a closer look inside the chest. Use the glove with the 
    spiders and then you'll be able to pick up the heart. Click on the
    tapestry at the back of the room to discover some mirrors. Click on 
    vase and take the key out of it. Use the heart on the site and another
    passageway will open up.
45) Use the mirrors with the openings and then open the lock with the key.
46) Pick up the root and the bag. Use the bag with the snake and then click
    on the string at the top of the bag to make sure it can't escape. Use 
    the snake on the mongoose to get it out of the way and pick up the 
    digitalis. Change the copper ball into a sword and then use it on the
    larch. Use the root to pick up the resin and then use it on the little
    monsters. Change the sword  into the pipe and then use the pipe with
    the water. Use the digitalis and the pearls  with the bowl and then use
    the femur to mix them together. Use the mixture on the queen to knock
    her out,allowing you to get past. Finally, change the pipe back into 
    the sword and then use the sword on the rope to open the gate.
47) Pick up the bowl and use it on the resin, use the resin on the flower.
    Pick up the horn and use it with the wood. Pick up the tropical creeper
    and use it with the horn and wood to make a pickaxe. Pick up the baton
    and move it round the area of the screen just below the tree, you'll
    see the end of the baton straighten out when you've found something.
    Pick up the pickaxe and use it on the spot where the baton straightened
    out to discover a spring. Use the pot with the spring and then use the
    water on the mushrooms.Pick up the rock and use it with the bird. Click
    on the eye and then use the worm on the giant mushrooms.
48) Pick up the net and use it on the sea to catch a fish. Pick up the flute
    ,the strawberries and the oar. Use the flute to summon Urm and then
    give the strawberries to him, he'll give you some gold. Use the gold
    on the monster and pick up the haversack. Click on the coconut trees to
    knock down the coconuts,pick them up and use them on the lobster pots.
    Use  the hammer on the ribs to  break them off. Use the sword on the
    bamboo to cut it down and use it on the boat to make a mast. Use the
    archboat ribs and the lobster pots on the boat and use the oar on the
    notch to make a rudder. Use the sword on the fish to cut it open and
    give the eggs to the spider. Pick up the sail and use it on the mast.
49) Use the hammer on the padlock and pick up the tar from the hold.  Use 
    the pipe with the bottle and pick up the cork. Use the tar with the 
    cork to seal it. Use the sealed cork with the holein the boat and 
    quickly use the hammer on the hole to knock it in. You might have to
    empty the water out of the boat with the cauldron if you are not quick
    enough plugging the hole at first.    
50) Pick up the key and use it on the lock to open the door. Go into the
    shed and pick up the shovel, then go back outside.
51) Use the shovel on the sand in different places until you find an eye,
    a gold bar,bones, a diamond, a parchment, jewels, a sandal and an oyster.
    Use the sword on the oyster to open it up and pick up the pearl. Go 
    back inside the shed and use the flute to summon Urm, give him the
    strawberries off the table and he'll give you some gold. Give the eye,
    ecu, diamond, bones, jewels, sandal, ingot(gold bar), pearl and the gold 
    to the old man. Use the sword with the planks behind where the old man
    was sitting to discover a passage way.
52) Use the cauldron on the hole on the right and then try to grab the
    orivor. Pick up the pendulum and move it round the screen until it
    starts to swing. Drop it and pick up the cauldron, change the cauldron
    into the sword. Use the sword on the spot where the pendulum swung.
    Pick up the gold and give it to the orivor. Pick up the rope and use the
    sword on the branch on the left and the branches on the right. Use the
    rope on the branch to make a bow. Use the bow on the walnut and then
    change the sword into the pipe and use the pipe on the feathers. Use
    the feathers on the arrows and then use the bow on the walnut. Change
    the pipe back into the sword and use it on the walnut.
53) Use the cane on the glass  eye. Pick up the strawberries and use the 
    flute to summon Urm. Give the strawberries to Urm and give the gold to
    the old man.Pick up the redcurrants and use the cane on the glass eye
    again. Give the redcurrants to Urm and use him on the old man.
54) From this point onwards in the game you'll need to make various potions
    to aid you in your quest. Here is a little table to help you:-

    Ingredients		      Potion		 Effect
    -----------	              ------		 ------
    Venom + Pollen	      Growing Potion	 Makes Plants grow.
    Venom + Truffle	      Luciferys	         Turns rubys into fire.
    Pollen + Truffle          Vitalys		 Brings stone etc to life.
    Pollen + Venom + Truffle  Change             Strange effect on silver.

55) Mix up a growing potion by using the venom with the cauldron and
    then the pollen. Use the potion on the the little mushrooms.Pick up the
    truffles. Now, mix up some Luciferys and use it on the ruby. Whip up 
    another batch of growing potion and then use it on the grass next to 
    the flame. Pick up the camomile. Use the cauldron with the water and 
    camomile. Put the cauldron on the hearth and then pick it up again and
    use the tea to cure the  worm. Use the worm on the giant mushrooms to
    clear your path and out you go.
56) Make a Vitalys potion and use it on Bargol to bring him back to life.
    Use the pollen on the quartz to turn it into a flower. Take a closer
    look at the flower and pickup the pistil. Click on the ant on the leaf
    at the top right of the screen, give the pistil to the ant. Pickup the
    axe (bolt) and  the 3 grains of sand. Mix up another batch of Vitalys 
    and use it on the statue. Pull the lever and go back inside the cave.
57) Look at the mechanism and use the bolt with the orifice and the click
    on the lever. Pick up the key and go back outside.
58) Change the cauldron into the sword, use it with the bushes and use 
    the key in the lock to  open the door. Now, change the sword back into
    the cauldron and whip up a Change potion, use it on the grate to
    transform it into three big snakes. Use the venom on the snakes to
    transform them into rubys. Mix up a batch of Luciferys and then use that
    on the ruby's to transform them into flames. Go back into the cave and
    use the cauldron with the water. Go back outside and use the water with
    the flames.
59) Pick up the bowl and change the cauldron into the sword. Use the sword
    on the ornament and pick up the flawed jewel which falls to the floor.
    Use the sword with the hole until you discover a ruby. Change the sword
    back into the cauldron and mix up some Luciferys. Use the Luciferys on
    the ruby and pick up the jewel. Make a Vitalys potion and use it on the
    jewel to bring it to life. Turn the cauldron into the sword and use it
    on the crack. When the firefly lands pick it up. 
60) O.k now it gets a bit tricky,use Petroy on the hidaways in the room and
    he will tell you the number of each one. This diagram  should help  you
    understand how to lower the drawbridge.
    
              Room       /\/\/\/\/\/\         Key 
     	      ----         ________           ---
    	        	__           __ 5         /\/\/\ =   Letters
	       	     1 |__|         |__|           __
        					  |__|   =   Hideaway  
			__           O
		     2 |__|	                   O     =   Opening 
		                      __ 4  
			__           |__|         ----   =   Drawbridge
		     3 |__|		                     
						  
61) Touch inside hideaway number 4 (next to the statues hand), Click on it
    three times until the monster spits some glue at you. Use the bowl with
    glue to pick it up.Use the glue on the firefly and then use the firefly 
    /glue with hidaway number 1. Pick up the broken jewel. Use the glue on
    the flawed jewel and then use the flawed jewel on the broken jewel.
62) Change to the sword into the cauldron and mix up some more Vitalys. Use
    it on the jewel to bring it to life. Change the cauldron back into the
    sword and use it on the crack. Pick up the firefly when it lands. Use
    the  firefly on hideaway number 3.Pick up the jewel which appears next
    to the drawbridge and bring it to life with some more Vitalys. 
64) Turn the cauldron back into the sword and use it with the crack. When
    the firefly lands pick it up. Use the glue with the firefly and use it
    with hideaway number 4. Pick up the twig, use it with the opening and 
    then pick up the jewel.Change the sword into the cauldron, again! and 
    mix up another batch of Vitalys. Use the Vitalys  on the jewel to bring  
    it to life. Change the cauldron into the sword and use it on the crack. 
    Pick up the firefly when it lands,use the glue with it. Use the firefly/
    glue with hideaway number 5. Use the copperball with the hole and then 
    push the copperball to reveal a lever,pick up the jewel. 
65) O.k, now you will have 5 lit hideaways,each containing  a lever. When any
    of the levers are used a stone pedestal will rise in the middle of the
    room. When the levers are used in a certain combination `ALL' the
    letters on the back wall will light up,it doesn't matter if all of the
    stone pedestals aren't raised as they will automatically come up when you
    have lit up all the letters. This is the combination I used but you can
    use any combination as long as you have all the letters lit up at the
    same time:- 
			LEVER No.	Use No. Of Times 
    			---------       ----------------
			    1                  1
                            2                  2
                            3                  3
                            4                  4
                            5                  5

66) Once you have lit all the letters,use the bow to fire arrows at the
    letters to spell the word `K R A A L'. Be careful with your aim if you
    hit the wrong letter all the lights will go out! If you do this right
    the drawbridge will open.  

67) Pick up the heart by the skull.Click on the nail on the left wall, just
    above the skull. Keep clicking on the nail  until you manage to pull it
    out of the wall.
68) This diagram of the lock will help you understand how to escape.

                       -------------------------		          
		      |	      .1        .1      |        Key
	  	      |	   8. | .2   8. | .2    |        ---
            	      |	  7.  O	 .3 7.  O  .3   |     . = Hole
	              |     .   .     .   .     |      
		      |	   6  .  4   6  .  4    |     | = Needle
                      |       5         5       |     O 
                      --------------------------

69) Alright,now insert the nail into hole number 6 (see above) and click on
    the needle. Now one of the bars will rise,move the pointer below the bar
    while it's up and you'll discover a pin.
70) Now all the carving of the two suns means is that you insert the nail 
    into hole number 7 on the right dial and the pin into hole number 3  on 
    left dial. Now, click on both of the needles and all the bars should go
    up!  Before you leave the cell don't forget to put the heart into the
    heart-shaped orifice on the right of the screen.
71) Okie Dokie, you're nearly there now, so dont give up! As soon as you get 
    on to this screen click on the levers straight away. Now,you must get 
    this be right or you'll mess it up and it will be game over. You'll see 
    3 levers on the screen.

                           1      2      3  
			   O------O------O            Key
			   ---------------            ---
			   ---------------            O = Lever

    Starting from the right with lever no.3  move it all the way down then
    back to the top again, a total of 4 clicks.Do the same with lever no.2
    and then with lever no.1. If you have done this right the swinging
    blade will slow down.
72) Click on the carving and type in `DJEL' the hideaway above will open
    up. Pick up the knife and the bamboo. Use the knife with the bamboo,
    and you'll begin to carve a flute. Use the knife with the flute
    again to finish making it and then use it to summon Urm. Pick up the
    stone and then use it in the hole in the carving. Now, type in the
    name `AZEULISSE' the other hideaway will now open. Pick up the statue
    and use it with the other statue in the first hideaway. Pick up the
    grains of sand and use them in the Revuus. Thats all folks!!	

@endnode

@node wi "Wishbringer"
@next za
@prev wee


                                Wishbringer


             [Notes are included in brackets,don't type them!]

>S.READ POSTER.GET ENVELOPE.N.W.W. [you will be told the cemetary is scary, 
 and asked if you want to proceed, just type "Y"]
>N.SHOW ENVELOPE TO DIGGER.W.E.GET IN GRAVE.GET BONE.GET OUT OF GRAVE.S.E.E
>E.GIVE BONE TO DOG.N.N.SEARCH FOUNTAIN.GET COIN.E.BUY TICKET.ENTER THEATER
 [^^oops!!^^ be sure to take the note from Voss!]
>GIVE TICKET TO DIGGER.N.SEARCH AISLE.GET GLASSES.WEAR GLASSES. [at this time 
 you just keep typing look until the movie is over]
>S.TAKE OFF GLASSES.LEAVE.N.N.N.N.N.E.GET BRANCH.GET BRANCH.
>U.W.N.U.E.S.U.OPEN DOOR.ENTER SHOP.WAIT.WAIT.SHOW ENVELOPE TO WOMAN.
>OPEN ENVELOPE.READ LETTER TO WOMAN [take the can the woman offers you, then 
 just wait until she allows you to leave]
>D.N.W.D.S.E.D.W.GIVE CAN TO TROLL.GET CAN.OPEN GATE.S. [See note above about 
 the Boots.  You MUST avoid them whenever possible, as you can only get 
 caught once!]
>S.S.ENTER CHURCH.GET CANDLE.LEAVE.N.W.U.GET SHOE [If your load is too heavy, 
 don't worry about it, I never used to shoe in my solution]
>OPEN STUMP.ENTER STUMP.E.S.MOVE BUNK.DROP ALL.U.GET BLANKET.D.GET CANDLE.
>N.E.PUT BLANKET ON GRUE.OPEN REFRIGERATOR.GET BOTTLE AND WORM.W.S.GET ALL.N.
>W.U.N.E.S.SEARCH FOUNTAIN.PUT WORM IN FOUNTAIN.GET TOKEN.W.W. [Now, at Lake 
 Edge, the grating south of you should be open at this time. If it is not, 
 you may have to wander awhile, avoiding the Boots, and come back]
>S.GET UMBRELLA.N.SQUEEZE CAN.GET STONE.DROP CAN.OPEN UMBRELLA.WISH FOR RAIN.
>DIG X.GET WHISTLE.BLOW WHISTLE.W.WAIT.TAKE HAT.WAIT.BLOW WHISTLE.E.N.N.E.S.
 [West of House... Sound familiar????]
>OPEN MAILBOX.GET.LEAFLET [At this point, keep typing "N" until it allows you 
 to go north]
>E.GIVE HAT TO PELICAN.W.W.S.GET TOKEN.E.E.PUT LEAFLET IN BIG MAILBOX.S.
 [Save game now]
>PUT TOKEN IN MACHINE.PUSH STICK W.PUSH STICK W.PUSH STICK S.PUSH STICK S.
>PUSH STICK S.PUSH BUTTON [You will be asked if you are sure, etc, just keep 
 typing "Y".]
>KALUZE [Remember the Pelican?]
>S.S.GIVE NOTE TO MR. CRISP.GET COAT.SEARCH COAT.GET KEY.UNLOCK CHAIN.DROP KEY
>PULL LEVER.OPEN HATCH.CLIMB UP.U.WEAR GLASSES.GET CAT.POUR MILK.GET BROOM.
>FLIP SECOND SWITCH [If it does not say your score went up 3 pts then flip 
this back and flip the first switch]
>D.TAKE OFF GLASSES.MOVE PAINTING.TURN CRANK.D.GET NOTE.READ NOTE.DROP NOTE.
>U.TURN CRANK.N.N.E.ALEXIS, HEEL.OPEN DOOR.E.GET KEY.READ MESSAGE.W.N.
>UNLOCK DOOR WITH KEY.ENTER LIBRARY.S.S.BREAK CASE WITH BROOM. [The alarm 
 will not go off since you flipped that switch]
>DROP ALL BUT STONE.GET SCULPTURE.PUT STONE IN SCULPTURE [At this point you 
 will get the familiar -Are you sure?--Are you super dupere reaallllyyyy sure
 ?????- .. Just keep typing "Y" until you see a bunch of paragraphs pop up on 
 the screen, this is called The End]
>KNOCK DOOR [Woman takes cat, tells you a little story, and that is it!]

@endnode

@node za "Zak McKracken"
@next zo
@prev wi


                  Zak McKracken and the Alien Mindbenders        


                  STARTING OUT TIPS, AND GOING TO SEATTLE

Once again, it's up to you to save the world from a terrible fate -- rampant
stupidity! You, in this case, are Zak McKracken, ace reporter for the Natio-
nal Inquisitor, the kind of tabloid you see around 7-11 check-out counters. 
Eventually, you will gain allies in your quest, but for now I'm afraid that 
you are on your own! First, a few basic hints. Whenever you enter a new room, 
click on the command "WHAT IS" and sweep over the objects in the room with 
your cursor. Anything that does not register cannot be manipulated by you. 
Now, just because it registers doesn't mean it's important, but nine times 
out of ten it's there for a reason. Second, I cannot overemphasize the impor-
tance of reading the articles in the newspaper that comes with the game. It 
is chock full of clues, and should be consulted regularly. Remember that 
there is a twisted logic at work here, and there is often more than one way 
of solving a problem. And save often, of course! When the game starts, you've 
just awakened from a strange dream in which you saw a map. It occurs to you 
that you should make a copy of that map, so that's one of your first priori-
ties. You awake in your bedroom, so check that out first. There's a dresser, 
a desk, a lamp, a telephone, and an answering machine. OPEN the dresser, then
PICK UP the phone bill. READ the phone bill. Then cross to the desk, and open 
it. PICK UP the kazoo.Next to the desk there's a piece of the wall that looks 
different from the rest. PICK UP the loose piece of wallpaper. Now, if you 
look under the desk, you will notice an object resting there. When you try to 
PICK UP your CashCard, however, you push it further under the desk. No pro-
blem. USE the phone bill with the CashCard and it's yours. READ the CashCard. 
Seems like a lot of money? It won't last. The only other thing in your bed-
room of importance is the fishbowl, but you don't need that yet,so let's move 
into the living room. (If you want to, you can TURN ON your answering machine. 
It is not necessary to the solution, but otherwise you won't get messages 
from your mother. The phone works, by the way, but I never found any numbers 
to call.) WALK to the door and you'll be in the living room. When you try to 
TURN ON the TV, you can't. There are two reasons why: First, PICK UP the 
loose cushion. Aha! USE the plug with the power outlet on the wall. But you 
still can't TURN ON the TV. If you do a "WHAT IS" on the TV, you will notice 
an infrared sensor, so obviously you have to find the remote control. I don't 
know about you, but whenever I can't find my remote control, I always know 
where to look first. WALK to the couch and PICK UP the other cushion. Then 
PICK UP the remote control you find underneath, WALK TO the TV, and USE the 
remote control. Watch the TV to get more of an idea as to what's going on in 
the world. You might as well TURN OFF the TV and WALK TO the kitchen. Under 
the sink you'll find a cabinet. OPEN the cabinet and PICK UP the box of cra-
yons. USE the yellow crayon with the piece of wallpaper, and you'll have a 
map! Then OPEN the refrigerator and PICK UP the egg. PICK UP the small key by
the side of your door, OPEN the door, and go out. When you get to the street 
level, go left to the French bakery. PUSH the doorbell. When the man leaves, 
PUSH it again. Then, once again. PICK UP the stale bread and WALK TO the door 
to the right of your stairs. OPEN the door and go inside to TPC -- The Phone 
Company. Check out the representative and your surroundings. They will become 
important later. For now, GIVE the phone bill to the representative. Then 
PICK UP the application next to the counter (on the far left), and USE the 
yellow crayon with the application. You can then go back to your entryway, 
USE the small key with the mailbox, then USE the application with the mailbox. 
CLOSE the mailbox. It's time to take a trip to Seattle to cover a story about 
a two-headed squirrel! Continue to your right to the corner, where you'll 
find a bus and a sleeping driver. USE the kazoo, which will wake him. WALK to 
the CashCard reader, and USE the CashCard in the reader. And it's off to the 
airport! Oh no, one of those obnoxious shaven-headed devotees of some far-out
religion is trying to sell you a book! For once, give in. GIVE your CashCard 
to the devotee. He will give you a book on enlightenment. Since you already 
have your ticket, you can just WALK to the gate and the planes. Now there are 
three things you need on the plane, and the stewardess will stop you from 
getting them, so you have to distract her for a sufficiently long period of 
time to allow you to do what you need to do. This section should delight the 
practical joker in all of us! WALK to the back of the plane, OPEN the door, 
and go into the toilet. CLOSE the door. PICK UP the toilet paper, then USE 
the toilet paper with the sink. TURN ON the faucet and PUSH the call button. 
OPEN the door and walk forward to the front of the plane. (Ain't I a stinker?
) On your way to the galley, PICK UP the seat cushion from the seat in front 
of yours. You will notice something fall out onto the floor when you do so. 
PICK UP the lighter. Then WALK to the microwave oven in the galley. OPEN the
microwave, USE the egg with the microwave, CLOSE the microwave, and, finally, 
TURN ON the microwave. (This all must be accomplished before the stewardess 
finishes cleaning up the head, so you might want to save before you try it.) 
The resultant mess will gain the stewardess's undivided attention for a while. 
As she is cleaning up after you, OPEN all the overhead bins. In one, you will 
find an oxygen tank, which you can PICK UP. While you're waiting to land, you 
can READ the book and the oxygen tank for future reference. When you land in 
Seattle, WALK to the outside door and into the woods. PICK UP the tree branch 
overhead. GIVE the peanuts you received as a "meal" on the plane to the two-
headed squirrel, then USE the tree branch on the loose dirt. (Alternately, 
you can USE the butter knife from your apartment on the squirrel but this 
will haunt you later in the game.) WALK to the cave entrance. Who turned out 
the lights? Well, TURN ON the lighter and use its glow to check out the cave. 
Up and to your right is an abandoned bird's nest, and on the floor is a fire 
pit. You can't reach the bird's nest yourself, so USE the tree branch with 
the nest, USE the nest with the fire pit, then USE the branch with the nest 
in the firepit, and USE the lighter on everything. And Lucasfilm said "Let 
there be light!" On the far right wall of the cave is a door with some 
strange markings (and they won't be the last!) READ the strange markings, 
then USE your yellow crayon on the markings. This one time, the game will 
complete the picture for you, and the door will open. Go inside. There is a 
machine holding a blue crystal, which you saw in your dream at the beginning 
of the game. You need it, but it's locked in place. Fortunately, you notice 
an infrared sensor on the machine that looks just like the one you've got on 
your TV back home. Could it...nah! Well, might as well give it a shot. USE 
the remote control. Presto! Now, take the blue crystal. The lights will go 
out, but you should be able to find your way back to the cave with no pro-
blems. From there, return to the airport, and USE the reservation machine to 
buy a ticket back to San Francisco. It's time to get some help in your quest!


                      ANNIE, MIAMI, NEPAL, AND ZAIRE

You now have an artifact, and you need some advice. Remember the woman from
the Society for Ancient Wisdom you saw on TV? Why not go see her? When you 
get back to the San Francisco airport, WALK to the door on your right and you 
will find yourself back on the street corner by the bus. WALK up to the top 
of the screen and 14th Avenue. For the time being, walk by the pawnshop and 
continue to the second door. USE the blue crystal on the drop slot. Annie 
will open the door, invite you inside, and show you a picture of the machine 
you need to build in order to defeat the Aliens. Make a copy of this diagram 
for future reference. About this time, you will also notice that you can use 
the command SWITCH. Try it out by switching to Annie and have her pick up the 
blotter on her desk, and pick up the CashCard underneath. You won't need An-
nie's direct help for a while, so switch back to Zak. You've got to get the 
other yellow crystal shard that complements the one that Annie gave you, and 
it won't be easy, believe me. WALK out of Annie's office and go back left to 
the pawnshop. There you will BUY the following: the nose glasses, the hat, 
the tool box, the golf club, the guitar, and the wet suit. Go outside and to 
the right to the large bobby pin sign. OPEN the tool box, and USE the wire 
cutters on the sign. You have now gone from malicious mischief on the plane 
to vandalism and petty theft! About this time, you should have received a 
letter. Make your way back to your apartment entrance and USE the small key 
on the mailbox. PICK up the letter inside and read it. You are now a proud 
member of the King Fan Club. If the letter hasn't arrived yet, wander around 
a bit until it does. Go upstairs to your kitchen. USE the monkey wrench on 
the pipe below the sink, then TURN ON the switch behind the faucet. This will 
activate your garbage disposal. USE the stale French bread in the sink, and 
PICK UP the bread crumbs you've made. Be sure to TURN OFF the disposal and 
USE the wrench on the pipe again to fix things back to the way they were. (It 
might be fun at this point to PICK UP the butter knife and go into your bed-
room. PICK UP the loose corner of carpet [lower right] and try to USE the 
butter knife in the loose floor boards. No go, huh? Well, try the monkey 
wrench. Now, USE the rope on the hole and you can climb down and check out 
the aliens' secret room!) Now go back to the airport, and buy a ticket for
Miami. Miami is closed but there's a panhandler there whom you should take 
pity on. GIVE him your cashcard, then GIVE him the book. He will read it, 
return it to you, and also give you a bottle of whiskey. From Miami, fly to 
either London or Cairo, and from there to Katmandu. (Whenever you leave the
U.S.A., you will have to use the right exit code as found in the sheet that
accompanies the game.) In Katmandu, go right to the fancy door and try to O-
PEN the door. GIVE the book to the guard, and he will allow you inside to
meet the Swami. (First read the things on the bulletin board.) The Swami will 
tell you how to use the blue crystal to trade minds with any animal, a talent 
that will come in useful sooner or later! In fact, I'll bet you're dying to 
try it out right now, aren't you? Go ahead! BUT SAVE FIRST! USE the blue 
crystal on the Yak. Well, no one said it had to be exciting. About now, your 
use of the blue crystal will have triggered something in that secret room. 
Watch what the aliens do and pay particular attention to their method of dis-
guise. Return to your own body, and wait around until the alien shows up. He 
will take you captive, bring you back to his headquarters, and brainwash you, 
taking your crystals. For now, however, merely restore the game to where you 
saved. Go to the left and check out the police station. There is a flagpole 
out in front which you need, but stealing a flag is probably considered trea-
son in Nepal; so, you have to be fast or sneaky. Either way, you have already 
saved the game at this point, so give it a shot. PICK UP the flag pole, and 
WALK to the yak as fast as you can, then USE the CashCard in the yak. If your 
timing is right, you'll get away scot free. The alternative route is to USE 
the lighter on the hay bale to the right of the temple. While everyone is 
busy putting out the fire, you can nonchalantly saunter over to the police 
station and pillage it. If your conscience starts to bother you, remember, 
it's for a very worthwhile cause. From the airport, buy a ticket, and fly to 
Kinshasa, Zaire. After going through several random jungle scenes, you will 
find yourself in a clearing. At the far left in the clearing is a hut with a 
sign out front. Go inside, and you will meet the Shaman who's in the picture 
with the Swami back in Nepal. GIVE him the golf club. Out of gratitude, he 
and two of his countrymen will show you a dance. TAKE NOTES! When the three 
men stop dancing and line up in a row, write down the order in which they bob 
their heads. (This differs from game to game.) The Shaman will tell you to 
return when you have the yellow crystal, so it's time to head out again. Wend 
your way back through the jungle to the airport, fly to Cairo, and from there
back to Miami. About now you should have severely depleted your CashCard. So 
before we head home, let's try to get you some more money. In Miami, buy a 
ticket to the Bermuda Triangle. Your plane will be caught by a mysterious 
beam, and you will end up on a spaceship. The pilot will enter a four-note
combination on the colored panels (this too varies from game to game), but
when he invites you back aboard the plane, stay over on the far right by the
doorway. Once the bright white glare disappears, push the button by the side 
of the door. You will be captured and taken before the King of the Aliens. 
Before he can decide what horrible fate worse than death should befall you, 
give the Fan Club Card (or the guitar) to the King. This will make you the 
King's good friend, and one of his minions will show you a different color 
combination that will send you home. Don't use it yet. Instead, return to the 
King's chamber, and WALK to the right and READ the Lott-O-Dictor, which will 
give you tomorrow's winning number. Then go back to the color panel, press 
the right combination of buttons, and stand on the platform to the left of 
the panel. You will be teleported straight home. Go back to the pawnshop and 
BUY a Lottery ticket. (At this point, you can also SELL your bent butter 
knife.) You can pick up your earnings after your trip to Latin America.


                          PERU, MEXICO, AND MARS

At SFO, buy a ticket for Lima, Peru. When you reach Lima, you will have to
wander through a few jungle screens until you reach a scenic overlook. If you 
continue right past the ancient bird feeder, you'll see a huge carving. Now, 
if only you had wings.... Go back to the bird feeder,and USE the bread crumbs 
on the feeder. This will attract a sparrow. Save the game! USE the blue crys-
tal on the sparrow. Use of the blue crystal will alert the aliens to your lo-
cation, and you want to avoid capture. Now, depending on your game system, 
you will have to press a certain key or button (on the Amiga, for example, 
you click the right mouse button) to avoid watching the "cut" scene of the 
Alien putting on his disguise. Activate this feature as soon as the scene be-
gins. This will give you enough time to do what you need to do. In the bird's 
body, FLY to the giant carving and to its right eye. You will see a candela-
bra and a platform. You can't do anything here right now, so fly out and go 
to the left eye. PICK UP the scroll on the floor, and FLY back out of the eye
, across the valley, and back to Zak. GIVE the scroll to Zak, then return to 
Zak's body. As quickly as possible, get back into the jungle. You must accom-
plish this before the Alien arrives. Return to the airport and fly to Mexico 
City. You'll have to go through yet another jungle until you reach the Aztec 
pyramid. Pick any of the three entrances and go inside. Now you're in a real 
maze, which you can map if you want to, but it can be solved fairly easily by 
trial and error. In each room there is at least one torch, which you will 
have to locate (with a "WHAT IS") and then USE with the lighter. There are 
three types of corridors in the pyramid: long ones with green faces on the 
walls, medium ones with blue faces, and short ones with no faces. You will 
enter a long corridor; try each exit from it until you locate a medium corri-
dor; from there, try to find which of the several doors leads to a short cor-
ridor. One of the short corridor rooms has a door which leads into a room 
with a statue holding a shard of yellow crystal, and on the base of the sta-
tue are some strange yellow markings. Unfortunately, here you must draw the 
correct figure yourself,and you don't know what it is. I would recommend that 
you save the game at this point, and prepare to meet the rest of our intrepid
crew. SWITCH to either Melissa or Leslie, who are standing by their converted 
VW Microbus in the Martian desert, just waiting for something to do. Have the
co-ed you switched to OPEN the van door and go inside.OPEN the glove compart-
ment. PICK UP the boom box, the CashCards, the fuse, and the digital audio 
tape from the radio. USE the oxygen valve if you like. Leave the van, and 
make sure each girl has the correct CashCard. WALK to the left,past the alien 
hostel, and to the black monolith. USE the CashCard in the slot, and then do 
it again so you get two tokens. Now switch to the other girl, and have her do 
the same, so that each co-ed has two tokens. Bring them both inside the hos-
tel. USE the token on the metal plate to the right of the airlock door, and 
PICK UP the burnt-out fuse. Then, USE the fuse from your van in the air lock 
fuse box, and PUSH the button, closing the door. Next, PUSH the button by the 
door on the right wall, and send Leslie into the dormitory. (Melissa is a 
little too squeamish.) Check out the locker by the door and PICK UP the lit-
tle strip of yellow vinyl tape. OPEN the right side of the cabinet, and PICK 
UP the flashlight. Move to the right and PICK UP the covers, revealing a dead 
alien shaped like a broom. Finally, PICK UP the ladder in the far right cor-
ner, and leave. WALK both the girls to the right (past the van) to the Giant 
Face and a door that has three buttons on it. Set up the ladder under the 
highest button, and send one co-ed up the ladder, while parking the other by 
the lowest. Now press the buttons in the order indicated by the dancing na-
tives in Zaire. This will open the door. Take both girls inside. Inside you 
will find two huge statues and three massive doors. On one of the statues 
will be strange yellow markings. READ the markings and copy the symbol down 
(they change from game to game). This is the symbol Zak needs to draw on the 
Mexican statue's base to get the yellow crystal shard. But first there are 
some other matters to take care of in the Great Chamber. Your oxygen will not 
last forever, and it might be nice to see the girls' faces. Let's find the 
air conditioning unit. WALK to the massive door on the left. USE the ladder 
by the pedestal, and WALK to the crystal globe. Have the other girl USE the 
vinyl tape with the digital audio tape (DAT), allowing you to record over it. 
USE the DAT in the boom box, TURN ON the boom box, and set it to Record. 
SWITCH to the girl on the ladder and PICK UP the globe. There will be an an-
noying whine and the door will open. Send LESLIE with the flashlight into the 
chamber. You find yourself in a maze of colored doors. You can map this maze 
if you like, but the quick and dirty way is to go through the purple door, 
then the blue door, then the purple. You should find yourself in a room with 
a machine. READ the gauges on the machine, then PUSH both switches. Once both 
gauges move into the green, you will be able to remove your helmets inside 
the whole Great Chamber. Exit the machine room and go through the blue door. 
From there, take the purple door, another purple door, and finally the door 
with the red edges on your far right. There you will find a room with a fa-
miliar map, a representation of the Sphinx, and more strange markings which 
you should copy down. To find your way to the exit, go out and take the yel-
low door, then the blue door, the red door on the far left, the red door on 
the far right, the red door on the far right, and the red doorway on the far 
left. Next move to the middle of the three massive doors. The crystal globe 
here is broken, so you have to USE the boom box in Play mode, which will pro-
duce the sound you need to open the door. This is not a maze, thankfully. All
you need to do is go through the doorway over on the right Inside you will
see a close relative of the statue in Mexico, holding an ankh. PICK UP the
ankh. Finally, you can open the massive door on the far right by either me-
thod, and once you enter and go through the door in that chamber, you will 
find a force field, which you turn off when you USE the ankh in the panel. 
PUSH the button on the strange machine and you will see what I assume is a
hologram of the ancient aliens who prepared all this for you. PICK UP the
smaller key on the wall (the larger one will crumble into dust). At this
point, it's time to leave Mars, and go back to Zak. Save the game here, just 
in case you make a mistake. USE the yellow crayon on the strange markings. By 
placing the cursor on the screen where you want to draw a line, you can re-
create the drawing the co-eds found on the huge statue. When it's done, click 
on FINISHED DRAWING. The statue will release the crystal shard and you can 
take it. Find your way out of the pyramid, return to the airport, and from 
there to San Francisco. It's time to pick up Annie and finish this game!


          LONDON, ZAIRE (AGAIN), CAIRO, MARS (AGAIN), AND ENDGAME

Once back in San Francisco, go home and get your fish, Sushi, and his trans-
parent domicile. USE the fishbowl with the sink to give Sushi a temporary 
home, and then leave. On your way to Annie's office, be sure to visit the 
pawn shop and pick up your lottery winnings. Would that real life were as 
full of such sure things! GIVE the scroll to Annie (who is the only one who 
can read it). Then both of you should walk down to catch the bus (remember 
only Zak can wake the driver), and you both should go to the airport and buy 
tickets for London. Zak should GIVE the bottle of whiskey to Annie,who should
, in turn, GIVE it to the sentry by the electric gate outside of Stonehenge. 
He will get drunk and pass out, enabling Annie to TURN OFF the switch that 
controls the electrified fence. Zak can USE the wire cutters on the fence,and 
both can WALK to Stonehenge. Zak should USE the yellow crystal shards on the 
altar, then USE the flag pole on the little notch on the left. SWITCH to An-
nie, who can READ the scroll again and produce the desired effect. Have ZAK 
pick up the yellow crystal (now fused whole), and send both back to the air-
port. Both Zak and Annie should fly to Cairo, but send Zak on from there to 
Zaire, and have him visit the Shaman once again. The Shaman will explain to 
Zak how to use the yellow crystal for teleportation purposes. Zak should then
rejoin Annie in Cairo. On one of the two legs of the Sphinx will be some more 
of those ubiquitous yellow markings. Zak must recreate the drawing seen in 
the chamber on Mars below the depiction of the Sphinx, which will open a se-
cret door. Both Annie and Zak must go inside. Yep, it's another maze, but (a) 
it's lighted, and (b) there's an easy solution. Always go through the doorway 
with a picture of the sun over it (or in one case, the doorway is at the end 
of a corridor, and the sun is above and to the right). Eventually you will 
find a door with what looks like a pair of horns above it. Inside you will 
find some hieroglyphics which only Annie can read. They will instruct her to
push the left button, then the right button, and the center button. (One of
the hieroglyphics looks suspiciously like an Imperial fighter from Star Wars, 
by the way.) Once the panel opens, Zak should USE his yellow crayon on his 
wallpaper map, and you should write down the last set of strange markings 
(whew) by the depiction of the Great Face. Retrace your steps out of the 
Sphinx. At this point, Zak should go to the big pyramid across the street, 
and enter the tiny little door on the left side. With lighter in hand,he will 
be able to find the doorway to the right, find the torch on the way inside 
that room, and light it. Bring Annie to join him in the room with the sarco-
phagus, then send Zak only back to the airport, and fly him to Miami. In Mi-
ami, buy another ticket to the Bermuda Triangle, and before the beam can get 
you, USE the parachute. The cushion you stole from the first airplane will 
keep you afloat. USE the kazoo, which will summon a dolphin. Save the game 
here, and USE the blue crystal on the dolphin. As the dolphin, SWIM underwa-
ter and to the lower right to a clump of seaweed. PICK UP the seaweed, then 
PICK UP the glowing object behind it. Return to the surface, GIVE the glowing 
object to Zak, and return Zak to his own body. Immediately, USE the yellow 
crystal. The maps you have drawn will appear, and you can use the cursor to 
pick where on the map you want to go. Click on the yellow dot in South Ameri-
ca, and you will be teleported to the room in the huge carving's right eye 
where the candelabra was. PICK UP the candelabra and get ready to teleport to 
the secret chamber inside the Martian pyramid. USE the yellow crystal and 
click on the pyramid. Oops. Nothing happened. Well, you have to get to Mars 
anyway, so USE the yellow crystal again and click on the Great Face. You will 
be teleported into a chamber with three doors and, yes: more strange yellow 
markings! USE your yellow crayon to recreate the figure you saw in the map 
room inside the Sphinx, and all three doors will open. Go through the center 
door, and you find yourself in the maze of colored doors. TURN ON your ligh-
ter, go through the green door on the far left, and the yellow door on the 
far left of the second room; go all the way to the left, and you'll be in the 
Great Chamber. Zak can meet up with Melissa and Leslie at long last. No time 
for chitchat, though. Have Leslie put her helmet back on and WALK to the big 
pile of sand in front on the hostel. USE the broom alien on the sand, to re-
veal solar panels, then send her over to stand by the tram. Next, PUT ON Me-
lissa's helmet, and send her over to the the tram. Finally, you have to send 
Zak outside, but he needs a spacesuit. PUT ON the wet suit, the oxygen tank 
and the fishbowl, then USE the duct tape on the fishbowl. Perfect! Send Zak 
to the shuttlebug where he can use the oxygen valve to freshen his tank and 
bring it up the full 15 minutes; then, send him to the monolith, and have him 
USE his CashCard in the slot. He needs only one token. Zak should then join 
the others by the tram. Save the game here! Have each of the three USE the 
token in the tram. All three must get on board before it leaves, or you can't 
finish the game. The tram will go to the Martian pyramid, and let everyone 
off. Send Leslie to the pyramid, and USE the broom alien on the sand pile. 
Send Zak there, and USE the bobby pin sign. Then give Zak the flashlight, and 
have him enter the pyramid. It is a duplicate of the Egyptian pyramid, except 
for the sarcophagus. This one can be manipulated. Bring both co-eds into the 
chamber, and have one PUSH the sarcophagus's feet. This will open a secret 
door to the left of the sarcophagus. Send the second girl up the stairs, have 
her stand by the button, and send Zak up there.(You may have to move the girl 
away from the sarcophagus's feet to close the hole in the door.) PUSH the 
button, quickly SWITCH to Zak, and PICK UP the white crystal. Zak should USE 
the yellow crystal to teleport to the dot on the map near Cairo. While not 
necessary, it is fun to send Melissa and Leslie back on the tram, have them 
pick up their fuse in the hostel fuse box, replace it in the van,and then USE 
the controls to head home.) Zak is now in a secret room with a big base, two 
switches and a lever. First, PULL the lever, which opens a secret set of 
stairs. SWITCH to Annie, who has been waiting patiently below, and have her 
come up the stairs. PULL the lever again to close the panel in the floor. 
Have Zak USE the glowing object on the base, USE the candelabra on the glo-
wing object, and USE each of the three crystals in their proper position as 
shown in your dream and the diagram in Annie's office.(Oh no, you forgot what 
order to put them in? You dunderhead, now you'll have to start from the be-
ginning! Just kidding.... Actually, the program automatically puts each in 
the right position.) When the machine is finished, have Zak and Annie each 
pull a switch in turn. Then sit back and enjoy your victory and the amusing
epilogue. It's Miller time!

@endnode

@node zo "Zork 1"
@next author
@prev za


                       Zork I: The Underground Empire
                     


So, you're all set for The Great Underground Empire, eh? Okay, but before
we begin, a few words about this walkthru. First, this is not the only way
to solve the game. It's just one of the faster ones. Second, because ther
e is no "wasted motion" in this game, you will not be visiting all the
locations. So, you might want to play around with the game on your own for
a while,mapping out as much as you can, without much regard for gathering
treasures. Actually, mapping is a good idea, since, if you make a misstep
somewhere, you might find yourself in trouble! Be especially careful to
follow the directions when in the mazes; a wrong move there, and you could
be lost for quite some time! Finally, you may not go through this in
exactly the way it's written because of the thief. He is a variable item in
the game; you never know where he will show up. Try to move out of the
room he's in as soon as he shows up. But keep in mind that even if he does
steal anything from you, you will get it all back from him in the end.
Okay? Let's start the adventure! You begin West of the house,and your
first chore is to get inside. So, go South and East. Open the window and
enter the house (you're in the kitchen), then go West into the living room.
Get the lamp, then move the rug, revealing the trap door. Open the trap
door, turn on the lamp, and go down. At this point, some mysterious person
will shut the door on you; don't worry about that for now. Okay, so here
you are in the cellar. It's time to pick up your first treasure,so go S ,
then East to the Gallery. Get the painting, then continue North to the
Studio. Go up the chimn ey (you can only fit with the lamp and the
painting), and you will be in the kitchen again. Now, go upstairs to the
attic, and get the knife and rope.

Come back down and go into the living room. Open the case and put the
painting inside. Then, drop the knife and get the sword. Open the trap
door again, and return to the cellar. Again, the door is shut by someone
(you never will find out who's doing this, but it doesn't matter). Now
you're back in the cellar, and since we're coming to one of the more
dangerous parts of the game, you might want to do a save here. Gripping
your trusty sword, head North into the Troll room. There's a nasty troll
here with a bloody axe, and the only way past is to kill him. So, do just
that: "Kill Troll With Sword." It will most likely take more than one
attempt, so keep at it, and eventually he will disappear in a cloud of black
smoke. Now, drop the sword, because you really don't need it any more, and
it will hinder you in carrying other, more important items. Having
dispatched the troll, you mvst go E, East (into the Round room), then SE and
East. You are now in the Dome room. It's a long way down, and too far to
jump, so here's where the rope comes in handy. Tie the rope to the railing,
then climb down the rope. You will be in the Torch room. Leave the torch
for now; you'll be coming back this way again later. From the Torch room,
go South, then East and get the coffin. Return West, then continue South to
the Altar. There's no way you're going to get down that hole with the
coffin, and even the program will tell you that you haven't got a prayer.
That's a hint, folks: Just "Pray," and you will find yourself in the forest
again. Since it's daylight out, save energy and turn off the lamp. Now,
head along South, then North (I know, but it works!) to the clearing, then
East to the Canyon View. Climb all the way down to the bottom, then go
North to Rainbow's End. Drop the coffin and open it. Inside is a jeweled
sceptre. Get that, and wave it. The rainbow will become solid (you'll need
to cross over from the other side later). Now, "Look." You should see a pot
of gold. Get that, and the coffin. After that, go SW, then back up to
Canyon View. From there, it's NW to the clearing, and then West to the
window. Once in the kitchen, open the bag and get the garlic (nothing else,
just the garlic). Go on into the living room, and put your treasures in the
case. Now, sit down and take a breather, because you're about to do a lot
of traveling!

Once again, open the trap door, turn on the lamp, and go down. Watch
carefully, and you will notice that this time, the door doesn't close!
Whoever was doing it before must have gotten tired. Anyway, you're on your
way to the dam, so move along North, East, North, NE, and East. You are now
on top of the dam. From there, go North to the Lobby. Pick up the matches,
then go either North or East (doesn't matter) into the Maintenance room.
Get the wrench and the screwdriver, then push the yellow button. Now,
return to the dam, and you will see that the green bubble is lit. Turn the
bolt with the wrench, then drop the wrench. You have opened the dam, and
you will be coming back this way again to reap the fruits of your labors.
However, right now, you're on your way to Hades, so let's get going! Go
South, then down into the Loud room. Leave the platinum bar for now; you'll
get it later. Head West into the Round room, then SE and East (hmmmm,
haven't you been here before?). Again, climb down the rope. This time, get
the torch. At this point, you can turn off your lamp; the torch will
provide light so long as you have it. Now, continue straight South, getting
the bell, then the book and candles from the altar. Go down the hole to the
cave, then down again to the entrance to Hades. Your candles will have
blown out by this time, but don't worry about it. Okay, here's where you
have to be careful. First, ring the bell. It will become red hot and you
will drop it. You will also drop the candles. Stay calm, and do the
following, all in one command: Get the candles, light match, light candles
with match (necessary, because of the torch, and *DON'T* use the torch, or
you'll vaporize the candles!). Okay, strange things happened when you lit
the candles, now read the book. Whew! The demons have been exorcised!
Drop the book, then go South and get the crystal skull. Now, back NorthE
then up to the cave, then North to the Mirror room. By the way, better put
out the candles. Rub the mirror, and you will now be in another Mirror room
(this one is North of the dam, as the other one is South). Now, go North,
then West, then North, then West into the Squeaky room (well, I told you
you'd be doing a lot of traveling this time!). Make sure you have the
garlic with you, then go North into the Bat room. So long as you have the
garlic, he won't bother you. There is a jade figurine here, but leave it
for now. You'll pick it up on your way out.

Go East to the Shaft room. Put the torch into the basket, then turn on your
lamp and head North to the Smelly room, then down to the Gas Room (best not
to carry any open flames here!). Now, you are about to enter a small maze,
so follow these directions *CAREFULLY*! East, Northeast, Southeast,
Southwest, down, and you should be at the top of the ladder (if you aren't,
may God have mercy on your soul!). From there, go down to the Ladder
Bottom, and then South to the Dead End for the coal. Get that, then return
to the ladder top. From there, go up, North, East, South, North, and you
will be back in the Gas room. Go up, then South to the Shaft room again.
Put the coal in the basket, and lower the basket. Now, guess what? You
have to go back through the coal mine again! So, make your way to the
Ladder Bottom, but this time, go West to the Timber room. Ignore the broken
timber (not useful for anything), and drop all but the screwdriver. Now,
you can squeeze through the crack to the West. And here you are in the
Drafty Room, which is also at the bottom of the shaft. There's the basket,
so get the coal and the torch, and move South into the Machine room. Open
the lid, put the coal in the machine, close the lid, and turn the switch
with the screwdriver. Drop the screwdriver, open the lid, and get the
diamond (well, no one ever said Zork was an *EASY* game!). Now, go back
North, and put the torch and the diamond in the basket. Squeeze back East
into the Timber room. Get the skull, lamp, and garlic. You won't be
needing the matches and the candles any more, so you can leave them. (They
were insurance in case the thief came along and stole the torch before you
could get the diamond). Now, head East again to the Ladder Bottom, and from
there up and through the coal mine (you know the way now!), to the Gas room.
Pick up the bracelet, then continue on up and South to the Shaft room. Get
the torch and the diamond from the basket, turn off the lamp, then go West
into the Bat room. Get the jade, then go South, East, South to the Slide
room. Now, here's a fast way back to the cellar: Just go down the slide!
Wheeeee! Then it's up to the living room (remember, the trap door is open
now), and all the treasures go into the case. Huff! Puff! Bet you didn't
know you'd be doing *THIS* much running around! But, don't get too relaxed,
there's still plenty more to come.

Turn on the lamp, and return to the cellar. From there, it's North (ah,
deja vu!), then East, North, NE to Reservoir South. Now that the sluice
gates are open, you can head North, picking up the trunk of jewels, North
again to Reservoir North, getting the air pump, and North one more time,
getting the crystal trident. After that, go all the way back South again to
Reservoir South, then East to the dam, and then East once more to the Dam
Base. Here you find a little pile of folded plastic; guess what it is?
Right, it's an inflatable boat! So, inflate it with the pump, then drop the
pump, then get inside the boat, say "Launch," and you're floating off along
the Frigid River. Now, just keep waiting until you see the buoy. Get that,
then "East" to the beach. Get out of the boat, then get the shovel and move
on to the Sandy Cave to the NE. You might want to save the game at this
point, since you have to dig here until the scarab turns up, and I'm sure
you don't want to get buried alive (it's been known to happen!). Okay, drop
the shovel and get the scarab, then go back SW. Drop the buoy and open it;
inside is an emerald. Get that, then continue South to the Aragain Falls.
Here you can cross the rainbow (so do that!), which brings you to the End of
The Rainbow. Turn off the lamp, then go SW to the Canyon Bottom. From
there, make your way back to the living room, and put all the treasures in
the case. Your collection is quite impressive by now, but you aren't
finished yet. Go East twice, then North twice. Climb up the tree and get
the egg. Climb down again, and go South, East, and back to the living room.
However, this time, you don't put the treasure in the case. Turn on the
lamp, and go down (once again!) into the cellar, and North to the Troll
room. Now, you are about to enter a maze, so follow the directions very
carefully! West (this brings you into the maze), South, East, up, and you
find several items here. Take only the coins and the key, and be careful
not to touch the skeleton! From here, go SW, East, South, SE, and you will
be in the Cyclops room. The Cyclops is not friendly, but you can deal with
him effortlessly: Just type in "Ulysses" (or "Odysseus," if you prefer).
Old One-Eye will tear out of there right through the wall! In fact, he will
create a passage eastward from that room right into the living room!
However, you don't want to go that way yet! Instead, go upstairs, and you
will be in the Treasure Room, the thief's secret lair. Now, give him the
egg, and go back downstairs, then East to the living room. Deposit the
coins in the case, then get the knife (the thief needs a little time to open
the egg). Okay, go back West to the Cyclops room. Again, at this point,
saving is recommended; the thief will not be easy to kill! So, head
upstairs and use the nasty knife to kill the thief. Once he's dead, all
treasures in the room will be visible. This includes the egg, a silver
chalice, and anything he may have stolen from you before. Get everything,
then follow these directions: Down, NW, South, West, up, down, NE, and you
will be in the Grating Room. Unlock and open the grate (watch out for
falling leaves!), then go up. You will be in a clearing. From there, go
South and climb the tree again. Wind up the canary that's inside the egg.
A songbird will come by and drop a bauble for you. Climb down again and get
the bauble, then return to the living room. Put all the treasures in the
case, making sure you *REMOVE THE CANARY* from the egg and put it in the
case separately! You're almost finished! Just one more trip to make! Now,
for the last time, enter the cellar and go North. From the Troll Room, go
East until you come again to the Loud Room. Type in: "Echo," and you will
now be able to get the bar. So, grab it and return to the living room.
Once you place it in the case,you will get a message. Follow the advice of
that message, and you will get a map. Take that, and return to the place
where this all started, the mailbox West of the house. You should have no
trouble getting to the barrow from there. Of course, once you enter the
barrow.... You didn't really think it would end there, did you? Not when
there's still Zork II and Zork III waiting for you up ahead! Ah, but it's
too late; you can't turn back now! You'll just have to grit your teeth and
follow through to the end (with a little help, of course). See you in Zork
II!

@endnode

@node author "Author's address"
@next end
@prev zo

 Johan Van Gompel
 Borreshoefstraat 19
 3650 Dilsen-Stokkem
 Belgium
 
 
 Please send me all your solutions (the ones I haven't got yet) so everyone
 can enjoy them!

@endnode

@node end
@prev author
@endnode